1000
590,h of the Ammonites; and it shall be a desolate heap, and her daughters shall be burned with fire: then shall Israel be heir unto them that were his heirs, saith the LORD. 
Howl, O Heshbon, for Ai is spoiled: cry, ye daughters of Rabbah, gird you with sackcloth; lament, and run to and fro by the hedges; for their king shall go into captivity, and his priests and his princes together. 
Wherefore gloriest thou in the valleys, thy flowing valley, O backsliding daughter? that trusted in her treasures, saying, Who shall come unto me? 
Behold, I will bring a fear upon thee, saith the Lord G
669,nderstanding in them. 
O that they were wise, that they understood this, that they would consider their latter end! 
How should one chase a thousand, and two put ten thousand to flight, except their Rock had sold them, and the LORD had shut them up? 
For their rock is not as our Rock, even our enemies themselves being judges. 
For their vine is of the vine of Sodom, and of the fields of Gomorrah: their grapes are grapes of gall, their clusters are bitter: 
Their wine is the poison of dragons, and the cruel venom of asps. 
Is not this laid up in store with me, and sealed up among my treasures? 
To me belongeth vengeance and recompence; their foot shall slide in 
583,ny that were possessed with devils: and he cast out the spirits with his word, and healed all that were sick: 
That it might be fulfilled which was spoken by Esaias the prophet, saying, Himself took our infirmities, and bare our sicknesses. 
Now when Jesus saw great multitudes about him, he gave commandment to depart unto the other side. 
And a certain scribe came, and said unto him, Master, I will follow thee whithersoever thou goest. 
And Jesus saith unto him, The foxes have holes, and the birds of the air have nests; but the Son of man hath not where to lay his head. 
And a
738,vid sent out ten young men, and David said unto the young men, Get you up to Carmel, and go to Nabal, and greet him in my name: 
And thus shall ye say to him that liveth in prosperity, Peace be both to thee, and peace be to thine house, and peace be unto all that thou hast. 
And now I have heard that thou hast shearers: now thy shepherds which were with us, we hurt them not, neither was there ought missing unto them, all the while they were in Carmel. 
Ask thy young men, and they will shew thee. Wherefore let the young men find favour in thine eyes: for we come in a good day: give, I pray thee, whatsoever cometh to thine hand unto thy servants, and to thy son David. 
And when David's young men came, they spake to Nabal according
774,on me, the works that I do shall he do also; and greater works than these shall he do; because I go unto my Father. 
And whatsoever ye shall ask in my name, that will I do, that the Father may be glorified in the Son. 
If ye shall ask any thing in my name, I will do it. 
If ye love me, keep my commandments. 
And I will pray the Father, and he shall give you another Comforter, that he may abide with you for ever; 
Even the Spirit of truth; whom the world cannot receive, because it seeth him not, neither knoweth him: but ye know him; for he dwelleth with you, and shall be in you. 
I will not leave you comfortless: I will come to you. 
Yet a little while, and the world seeth me no more; but ye see me: because I live, ye shall live also. 
At that day ye shall know tha
763,er land; there is none to raise her up. 
For thus saith the Lord GOD; The city that went out by a thousand shall leave an hundred, and that which went forth by an hundred shall leave ten, to the house of Israel. 
For thus saith the LORD unto the house of Israel, Seek ye me, and ye shall live: 
But seek not Bethel, nor enter into Gilgal, and pass not to Beersheba: for Gilgal shall surely go into captivity, and Bethel shall come to nought. 
Seek the LORD, and ye shall live; lest he break out like fire in the house of Joseph, and devour it, and there be none to quench it in Bethel. 
Ye who turn judgment to wormwood, and leave off righteousness in the earth, 
Seek him that maketh the seven stars and Orion, and turneth the shadow of death into the morning, a
745,d deliver me out of great waters, from the hand of strange children; 
Whose mouth speaketh vanity, and their right hand is a right hand of falsehood. 
I will sing a new song unto thee, O God: upon a psaltery and an instrument of ten strings will I sing praises unto thee. 
It is he that giveth salvation unto kings: who delivereth David his servant from the hurtful sword. 
Rid me, and deliver me from the hand of strange children, whose mouth speaketh vanity, and their right hand is a right hand of falsehood: 
That our sons may be as plants grown up in their youth; that our daughters may be as corner stones, polished after the similitude of a palace: 
That our garners may be full, affording all manner of store: that our sheep may bring fo
754,ll not hearken unto thy words in all that thou commandest him, he shall be put to death: only be strong and of a good courage. 
And Joshua the son of Nun sent out of Shittim two men to spy secretly, saying, Go view the land, even Jericho. And they went, and came into an harlot's house, named Rahab, and lodged there. 
And it was told the king of Jericho, saying, Behold, there came men in hither to night of the children of Israel to search out the country. 
And the king of Jericho sent unto Rahab, saying, Bring forth the men that are come to thee, which are entered into thine house: for they be come to search out all the country. 
And the woman took the two men, and hid them, and said thus, There came men unto me, but I wist not whence they were:
573,racious, slow to anger, and plenteous in mercy. 
He will not always chide: neither will he keep his anger for ever. 
He hath not dealt with us after our sins; nor rewarded us according to our iniquities. 
For as the heaven is high above the earth, so great is his mercy toward them that fear him. 
As far as the east is from the west, so far hath he removed our transgressions from us. 
Like as a father pitieth his children, so the LORD pitieth them that fear him. 
For he knoweth our frame; he remembereth that we are dust. 
As for man, his days are as grass: as a flower
700, so, Lord; for I have never eaten any thing that is common or unclean. 
And the voice spake unto him again the second time, What God hath cleansed, that call not thou common. 
This was done thrice: and the vessel was received up again into heaven. 
Now while Peter doubted in himself what this vision which he had seen should mean, behold, the men which were sent from Cornelius had made enquiry for Simon's house, and stood before the gate, 
And called, and asked whether Simon, which was surnamed Peter, were lodged there. 
While Peter thought on the vision, the Spirit said unto him, Behold, three men seek thee. 
Arise therefore, and get thee down, and go with them, doubting nothing: for I have 
658,re broken. 
For the LORD of hosts, that planted thee, hath pronounced evil against thee, for the evil of the house of Israel and of the house of Judah, which they have done against themselves to provoke me to anger in offering incense unto Baal. 
And the LORD hath given me knowledge of it, and I know it: then thou shewedst me their doings. 
But I was like a lamb or an ox that is brought to the slaughter; and I knew not that they had devised devices against me, saying, Let us destroy the tree with the fruit thereof, and let us cut him off from the land of the living, that his name may be no more remembered. 
But, O LORD of hosts, that judgest righteou
778,esence of the witnesses that subscribed the book of the purchase, before all the Jews that sat in the court of the prison. 
And I charged Baruch before them, saying, 
Thus saith the LORD of hosts, the God of Israel; Take these evidences, this evidence of the purchase, both which is sealed, and this evidence which is open; and put them in an earthen vessel, that they may continue many days. 
For thus saith the LORD of hosts, the God of Israel; Houses and fields and vineyards shall be possessed again in this land. 
Now when I had delivered the evidence of the purchase unto Baruch the son of Neriah, I prayed unto the LORD, saying, 
Ah Lord GOD! behold, thou hast made the heaven and the earth by thy great power and stretched out arm, and there is nothing too hard for thee
787,of the tribe of the children of Benjamin came up according to their families: and the coast of their lot came forth between the children of Judah and the children of Joseph. 
And their border on the north side was from Jordan; and the border went up to the side of Jericho on the north side, and went up through the mountains westward; and the goings out thereof were at the wilderness of Bethaven. 
And the border went over from thence toward Luz, to the side of Luz, which is Bethel, southward; and the border descended to Atarothadar, near the hill that lieth on the south side of the nether Bethhoron. 
And the border was drawn thence, and compassed the corner of the sea southward, from the hill that lieth before Bethhoron southward; and the goings out thereof were at Kirjathbaal,
671,like men, be strong. 
Let all your things be done with charity. 
I beseech you, brethren, (ye know the house of Stephanas, that it is the firstfruits of Achaia, and that they have addicted themselves to the ministry of the saints,) 
That ye submit yourselves unto such, and to every one that helpeth with us, and laboureth. 
I am glad of the coming of Stephanas and Fortunatus and Achaicus: for that which was lacking on your part they have supplied. 
For they have refreshed my spirit and your's: therefore acknowledge ye them that are such. 
The churches of Asia salute you. Aquila and Priscilla salute you much in the Lord, with the church that is in their house. 
All
662,uld die with thee, I will not deny thee in any wise. Likewise also said they all. 
And they came to a place which was named Gethsemane: and he saith to his disciples, Sit ye here, while I shall pray. 
And he taketh with him Peter and James and John, and began to be sore amazed, and to be very heavy; 
And saith unto them, My soul is exceeding sorrowful unto death: tarry ye here, and watch. 
And he went forward a little, and fell on the ground, and prayed that, if it were possible, the hour might pass from him. 
And he said, Abba, Father, all things are possible unto thee; take away this cup from me: nevertheless not what I will, but what thou wilt. 
And h
727,ts, and stablish you in every good word and work. 
Finally, brethren, pray for us, that the word of the Lord may have free course, and be glorified, even as it is with you: 
And that we may be delivered from unreasonable and wicked men: for all men have not faith. 
But the Lord is faithful, who shall stablish you, and keep you from evil. 
And we have confidence in the Lord touching you, that ye both do and will do the things which we command you. 
And the Lord direct your hearts into the love of God, and into the patient waiting for Christ. 
Now we command you, brethren, in the name of our Lord Jesus Christ, that ye withdraw yourselves from every brother that walketh disorderly, and not after the tradition which he re
609,that he hath to my hand; 
There is none greater in this house than I; neither hath he kept back any thing from me but thee, because thou art his wife: how then can I do this great wickedness, and sin against God? 
And it came to pass, as she spake to Joseph day by day, that he hearkened not unto her, to lie by her, or to be with her. 
And it came to pass about this time, that Joseph went into the house to do his business; and there was none of the men of the house there within. 
And she caught him by his garment, saying, Lie with me: and he left his garment in her hand, and fled, and got him out. 
And 
809,ess? 
For I speak to you Gentiles, inasmuch as I am the apostle of the Gentiles, I magnify mine office: 
If by any means I may provoke to emulation them which are my flesh, and might save some of them. 
For if the casting away of them be the reconciling of the world, what shall the receiving of them be, but life from the dead? 
For if the firstfruit be holy, the lump is also holy: and if the root be holy, so are the branches. 
And if some of the branches be broken off, and thou, being a wild olive tree, wert graffed in among them, and with them partakest of the root and fatness of the olive tree; 
Boast not against the branches. But if thou boast, thou bearest not the root, but the root thee. 
Thou wilt say then, The branches were broken off, that I might be graffed in. 
Well; because of unbelief t
743,ts and shields in abundance. 
And he set captains of war over the people, and gathered them together to him in the street of the gate of the city, and spake comfortably to them, saying, 
Be strong and courageous, be not afraid nor dismayed for the king of Assyria, nor for all the multitude that is with him: for there be more with us than with him: 
With him is an arm of flesh; but with us is the LORD our God to help us, and to fight our battles. And the people rested themselves upon the words of Hezekiah king of Judah. 
After this did Sennacherib king of Assyria send his servants to Jerusalem, (but he himself laid siege against Lachish, and all his power with him,) unto Hezekiah king of Judah, and unto all Judah that were at Jerusale
584, house, before the priest go into it to see the plague, that all that is in the house be not made unclean: and afterward the priest shall go in to see the house: 
And he shall look on the plague, and, behold, if the plague be in the walls of the house with hollow strakes, greenish or reddish, which in sight are lower than the wall; 
Then the priest shall go out of the house to the door of the house, and shut up the house seven days: 
And the priest shall come again the seventh day, and shall look: and, behold, if the plague be spread in the walls of the house; 
Then the priest 
691,d, saith the LORD, two parts therein shall be cut off and die; but the third shall be left therein. 
And I will bring the third part through the fire, and will refine them as silver is refined, and will try them as gold is tried: they shall call on my name, and I will hear them: I will say, It is my people: and they shall say, The LORD is my God. 
Behold, the day of the LORD cometh, and thy spoil shall be divided in the midst of thee. 
For I will gather all nations against Jerusalem to battle; and the city shall be taken, and the houses rifled, and the women ravished; and half of the city shall go forth into captivity, and the residue of the people shall not be cut off from the city
773, one people, if every male among us be circumcised, as they are circumcised. 
Shall not their cattle and their substance and every beast of their's be our's? only let us consent unto them, and they will dwell with us. 
And unto Hamor and unto Shechem his son hearkened all that went out of the gate of his city; and every male was circumcised, all that went out of the gate of his city. 
And it came to pass on the third day, when they were sore, that two of the sons of Jacob, Simeon and Levi, Dinah's brethren, took each man his sword, and came upon the city boldly, and slew all the males. 
And they slew Hamor and Shechem his son with the edge of the sword, and took Dinah out of Shechem's house, and went out. 
The sons of Jacob came upon the slain, and spoiled the ci
676,, shall he that is worthy of death be put to death; but at the mouth of one witness he shall not be put to death. 
The hands of the witnesses shall be first upon him to put him to death, and afterward the hands of all the people. So thou shalt put the evil away from among you. 
If there arise a matter too hard for thee in judgment, between blood and blood, between plea and plea, and between stroke and stroke, being matters of controversy within thy gates: then shalt thou arise, and get thee up into the place which the LORD thy God shall choose; 
And thou shalt come unto the priests the Levites, and unto the judge that shall be in those days, and enquire; and they shal
659,LORD, and let my cry come unto thee. 
Hide not thy face from me in the day when I am in trouble; incline thine ear unto me: in the day when I call answer me speedily. 
For my days are consumed like smoke, and my bones are burned as an hearth. 
My heart is smitten, and withered like grass; so that I forget to eat my bread. 
By reason of the voice of my groaning my bones cleave to my skin. 
I am like a pelican of the wilderness: I am like an owl of the desert. 
I watch, and am as a sparrow alone upon the house top. 
Mine enemies reproach me all the day; and they that are mad against me are sworn against me. 
For I have eaten ashes like bread, and mingle
657, we were in that city abiding certain days. 
And on the sabbath we went out of the city by a river side, where prayer was wont to be made; and we sat down, and spake unto the women which resorted thither. 
And a certain woman named Lydia, a seller of purple, of the city of Thyatira, which worshipped God, heard us: whose heart the Lord opened, that she attended unto the things which were spoken of Paul. 
And when she was baptized, and her household, she besought us, saying, If ye have judged me to be faithful to the Lord, come into my house, and abide there. And she constrained us. 
And it came to pass, as we went to prayer, a certain damsel possesse
763,at he hath done, his wonders, and the judgments of his mouth; 
O ye seed of Israel his servant, ye children of Jacob, his chosen ones. 
He is the LORD our God; his judgments are in all the earth. 
Be ye mindful always of his covenant; the word which he commanded to a thousand generations; 
Even of the covenant which he made with Abraham, and of his oath unto Isaac; 
And hath confirmed the same to Jacob for a law, and to Israel for an everlasting covenant, 
Saying, Unto thee will I give the land of Canaan, the lot of your inheritance; 
When ye were but few, even a few, and strangers in it. 
And when they went from nation to nation, and from one kingdom to another people; 
He suffered no man to do them wrong: yea, he reproved kings for their sakes, 
Sayin
799,llow thou me. 
Then went this saying abroad among the brethren, that that disciple should not die: yet Jesus said not unto him, He shall not die; but, If I will that he tarry till I come, what is that to thee? 
This is the disciple which testifieth of these things, and wrote these things: and we know that his testimony is true. 
And there are also many other things which Jesus did, the which, if they should be written every one, I suppose that even the world itself could not contain the books that should be written. Amen. 
The former treatise have I made, O Theophilus, of all that Jesus began both to do and teach, 
Until the day in which he was taken up, after that he through the Holy Ghost had given commandments unto the apostles whom he had chosen: 
To whom also he shewed himself alive 
775,ngled with oil, an offering made by fire unto the LORD for a sweet savour: and the drink offering thereof shall be of wine, the fourth part of an hin. 
And ye shall eat neither bread, nor parched corn, nor green ears, until the selfsame day that ye have brought an offering unto your God: it shall be a statute for ever throughout your generations in all your dwellings. 
And ye shall count unto you from the morrow after the sabbath, from the day that ye brought the sheaf of the wave offering; seven sabbaths shall be complete: 
Even unto the morrow after the seventh sabbath shall ye number fifty days; and ye shall offer a new meat offering unto the LORD. 
Ye shall bring out of your habitations two wave loaves of two tenth deals; they shall be of fine flour; they shall
635,unto them, Take heed what ye hear: with what measure ye mete, it shall be measured to you: and unto you that hear shall more be given. 
For he that hath, to him shall be given: and he that hath not, from him shall be taken even that which he hath. 
And he said, So is the kingdom of God, as if a man should cast seed into the ground; 
And should sleep, and rise night and day, and the seed should spring and grow up, he knoweth not how. 
For the earth bringeth forth fruit of herself; first the blade, then the ear, after that the full corn in the ear. 
But when the fruit is brought forth, immediately he putteth in the sickle, becaus
561,srael: because the ark of God was taken, and because of her father in law and her husband. 
And she said, The glory is departed from Israel: for the ark of God is taken. 
And the Philistines took the ark of God, and brought it from Ebenezer unto Ashdod. 
When the Philistines took the ark of God, they brought it into the house of Dagon, and set it by Dagon. 
And when they of Ashdod arose early on the morrow, behold, Dagon was fallen upon his face to the earth before the ark of the LORD. And they took Dagon, and set him in his place again. 
And when they ar
814, under my roof: 
Wherefore neither thought I myself worthy to come unto thee: but say in a word, and my servant shall be healed. 
For I also am a man set under authority, having under me soldiers, and I say unto one, Go, and he goeth; and to another, Come, and he cometh; and to my servant, Do this, and he doeth it. 
When Jesus heard these things, he marvelled at him, and turned him about, and said unto the people that followed him, I say unto you, I have not found so great faith, no, not in Israel. 
And they that were sent, returning to the house, found the servant whole that had been sick. 
And it came to pass the day after, that he went into a city called Nain; and many of his disciples went with him, and much people. 
Now when he came nigh to the gate of the city, behold, there was a dead man carried
835,to the light, and I shall behold his righteousness. 
Then she that is mine enemy shall see it, and shame shall cover her which said unto me, Where is the LORD thy God? mine eyes shall behold her: now shall she be trodden down as the mire of the streets. 
In the day that thy walls are to be built, in that day shall the decree be far removed. 
In that day also he shall come even to thee from Assyria, and from the fortified cities, and from the fortress even to the river, and from sea to sea, and from mountain to mountain. 
Notwithstanding the land shall be desolate because of them that dwell therein, for the fruit of their doings. 
Feed thy people with thy rod, the flock of thine heritage, which dwell solitarily in the wood, in the midst of Carmel: let them feed in Bashan and Gilead, as in the days of old. 
According to the d
689,f shewbread, for every table; and likewise silver for the tables of silver: 
Also pure gold for the fleshhooks, and the bowls, and the cups: and for the golden basons he gave gold by weight for every bason; and likewise silver by weight for every bason of silver: 
And for the altar of incense refined gold by weight; and gold for the pattern of the chariot of the cherubims, that spread out their wings, and covered the ark of the covenant of the LORD. 
All this, said David, the LORD made me understand in writing by his hand upon me, even all the works of this pattern. 
And David said to Solomon his son, Be strong and of good courage, and do it: fear not, nor be dismayed: for the LOR
778, And the evening and the morning were the sixth day. 
Thus the heavens and the earth were finished, and all the host of them. 
And on the seventh day God ended his work which he had made; and he rested on the seventh day from all his work which he had made. 
And God blessed the seventh day, and sanctified it: because that in it he had rested from all his work which God created and made. 
These are the generations of the heavens and of the earth when they were created, in the day that the LORD God made the earth and the heavens, 
And every plant of the field before it was in the earth, and every herb of the field before it grew: for the LORD God had not caused it to rain upon the earth, and there was not a man to till the ground. 
But there went up a mist from the eart
668,e upright. 
Help, LORD; for the godly man ceaseth; for the faithful fail from among the children of men. 
They speak vanity every one with his neighbour: with flattering lips and with a double heart do they speak. 
The LORD shall cut off all flattering lips, and the tongue that speaketh proud things: 
Who have said, With our tongue will we prevail; our lips are our own: who is lord over us? 
For the oppression of the poor, for the sighing of the needy, now will I arise, saith the LORD; I will set him in safety from him that puffeth at him. 
The words of the LORD are pure words: as silver tried in a furnace of earth, purified seven times. 
Thou shalt keep them,
672,f the LORD our God, let us send abroad unto our brethren every where, that are left in all the land of Israel, and with them also to the priests and Levites which are in their cities and suburbs, that they may gather themselves unto us: 
And let us bring again the ark of our God to us: for we enquired not at it in the days of Saul. 
And all the congregation said that they would do so: for the thing was right in the eyes of all the people. 
So David gathered all Israel together, from Shihor of Egypt even unto the entering of Hemath, to bring the ark of God from Kirjathjearim. 
And David went up, and all Israel, to Baalah, that is, to Kirjathjearim, which belonged t
714, my voice, then I will repent of the good, wherewith I said I would benefit them. 
Now therefore go to, speak to the men of Judah, and to the inhabitants of Jerusalem, saying, Thus saith the LORD; Behold, I frame evil against you, and devise a device against you: return ye now every one from his evil way, and make your ways and your doings good. 
And they said, There is no hope: but we will walk after our own devices, and we will every one do the imagination of his evil heart. 
Therefore thus saith the LORD; Ask ye now among the heathen, who hath heard such things: the virgin of Israel hath done a very horrible thing. 
Will a man leave the snow of Lebanon which cometh from the rock of the field? or shall 
677,ses and Elias: 
Who appeared in glory, and spake of his decease which he should accomplish at Jerusalem. 
But Peter and they that were with him were heavy with sleep: and when they were awake, they saw his glory, and the two men that stood with him. 
And it came to pass, as they departed from him, Peter said unto Jesus, Master, it is good for us to be here: and let us make three tabernacles; one for thee, and one for Moses, and one for Elias: not knowing what he said. 
While he thus spake, there came a cloud, and overshadowed them: and they feared as they entered into the cloud. 
And there came a voice out of the cloud, saying, This is my beloved Son: hear him. 
And wh
573,ou sayest unto me I will do. 
And she went down unto the floor, and did according to all that her mother in law bade her. 
And when Boaz had eaten and drunk, and his heart was merry, he went to lie down at the end of the heap of corn: and she came softly, and uncovered his feet, and laid her down. 
And it came to pass at midnight, that the man was afraid, and turned himself: and, behold, a woman lay at his feet. 
And he said, Who art thou? And she answered, I am Ruth thine handmaid: spread therefore thy skirt over thine handmaid; for thou art a near kinsman. 
And he 
767,shall eat and worship: all they that go down to the dust shall bow before him: and none can keep alive his own soul. 
A seed shall serve him; it shall be accounted to the Lord for a generation. 
They shall come, and shall declare his righteousness unto a people that shall be born, that he hath done this. 
The LORD is my shepherd; I shall not want. 
He maketh me to lie down in green pastures: he leadeth me beside the still waters. 
He restoreth my soul: he leadeth me in the paths of righteousness for his name's sake. 
Yea, though I walk through the valley of the shadow of death, I will fear no evil: for thou art with me; thy rod and thy staff they comfort me. 
Thou preparest a table before me in the presence of mine enemies: thou anointest my head with oil; 
700, son, and said, Is this your younger brother, of whom ye spake unto me? And he said, God be gracious unto thee, my son. 
And Joseph made haste; for his bowels did yearn upon his brother: and he sought where to weep; and he entered into his chamber, and wept there. 
And he washed his face, and went out, and refrained himself, and said, Set on bread. 
And they set on for him by himself, and for them by themselves, and for the Egyptians, which did eat with him, by themselves: because the Egyptians might not eat bread with the Hebrews; for that is an abomination unto the Egyptians. 
And they sat before him, the firstborn according to his birthright, and the youngest according to his youth: and t
708,people came out by hundreds and by thousands. 
And the king commanded Joab and Abishai and Ittai, saying, Deal gently for my sake with the young man, even with Absalom. And all the people heard when the king gave all the captains charge concerning Absalom. 
So the people went out into the field against Israel: and the battle was in the wood of Ephraim; 
Where the people of Israel were slain before the servants of David, and there was there a great slaughter that day of twenty thousand men. 
For the battle was there scattered over the face of all the country: and the wood devoured more people that day than the sword devoured. 
And Absalom met the servants of David. And Absalom rode upon a mule, and t
672,being innocent? or where were the righteous cut off? 
Even as I have seen, they that plow iniquity, and sow wickedness, reap the same. 
By the blast of God they perish, and by the breath of his nostrils are they consumed. 
The roaring of the lion, and the voice of the fierce lion, and the teeth of the young lions, are broken. 
The old lion perisheth for lack of prey, and the stout lion's whelps are scattered abroad. 
Now a thing was secretly brought to me, and mine ear received a little thereof. 
In thoughts from the visions of the night, when deep sleep falleth on men, 
Fear came upon me, and trembling, which made all my bones to shake. 
Then a spirit passed befo
686,ing's house, into the scribe's chamber: and, lo, all the princes sat there, even Elishama the scribe, and Delaiah the son of Shemaiah, and Elnathan the son of Achbor, and Gemariah the son of Shaphan, and Zedekiah the son of Hananiah, and all the princes. 
Then Michaiah declared unto them all the words that he had heard, when Baruch read the book in the ears of the people. 
Therefore all the princes sent Jehudi the son of Nethaniah, the son of Shelemiah, the son of Cushi, unto Baruch, saying, Take in thine hand the roll wherein thou hast read in the ears of the people, and come. So Baruch the son of Neriah took the roll in his hand, and came unto them. 
And they said unto him, S
775,and upon the great toe of his right foot: 
And the priest shall take some of the log of oil, and pour it into the palm of his own left hand: 
And the priest shall dip his right finger in the oil that is in his left hand, and shall sprinkle of the oil with his finger seven times before the LORD: 
And of the rest of the oil that is in his hand shall the priest put upon the tip of the right ear of him that is to be cleansed, and upon the thumb of his right hand, and upon the great toe of his right foot, upon the blood of the trespass offering: 
And the remnant of the oil that is in the priest's hand he shall pour upon the head of him that is to be cleansed: and the priest shall make an atonement for him before the LORD. 
And the priest shall offer the sin offering, an
610,r trouble, and he delivered them out of their distresses. 
And he led them forth by the right way, that they might go to a city of habitation. 
Oh that men would praise the LORD for his goodness, and for his wonderful works to the children of men! 
For he satisfieth the longing soul, and filleth the hungry soul with goodness. 
Such as sit in darkness and in the shadow of death, being bound in affliction and iron; 
Because they rebelled against the words of God, and contemned the counsel of the most High: 
Therefore he brought down their heart with labour; they fell down, and there was none to help. 
The
821,n leaf shall chase them; and they shall flee, as fleeing from a sword; and they shall fall when none pursueth. 
And they shall fall one upon another, as it were before a sword, when none pursueth: and ye shall have no power to stand before your enemies. 
And ye shall perish among the heathen, and the land of your enemies shall eat you up. 
And they that are left of you shall pine away in their iniquity in your enemies' lands; and also in the iniquities of their fathers shall they pine away with them. 
If they shall confess their iniquity, and the iniquity of their fathers, with their trespass which they trespassed against me, and that also they have walked contrary unto me; 
And that I also have walked contrary unto them, and have brought them into the land of their enemies; if then their uncircumcised hearts 
613, Ishmael, Nethaneel, Jozabad, and Elasah. 
Also of the Levites; Jozabad, and Shimei, and Kelaiah, (the same is Kelita,) Pethahiah, Judah, and Eliezer. 
Of the singers also; Eliashib: and of the porters; Shallum, and Telem, and Uri. 
Moreover of Israel: of the sons of Parosh; Ramiah, and Jeziah, and Malchiah, and Miamin, and Eleazar, and Malchijah, and Benaiah. 
And of the sons of Elam; Mattaniah, Zechariah, and Jehiel, and Abdi, and Jeremoth, and Eliah. 
And of the sons of Zattu; Elioenai, Eliashib, Mattaniah, and Jeremoth, and Zabad, and Aziza. 
Of the sons also of Bebai; Jehohanan, Hananiah, Zabbai, and 
567,d am not I grieved with those that rise up against thee? 
I hate them with perfect hatred: I count them mine enemies. 
Search me, O God, and know my heart: try me, and know my thoughts: 
And see if there be any wicked way in me, and lead me in the way everlasting. 
Deliver me, O LORD, from the evil man: preserve me from the violent man; 
Which imagine mischiefs in their heart; continually are they gathered together for war. 
They have sharpened their tongues like a serpent; adders' poison is under their lips. Selah. 
Keep me, O LORD, from the hands of the wicke
665,g them, and there was no counsellor, that, when I asked of them, could answer a word. 
Behold, they are all vanity; their works are nothing: their molten images are wind and confusion. 
Behold my servant, whom I uphold; mine elect, in whom my soul delighteth; I have put my spirit upon him: he shall bring forth judgment to the Gentiles. 
He shall not cry, nor lift up, nor cause his voice to be heard in the street. 
A bruised reed shall he not break, and the smoking flax shall he not quench: he shall bring forth judgment unto truth. 
He shall not fail nor be discouraged, till he have set judgment in the earth: and the isles shall wait for his law. 
Thus saith
758, disciple; but we are Moses' disciples. 
We know that God spake unto Moses: as for this fellow, we know not from whence he is. 
The man answered and said unto them, Why herein is a marvellous thing, that ye know not from whence he is, and yet he hath opened mine eyes. 
Now we know that God heareth not sinners: but if any man be a worshipper of God, and doeth his will, him he heareth. 
Since the world began was it not heard that any man opened the eyes of one that was born blind. 
If this man were not of God, he could do nothing. 
They answered and said unto him, Thou wast altogether born in sins, and dost thou teach us? And they cast him out. 
Jesus heard that they had cast him out; and when he had found him, he said unto him, Dost thou believe on 
599,d the ointment of his right hand, which bewrayeth itself. 
Iron sharpeneth iron; so a man sharpeneth the countenance of his friend. 
Whoso keepeth the fig tree shall eat the fruit thereof: so he that waiteth on his master shall be honoured. 
As in water face answereth to face, so the heart of man to man. 
Hell and destruction are never full; so the eyes of man are never satisfied. 
As the fining pot for silver, and the furnace for gold; so is a man to his praise. 
Though thou shouldest bray a fool in a mortar among wheat with a pestle, yet will not his foolishness depart from him. 
Be thou di
663,he goats before the flocks. 
For, lo, I will raise and cause to come up against Babylon an assembly of great nations from the north country: and they shall set themselves in array against her; from thence she shall be taken: their arrows shall be as of a mighty expert man; none shall return in vain. 
And Chaldea shall be a spoil: all that spoil her shall be satisfied, saith the LORD. 
Because ye were glad, because ye rejoiced, O ye destroyers of mine heritage, because ye are grown fat as the heifer at grass, and bellow as bulls; 
Your mother shall be sore confounded; she that bare you shall be ashamed: behold, the hindermost of the nations shall be a wild
586, teachest another, teachest thou not thyself? thou that preachest a man should not steal, dost thou steal? 
Thou that sayest a man should not commit adultery, dost thou commit adultery? thou that abhorrest idols, dost thou commit sacrilege? 
Thou that makest thy boast of the law, through breaking the law dishonourest thou God? 
For the name of God is blasphemed among the Gentiles through you, as it is written. 
For circumcision verily profiteth, if thou keep the law: but if thou be a breaker of the law, thy circumcision is made uncircumcision. 
Therefore if the uncircumcision kee
616, 
And his wife Jehudijah bare Jered the father of Gedor, and Heber the father of Socho, and Jekuthiel the father of Zanoah. And these are the sons of Bithiah the daughter of Pharaoh, which Mered took. 
And the sons of his wife Hodiah the sister of Naham, the father of Keilah the Garmite, and Eshtemoa the Maachathite. 
And the sons of Shimon were, Amnon, and Rinnah, Benhanan, and Tilon. And the sons of Ishi were, Zoheth, and Benzoheth. 
The sons of Shelah the son of Judah were, Er the father of Lecah, and Laadah the father of Mareshah, and the families of the house of them that wrought fine linen, of the house
629, of God. 
Then Solomon assembled the elders of Israel, and all the heads of the tribes, the chief of the fathers of the children of Israel, unto Jerusalem, to bring up the ark of the covenant of the LORD out of the city of David, which is Zion. 
Wherefore all the men of Israel assembled themselves unto the king in the feast which was in the seventh month. 
And all the elders of Israel came; and the Levites took up the ark. 
And they brought up the ark, and the tabernacle of the congregation, and all the holy vessels that were in the tabernacle, these did the priests and the Levites bring up. 
Also king Solomon, and all th
765,ere is nothing better for a man, than that he should eat and drink, and that he should make his soul enjoy good in his labour. This also I saw, that it was from the hand of God. 
For who can eat, or who else can hasten hereunto, more than I? 
For God giveth to a man that is good in his sight wisdom, and knowledge, and joy: but to the sinner he giveth travail, to gather and to heap up, that he may give to him that is good before God. This also is vanity and vexation of spirit. 
To every thing there is a season, and a time to every purpose under the heaven: 
A time to be born, and a time to die; a time to plant, and a time to pluck up that which is planted; 
A time to kill, and a time to heal; a time to break down, and a time to build up; 
A time to weep, a
574,you that ye should not obey the truth? 
This persuasion cometh not of him that calleth you. 
A little leaven leaveneth the whole lump. 
I have confidence in you through the Lord, that ye will be none otherwise minded: but he that troubleth you shall bear his judgment, whosoever he be. 
And I, brethren, if I yet preach circumcision, why do I yet suffer persecution? then is the offence of the cross ceased. 
I would they were even cut off which trouble you. 
For, brethren, ye have been called unto liberty; only use not liberty for an occasion to the flesh, but by love se
666,l he deliver us from the Assyrian, when he cometh into our land, and when he treadeth within our borders. 
And the remnant of Jacob shall be in the midst of many people as a dew from the LORD, as the showers upon the grass, that tarrieth not for man, nor waiteth for the sons of men. 
And the remnant of Jacob shall be among the Gentiles in the midst of many people as a lion among the beasts of the forest, as a young lion among the flocks of sheep: who, if he go through, both treadeth down, and teareth in pieces, and none can deliver. 
Thine hand shall be lifted up upon thine adversaries, and all thine enemies shall be cut off. 
And it shall come to pass in th
626,the Father in my name, he will give it you. 
Hitherto have ye asked nothing in my name: ask, and ye shall receive, that your joy may be full. 
These things have I spoken unto you in proverbs: but the time cometh, when I shall no more speak unto you in proverbs, but I shall shew you plainly of the Father. 
At that day ye shall ask in my name: and I say not unto you, that I will pray the Father for you: 
For the Father himself loveth you, because ye have loved me, and have believed that I came out from God. 
I came forth from the Father, and am come into the world: again, I leave the world, and go to the Father. 
His dis
793,em one prisoner, whomsoever they desired. 
And there was one named Barabbas, which lay bound with them that had made insurrection with him, who had committed murder in the insurrection. 
And the multitude crying aloud began to desire him to do as he had ever done unto them. 
But Pilate answered them, saying, Will ye that I release unto you the King of the Jews? 
For he knew that the chief priests had delivered him for envy. 
But the chief priests moved the people, that he should rather release Barabbas unto them. 
And Pilate answered and said again unto them, What will ye then that I shall do unto him whom ye call the King of the Jews? 
And they cried out again, Crucify him. 
Then Pilate said unto them, Why, what evil hath he done? And they cried out the more exceedingly, Crucify hi
631,hich smote him: and he said, Because the gods of the kings of Syria help them, therefore will I sacrifice to them, that they may help me. But they were the ruin of him, and of all Israel. 
And Ahaz gathered together the vessels of the house of God, and cut in pieces the vessels of the house of God, and shut up the doors of the house of the LORD, and he made him altars in every corner of Jerusalem. 
And in every several city of Judah he made high places to burn incense unto other gods, and provoked to anger the LORD God of his fathers. 
Now the rest of his acts and of all his ways, first and last, behold, they are written in
563,ash the Ammonite answered them, On this condition will I make a covenant with you, that I may thrust out all your right eyes, and lay it for a reproach upon all Israel. 
And the elders of Jabesh said unto him, Give us seven days' respite, that we may send messengers unto all the coasts of Israel: and then, if there be no man to save us, we will come out to thee. 
Then came the messengers to Gibeah of Saul, and told the tidings in the ears of the people: and all the people lifted up their voices, and wept. 
And, behold, Saul came after the herd out of the fi
724,h the sceptre from Ashkelon, and I will turn mine hand against Ekron: and the remnant of the Philistines shall perish, saith the Lord GOD. 
Thus saith the LORD; For three transgressions of Tyrus, and for four, I will not turn away the punishment thereof; because they delivered up the whole captivity to Edom, and remembered not the brotherly covenant: 
But I will send a fire on the wall of Tyrus, which shall devour the palaces thereof. 
Thus saith the LORD; For three transgressions of Edom, and for four, I will not turn away the punishment thereof; because he did pursue his brother with the sword, and did cast off all pity, and his anger did tear perpetually, and he kept his wrath for ever: 
But I will send a fire u
797,razor upon mine head; for I have been a Nazarite unto God from my mother's womb: if I be shaven, then my strength will go from me, and I shall become weak, and be like any other man. 
And when Delilah saw that he had told her all his heart, she sent and called for the lords of the Philistines, saying, Come up this once, for he hath shewed me all his heart. Then the lords of the Philistines came up unto her, and brought money in their hand. 
And she made him sleep upon her knees; and she called for a man, and she caused him to shave off the seven locks of his head; and she began to afflict him, and his strength went from him. 
And she said, The Philistines be upon thee, Samson. And he awoke out of his sleep, and said, I will go out as at other times before, and shake myself. And he wist 
650,down riches, and he shall vomit them up again: God shall cast them out of his belly. 
He shall suck the poison of asps: the viper's tongue shall slay him. 
He shall not see the rivers, the floods, the brooks of honey and butter. 
That which he laboured for shall he restore, and shall not swallow it down: according to his substance shall the restitution be, and he shall not rejoice therein. 
Because he hath oppressed and hath forsaken the poor; because he hath violently taken away an house which he builded not; 
Surely he shall not feel quietness in his belly, he shall not save of that which he desired. 
There shall none of his meat be left; t
607,all back his words: but will arise against the house of the evildoers, and against the help of them that work iniquity. 
Now the Egyptians are men, and not God; and their horses flesh, and not spirit. When the LORD shall stretch out his hand, both he that helpeth shall fall, and he that is holpen shall fall down, and they all shall fail together. 
For thus hath the LORD spoken unto me, Like as the lion and the young lion roaring on his prey, when a multitude of shepherds is called forth against him, he will not be afraid of their voice, nor abase himself for the noise of them: so shall the LORD of ho
629, the land, whither they go to be among them, and will forsake me, and break my covenant which I have made with them. 
Then my anger shall be kindled against them in that day, and I will forsake them, and I will hide my face from them, and they shall be devoured, and many evils and troubles shall befall them; so that they will say in that day, Are not these evils come upon us, because our God is not among us? 
And I will surely hide my face in that day for all the evils which they shall have wrought, in that they are turned unto other gods. 
Now therefore write ye this song for you, and teach it the children of Israel: put
810, therein. 
Then shall the trees of the wood sing out at the presence of the LORD, because he cometh to judge the earth. 
O give thanks unto the LORD; for he is good; for his mercy endureth for ever. 
And say ye, Save us, O God of our salvation, and gather us together, and deliver us from the heathen, that we may give thanks to thy holy name, and glory in thy praise. 
Blessed be the LORD God of Israel for ever and ever. And all the people said, Amen, and praised the LORD. 
So he left there before the ark of the covenant of the LORD Asaph and his brethren, to minister before the ark continually, as every day's work required: 
And Obededom with their brethren, threescore and eight; Obededom also the son of Jeduthun and Hosah to be porters: 
And Zadok the priest, and his brethren the priests, before the
669,sh for want of clothing, or any poor without covering; 
If his loins have not blessed me, and if he were not warmed with the fleece of my sheep; 
If I have lifted up my hand against the fatherless, when I saw my help in the gate: 
Then let mine arm fall from my shoulder blade, and mine arm be broken from the bone. 
For destruction from God was a terror to me, and by reason of his highness I could not endure. 
If I have made gold my hope, or have said to the fine gold, Thou art my confidence; 
If I rejoice because my wealth was great, and because mine hand had gotten much; 
If I beheld the sun when it shined, or the moon walking in brightness; 
And my heart hath
573,red. 
Of the sons of Zebulun after their families: of Sered, the family of the Sardites: of Elon, the family of the Elonites: of Jahleel, the family of the Jahleelites. 
These are the families of the Zebulunites according to those that were numbered of them, threescore thousand and five hundred. 
The sons of Joseph after their families were Manasseh and Ephraim. 
Of the sons of Manasseh: of Machir, the family of the Machirites: and Machir begat Gilead: of Gilead come the family of the Gileadites. 
These are the sons of Gilead: of Jeezer, the family of the Jeezerites:
624,eth no shame. 
I have cut off the nations: their towers are desolate; I made their streets waste, that none passeth by: their cities are destroyed, so that there is no man, that there is none inhabitant. 
I said, Surely thou wilt fear me, thou wilt receive instruction; so their dwelling should not be cut off, howsoever I punished them: but they rose early, and corrupted all their doings. 
Therefore wait ye upon me, saith the LORD, until the day that I rise up to the prey: for my determination is to gather the nations, that I may assemble the kingdoms, to pour upon them mine indignation, even all my fierce anger: for 
639,the Gentiles, until the times of the Gentiles be fulfilled. 
And there shall be signs in the sun, and in the moon, and in the stars; and upon the earth distress of nations, with perplexity; the sea and the waves roaring; 
Men's hearts failing them for fear, and for looking after those things which are coming on the earth: for the powers of heaven shall be shaken. 
And then shall they see the Son of man coming in a cloud with power and great glory. 
And when these things begin to come to pass, then look up, and lift up your heads; for your redemption draweth nigh. 
And he spake to them a parable; Behold the fig tree, and all the tre
656,d he came and bowed himself to king Solomon: and Solomon said unto him, Go to thine house. 
Now the days of David drew nigh that he should die; and he charged Solomon his son, saying, 
I go the way of all the earth: be thou strong therefore, and shew thyself a man; 
And keep the charge of the LORD thy God, to walk in his ways, to keep his statutes, and his commandments, and his judgments, and his testimonies, as it is written in the law of Moses, that thou mayest prosper in all that thou doest, and whithersoever thou turnest thyself: 
That the LORD may continue his word which he spake concerning me, saying, If thy children take heed to their way, t
744, token in every epistle: so I write. 
The grace of our Lord Jesus Christ be with you all. Amen. 
Paul, an apostle of Jesus Christ by the commandment of God our Saviour, and Lord Jesus Christ, which is our hope; 
Unto Timothy, my own son in the faith: Grace, mercy, and peace, from God our Father and Jesus Christ our Lord. 
As I besought thee to abide still at Ephesus, when I went into Macedonia, that thou mightest charge some that they teach no other doctrine, 
Neither give heed to fables and endless genealogies, which minister questions, rather than godly edifying which is in faith: so do. 
Now the end of the commandment is charity out of a pure heart, and of a good conscience, and of faith unfeigned: 
From which some having swerved h
627,aw the calf, and the dancing: and Moses' anger waxed hot, and he cast the tables out of his hands, and brake them beneath the mount. 
And he took the calf which they had made, and burnt it in the fire, and ground it to powder, and strawed it upon the water, and made the children of Israel drink of it. 
And Moses said unto Aaron, What did this people unto thee, that thou hast brought so great a sin upon them? 
And Aaron said, Let not the anger of my lord wax hot: thou knowest the people, that they are set on mischief. 
For they said unto me, Make us gods, which shall go before us: for as for this Moses, the man that brou
646,blood pursue after him, then they shall not deliver the slayer up into his hand; because he smote his neighbour unwittingly, and hated him not beforetime. 
And he shall dwell in that city, until he stand before the congregation for judgment, and until the death of the high priest that shall be in those days: then shall the slayer return, and come unto his own city, and unto his own house, unto the city from whence he fled. 
And they appointed Kedesh in Galilee in mount Naphtali, and Shechem in mount Ephraim, and Kirjatharba, which is Hebron, in the mountain of Judah. 
And on the other side Jordan by Jericho eastward, they assigned Bezer i
751,maid, an Egyptian, whose name was Hagar. 
And Sarai said unto Abram, Behold now, the LORD hath restrained me from bearing: I pray thee, go in unto my maid; it may be that I may obtain children by her. And Abram hearkened to the voice of Sarai. 
And Sarai Abram's wife took Hagar her maid the Egyptian, after Abram had dwelt ten years in the land of Canaan, and gave her to her husband Abram to be his wife. 
And he went in unto Hagar, and she conceived: and when she saw that she had conceived, her mistress was despised in her eyes. 
And Sarai said unto Abram, My wrong be upon thee: I have given my maid into thy bosom; and when she saw that she had conceived, I was despised in her eyes: the LORD judge between me and thee. 
But Abram said unto Sar
787,forted for her children, because they were not. 
Thus saith the LORD; Refrain thy voice from weeping, and thine eyes from tears: for thy work shall be rewarded, saith the LORD; and they shall come again from the land of the enemy. 
And there is hope in thine end, saith the LORD, that thy children shall come again to their own border. 
I have surely heard Ephraim bemoaning himself thus; Thou hast chastised me, and I was chastised, as a bullock unaccustomed to the yoke: turn thou me, and I shall be turned; for thou art the LORD my God. 
Surely after that I was turned, I repented; and after that I was instructed, I smote upon my thigh: I was ashamed, yea, even confounded, because I did bear the reproach of my youth. 
Is Ephraim my dear son? is he a pleasant child? for since I spa
624,ren, by the coming of our Lord Jesus Christ, and by our gathering together unto him, 
That ye be not soon shaken in mind, or be troubled, neither by spirit, nor by word, nor by letter as from us, as that the day of Christ is at hand. 
Let no man deceive you by any means: for that day shall not come, except there come a falling away first, and that man of sin be revealed, the son of perdition; 
Who opposeth and exalteth himself above all that is called God, or that is worshipped; so that he as God sitteth in the temple of God, shewing himself that he is God. 
Remember ye not, that, when I was yet with you, I told you 
745,y chambers, where the priests that approach unto the LORD shall eat the most holy things: there shall they lay the most holy things, and the meat offering, and the sin offering, and the trespass offering; for the place is holy. 
When the priests enter therein, then shall they not go out of the holy place into the utter court, but there they shall lay their garments wherein they minister; for they are holy; and shall put on other garments, and shall approach to those things which are for the people. 
Now when he had made an end of measuring the inner house, he brought me forth toward the gate whose prospect is toward the east, and measured it round about. 
He measured the east side with the measuring reed, five hundred reeds, with the m
741,e LORD said unto me, The backsliding Israel hath justified herself more than treacherous Judah. 
Go and proclaim these words toward the north, and say, Return, thou backsliding Israel, saith the LORD; and I will not cause mine anger to fall upon you: for I am merciful, saith the LORD, and I will not keep anger for ever. 
Only acknowledge thine iniquity, that thou hast transgressed against the LORD thy God, and hast scattered thy ways to the strangers under every green tree, and ye have not obeyed my voice, saith the LORD. 
Turn, O backsliding children, saith the LORD; for I am married unto you: and I will take you one of a city, and two of a family, and I will bring you to Zion: 
And I will give you pastors according to mine heart,
809, commanded the priests the sons of Aaron to offer them on the altar of the LORD. 
So they killed the bullocks, and the priests received the blood, and sprinkled it on the altar: likewise, when they had killed the rams, they sprinkled the blood upon the altar: they killed also the lambs, and they sprinkled the blood upon the altar. 
And they brought forth the he goats for the sin offering before the king and the congregation; and they laid their hands upon them: 
And the priests killed them, and they made reconciliation with their blood upon the altar, to make an atonement for all Israel: for the king commanded that the burnt offering and the sin offering should be made for all Israel. 
And he set the Levites in the house of the LORD with cymbals, with psalteries, and with harps, according to the co
784,eternal life? 
And Jesus said unto him, Why callest thou me good? none is good, save one, that is, God. 
Thou knowest the commandments, Do not commit adultery, Do not kill, Do not steal, Do not bear false witness, Honour thy father and thy mother. 
And he said, All these have I kept from my youth up. 
Now when Jesus heard these things, he said unto him, Yet lackest thou one thing: sell all that thou hast, and distribute unto the poor, and thou shalt have treasure in heaven: and come, follow me. 
And when he heard this, he was very sorrowful: for he was very rich. 
And when Jesus saw that he was very sorrowful, he said, How hardly shall they that have riches enter into the kingdom of God! 
For it is easier for a camel to go through a needle's eye, than for a rich man to ente
589,would set the briers and thorns against me in battle? I would go through them, I would burn them together. 
Or let him take hold of my strength, that he may make peace with me; and he shall make peace with me. 
He shall cause them that come of Jacob to take root: Israel shall blossom and bud, and fill the face of the world with fruit. 
Hath he smitten him, as he smote those that smote him? or is he slain according to the slaughter of them that are slain by him? 
In measure, when it shooteth forth, thou wilt debate with it: he stayeth his rough wind in the day of the east wind. 
By t
612,ld forehead, as the leprosy appeareth in the skin of the flesh; 
He is a leprous man, he is unclean: the priest shall pronounce him utterly unclean; his plague is in his head. 
And the leper in whom the plague is, his clothes shall be rent, and his head bare, and he shall put a covering upon his upper lip, and shall cry, Unclean, unclean. 
All the days wherein the plague shall be in him he shall be defiled; he is unclean: he shall dwell alone; without the camp shall his habitation be. 
The garment also that the plague of leprosy is in, whether it be a woollen garment, or a linen garment; 
Whether it be in
755,ut? therefore they shall be your judges. 
But if I cast out devils by the Spirit of God, then the kingdom of God is come unto you. 
Or else how can one enter into a strong man's house, and spoil his goods, except he first bind the strong man? and then he will spoil his house. 
He that is not with me is against me; and he that gathereth not with me scattereth abroad. 
Wherefore I say unto you, All manner of sin and blasphemy shall be forgiven unto men: but the blasphemy against the Holy Ghost shall not be forgiven unto men. 
And whosoever speaketh a word against the Son of man, it shall be forgiven him: but whosoever speaketh against the Holy Ghost, it shall not be forgiven him, neither in this world, neither in the world to come. 
Either make th
785, pass over, and offend, imputing this his power unto his god. 
Art thou not from everlasting, O LORD my God, mine Holy One? we shall not die. O LORD, thou hast ordained them for judgment; and, O mighty God, thou hast established them for correction. 
Thou art of purer eyes than to behold evil, and canst not look on iniquity: wherefore lookest thou upon them that deal treacherously, and holdest thy tongue when the wicked devoureth the man that is more righteous than he? 
And makest men as the fishes of the sea, as the creeping things, that have no ruler over them? 
They take up all of them with the angle, they catch them in their net, and gather them in their drag: therefore they rejoice and are glad. 
Therefore they sacrifice unto their net, and burn incense unto their drag;
720,s bent, their horses' hoofs shall be counted like flint, and their wheels like a whirlwind: 
Their roaring shall be like a lion, they shall roar like young lions: yea, they shall roar, and lay hold of the prey, and shall carry it away safe, and none shall deliver it. 
And in that day they shall roar against them like the roaring of the sea: and if one look unto the land, behold darkness and sorrow, and the light is darkened in the heavens thereof. 
In the year that king Uzziah died I saw also the LORD sitting upon a throne, high and lifted up, and his train filled the temple. 
Above it stood the seraphims: each one had six wings; with twain he covered his face, and with twain he covered his feet, and with twain
703,t laboured therein shall he leave it for his portion. This also is vanity and a great evil. 
For what hath man of all his labour, and of the vexation of his heart, wherein he hath laboured under the sun? 
For all his days are sorrows, and his travail grief; yea, his heart taketh not rest in the night. This is also vanity. 
There is nothing better for a man, than that he should eat and drink, and that he should make his soul enjoy good in his labour. This also I saw, that it was from the hand of God. 
For who can eat, or who else can hasten hereunto, more than I? 
For God giveth to a man that is good in his sight wisdom, and knowledge, and joy: but to the sinner he giveth travail, to gather and 
729, blow upon them, and they shall wither, and the whirlwind shall take them away as stubble. 
To whom then will ye liken me, or shall I be equal? saith the Holy One. 
Lift up your eyes on high, and behold who hath created these things, that bringeth out their host by number: he calleth them all by names by the greatness of his might, for that he is strong in power; not one faileth. 
Why sayest thou, O Jacob, and speakest, O Israel, My way is hid from the LORD, and my judgment is passed over from my God? 
Hast thou not known? hast thou not heard, that the everlasting God, the LORD, the Creator of the ends of the earth, fainteth not, neither is weary? there is no searching of his understanding. 
He giveth power to the faint
724,for thy sake. 
Behold, I have created the smith that bloweth the coals in the fire, and that bringeth forth an instrument for his work; and I have created the waster to destroy. 
No weapon that is formed against thee shall prosper; and every tongue that shall rise against thee in judgment thou shalt condemn. This is the heritage of the servants of the LORD, and their righteousness is of me, saith the LORD. 
Ho, every one that thirsteth, come ye to the waters, and he that hath no money; come ye, buy, and eat; yea, come, buy wine and milk without money and without price. 
Wherefore do ye spend money for that which is not bread? and your labour for that which satisfieth not? hearken diligently unto me, and eat ye that
593,the children of Asaph, an hundred forty and eight. 
The porters: the children of Shallum, the children of Ater, the children of Talmon, the children of Akkub, the children of Hatita, the children of Shobai, an hundred thirty and eight. 
The Nethinims: the children of Ziha, the children of Hashupha, the children of Tabbaoth, 
The children of Keros, the children of Sia, the children of Padon, 
The children of Lebana, the children of Hagaba, the children of Shalmai, 
The children of Hanan, the children of Giddel, the children of Gahar, 
The children of Reaiah, the children of Rezin, the ch
747,Lord was exceeding abundant with faith and love which is in Christ Jesus. 
This is a faithful saying, and worthy of all acceptation, that Christ Jesus came into the world to save sinners; of whom I am chief. 
Howbeit for this cause I obtained mercy, that in me first Jesus Christ might shew forth all longsuffering, for a pattern to them which should hereafter believe on him to life everlasting. 
Now unto the King eternal, immortal, invisible, the only wise God, be honour and glory for ever and ever. Amen. 
This charge I commit unto thee, son Timothy, according to the prophecies which went before on thee, that thou by them mightest war a good warfare; 
Holding faith, and a good conscience; which some having put away concerning faith have m
673,dden man of the heart, in that which is not corruptible, even the ornament of a meek and quiet spirit, which is in the sight of God of great price. 
For after this manner in the old time the holy women also, who trusted in God, adorned themselves, being in subjection unto their own husbands: 
Even as Sara obeyed Abraham, calling him lord: whose daughters ye are, as long as ye do well, and are not afraid with any amazement. 
Likewise, ye husbands, dwell with them according to knowledge, giving honour unto the wife, as unto the weaker vessel, and as being heirs together of the grace of life; that your prayers be not hindered. 
Finally, be ye all of one mind, having c
689, 
She may not eat of any thing that cometh of the vine, neither let her drink wine or strong drink, nor eat any unclean thing: all that I commanded her let her observe. 
And Manoah said unto the angel of the LORD, I pray thee, let us detain thee, until we shall have made ready a kid for thee. 
And the angel of the LORD said unto Manoah, Though thou detain me, I will not eat of thy bread: and if thou wilt offer a burnt offering, thou must offer it unto the LORD. For Manoah knew not that he was an angel of the LORD. 
And Manoah said unto the angel of the LORD, What is thy name, that when thy sayings come to pass we may do thee honour? 
And the angel of the LORD said unto him, Why as
650,ngthen, settle you. 
To him be glory and dominion for ever and ever. Amen. 
By Silvanus, a faithful brother unto you, as I suppose, I have written briefly, exhorting, and testifying that this is the true grace of God wherein ye stand. 
The church that is at Babylon, elected together with you, saluteth you; and so doth Marcus my son. 
Greet ye one another with a kiss of charity. Peace be with you all that are in Christ Jesus. Amen. 
Simon Peter, a servant and an apostle of Jesus Christ, to them that have obtained like precious faith with us through the righteousness of God and our Saviour Jesus Christ: 
Grace and peace be multiplied unto you t
774, peace. 
Then Joab came to the king, and said, What hast thou done? behold, Abner came unto thee; why is it that thou hast sent him away, and he is quite gone? 
Thou knowest Abner the son of Ner, that he came to deceive thee, and to know thy going out and thy coming in, and to know all that thou doest. 
And when Joab was come out from David, he sent messengers after Abner, which brought him again from the well of Sirah: but David knew it not. 
And when Abner was returned to Hebron, Joab took him aside in the gate to speak with him quietly, and smote him there under the fifth rib, that he died, for the blood of Asahel his brother. 
And afterward when David heard it, he said, I and my kingdom are guiltless before the LORD for ever from the blood of Abner the son of 
804,th person, a preacher of righteousness, bringing in the flood upon the world of the ungodly; 
And turning the cities of Sodom and Gomorrha into ashes condemned them with an overthrow, making them an ensample unto those that after should live ungodly; 
And delivered just Lot, vexed with the filthy conversation of the wicked: 
(For that righteous man dwelling among them, in seeing and hearing, vexed his righteous soul from day to day with their unlawful deeds;) 
The Lord knoweth how to deliver the godly out of temptations, and to reserve the unjust unto the day of judgment to be punished: 
But chiefly them that walk after the flesh in the lust of uncleanness, and despise government. Presumptuous are they, selfwilled, they are not afraid to speak evil of dignities. 
Whereas angels, which are grea
803,pened; and Jesus straitly charged them, saying, See that no man know it. 
But they, when they were departed, spread abroad his fame in all that country. 
As they went out, behold, they brought to him a dumb man possessed with a devil. 
And when the devil was cast out, the dumb spake: and the multitudes marvelled, saying, It was never so seen in Israel. 
But the Pharisees said, He casteth out devils through the prince of the devils. 
And Jesus went about all the cities and villages, teaching in their synagogues, and preaching the gospel of the kingdom, and healing every sickness and every disease among the people. 
But when he saw the multitudes, he was moved with compassion on them, because they fainted, and were scattered abroad, as sheep having no shepherd. 
Then saith he unto his disciples
577,say, They be thy servant Jacob's; it is a present sent unto my lord Esau: and, behold, also he is behind us. 
And so commanded he the second, and the third, and all that followed the droves, saying, On this manner shall ye speak unto Esau, when ye find him. 
And say ye moreover, Behold, thy servant Jacob is behind us. For he said, I will appease him with the present that goeth before me, and afterward I will see his face; peradventure he will accept of me. 
So went the present over before him: and himself lodged that night in the company. 
And he rose up that night, and 
560,o confusion together that are makers of idols. 
But Israel shall be saved in the LORD with an everlasting salvation: ye shall not be ashamed nor confounded world without end. 
For thus saith the LORD that created the heavens; God himself that formed the earth and made it; he hath established it, he created it not in vain, he formed it to be inhabited: I am the LORD; and there is none else. 
I have not spoken in secret, in a dark place of the earth: I said not unto the seed of Jacob, Seek ye me in vain: I the LORD speak righteousness, I declare things tha
655,u art not able to perform it thyself alone. 
Hearken now unto my voice, I will give thee counsel, and God shall be with thee: Be thou for the people to God-ward, that thou mayest bring the causes unto God: 
And thou shalt teach them ordinances and laws, and shalt shew them the way wherein they must walk, and the work that they must do. 
Moreover thou shalt provide out of all the people able men, such as fear God, men of truth, hating covetousness; and place such over them, to be rulers of thousands, and rulers of hundreds, rulers of fifties, and rulers of tens: 
And let them judge the people at all seasons: and it shall be, that every great matter
608, talked with me went forth, and another angel went out to meet him, 
And said unto him, Run, speak to this young man, saying, Jerusalem shall be inhabited as towns without walls for the multitude of men and cattle therein: 
For I, saith the LORD, will be unto her a wall of fire round about, and will be the glory in the midst of her. 
Ho, ho, come forth, and flee from the land of the north, saith the LORD: for I have spread you abroad as the four winds of the heaven, saith the LORD. 
Deliver thyself, O Zion, that dwellest with the daughter of Babylon. 
For thus saith the LORD of hosts; After the glory 
668,e turned upon me, and I have retained no strength. 
For how can the servant of this my lord talk with this my lord? for as for me, straightway there remained no strength in me, neither is there breath left in me. 
Then there came again and touched me one like the appearance of a man, and he strengthened me, 
And said, O man greatly beloved, fear not: peace be unto thee, be strong, yea, be strong. And when he had spoken unto me, I was strengthened, and said, Let my lord speak; for thou hast strengthened me. 
Then said he, Knowest thou wherefore I come unto thee? and now will I return to fight with the prince of Persia: and when I am gone forth, lo, the prince o
562,
For he breaketh me with a tempest, and multiplieth my wounds without cause. 
He will not suffer me to take my breath, but filleth me with bitterness. 
If I speak of strength, lo, he is strong: and if of judgment, who shall set me a time to plead? 
If I justify myself, mine own mouth shall condemn me: if I say, I am perfect, it shall also prove me perverse. 
Though I were perfect, yet would I not know my soul: I would despise my life. 
This is one thing, therefore I said it, He destroyeth the perfect and the wicked. 
If the scourge slay suddenly, he will l
769,rve with an offering, nor wearied thee with incense. 
Thou hast bought me no sweet cane with money, neither hast thou filled me with the fat of thy sacrifices: but thou hast made me to serve with thy sins, thou hast wearied me with thine iniquities. 
I, even I, am he that blotteth out thy transgressions for mine own sake, and will not remember thy sins. 
Put me in remembrance: let us plead together: declare thou, that thou mayest be justified. 
Thy first father hath sinned, and thy teachers have transgressed against me. 
Therefore I have profaned the princes of the sanctuary, and have given Jacob to the curse, and Israel to reproaches. 
Yet now hear, O Jacob my servant; and Israel, whom I have chosen: 
Thus saith the LORD that made thee, and formed thee from 
777,owed not, nor did him reverence, then was Haman full of wrath. 
And he thought scorn to lay hands on Mordecai alone; for they had shewed him the people of Mordecai: wherefore Haman sought to destroy all the Jews that were throughout the whole kingdom of Ahasuerus, even the people of Mordecai. 
In the first month, that is, the month Nisan, in the twelfth year of king Ahasuerus, they cast Pur, that is, the lot, before Haman from day to day, and from month to month, to the twelfth month, that is, the month Adar. 
And Haman said unto king Ahasuerus, There is a certain people scattered abroad and dispersed among the people in all the provinces of thy kingdom; and their laws are diverse from all people; neither keep they the king's laws: therefore it is not for the king's 
607,s, I remember that which Amalek did to Israel, how he laid wait for him in the way, when he came up from Egypt. 
Now go and smite Amalek, and utterly destroy all that they have, and spare them not; but slay both man and woman, infant and suckling, ox and sheep, camel and ass. 
And Saul gathered the people together, and numbered them in Telaim, two hundred thousand footmen, and ten thousand men of Judah. 
And Saul came to a city of Amalek, and laid wait in the valley. 
And Saul said unto the Kenites, Go, depart, get you down from among the Amalekites, lest I destroy you with them: for ye shewed kindne
748,r the LORD had made them to rejoice over their enemies. 
And they came to Jerusalem with psalteries and harps and trumpets unto the house of the LORD. 
And the fear of God was on all the kingdoms of those countries, when they had heard that the LORD fought against the enemies of Israel. 
So the realm of Jehoshaphat was quiet: for his God gave him rest round about. 
And Jehoshaphat reigned over Judah: he was thirty and five years old when he began to reign, and he reigned twenty and five years in Jerusalem. And his mother's name was Azubah the daughter of Shilhi. 
And he walked in the way of Asa his father, and departed not from it, doing that which was right in the sight of the LORD. 
Howbeit the high places were not taken away: for as ye
776, ashamed, but that with all boldness, as always, so now also Christ shall be magnified in my body, whether it be by life, or by death. 
For to me to live is Christ, and to die is gain. 
But if I live in the flesh, this is the fruit of my labour: yet what I shall choose I wot not. 
For I am in a strait betwixt two, having a desire to depart, and to be with Christ; which is far better: 
Nevertheless to abide in the flesh is more needful for you. 
And having this confidence, I know that I shall abide and continue with you all for your furtherance and joy of faith; 
That your rejoicing may be more abundant in Jesus Christ for me by my coming to you again. 
Only let your conversation be as it becometh the gospel of Christ: that whether I come and see you, or else be abse
579,f locusts shall he run upon them. 
The LORD is exalted; for he dwelleth on high: he hath filled Zion with judgment and righteousness. 
And wisdom and knowledge shall be the stability of thy times, and strength of salvation: the fear of the LORD is his treasure. 
Behold, their valiant ones shall cry without: the ambassadors of peace shall weep bitterly. 
The highways lie waste, the wayfaring man ceaseth: he hath broken the covenant, he hath despised the cities, he regardeth no man. 
The earth mourneth and languisheth: Lebanon is ashamed and hewn down: Sharon is like a wilde
748, unto the sea. 
And, behold, there cometh one of the rulers of the synagogue, Jairus by name; and when he saw him, he fell at his feet, 
And besought him greatly, saying, My little daughter lieth at the point of death: I pray thee, come and lay thy hands on her, that she may be healed; and she shall live. 
And Jesus went with him; and much people followed him, and thronged him. 
And a certain woman, which had an issue of blood twelve years, 
And had suffered many things of many physicians, and had spent all that she had, and was nothing bettered, but rather grew worse, 
When she had heard of Jesus, came in the press behind, and touched his garment. 
For she said, If I may touch but his clothes, I shall be whole. 
And straightway the fount
768,y and justly and unblameably we behaved ourselves among you that believe: 
As ye know how we exhorted and comforted and charged every one of you, as a father doth his children, 
That ye would walk worthy of God, who hath called you unto his kingdom and glory. 
For this cause also thank we God without ceasing, because, when ye received the word of God which ye heard of us, ye received it not as the word of men, but as it is in truth, the word of God, which effectually worketh also in you that believe. 
For ye, brethren, became followers of the churches of God which in Judaea are in Christ Jesus: for ye also have suffered like things of your own countrymen, even as they have of the Jews: 
Who both killed the Lord Jesus, and their own prophets, and have persecu
758,hat was against us, which was contrary to us, and took it out of the way, nailing it to his cross; 
And having spoiled principalities and powers, he made a shew of them openly, triumphing over them in it. 
Let no man therefore judge you in meat, or in drink, or in respect of an holyday, or of the new moon, or of the sabbath days: 
Which are a shadow of things to come; but the body is of Christ. 
Let no man beguile you of your reward in a voluntary humility and worshipping of angels, intruding into those things which he hath not seen, vainly puffed up by his fleshly mind, 
And not holding the Head, from which all the body by joints and bands having nourishment ministered, and knit together, increaseth with the increase of God. 
Wherefore if ye be de
826,not answering again; 
Not purloining, but shewing all good fidelity; that they may adorn the doctrine of God our Saviour in all things. 
For the grace of God that bringeth salvation hath appeared to all men, 
Teaching us that, denying ungodliness and worldly lusts, we should live soberly, righteously, and godly, in this present world; 
Looking for that blessed hope, and the glorious appearing of the great God and our Saviour Jesus Christ; 
Who gave himself for us, that he might redeem us from all iniquity, and purify unto himself a peculiar people, zealous of good works. 
These things speak, and exhort, and rebuke with all authority. Let no man despise thee. 
Put them in mind to be subject to principalities and powers, to obey magistrates, to be ready to every good work, 
To speak evil of no man, to be no brawlers,
709,
As the thief is ashamed when he is found, so is the house of Israel ashamed; they, their kings, their princes, and their priests, and their prophets. 
Saying to a stock, Thou art my father; and to a stone, Thou hast brought me forth: for they have turned their back unto me, and not their face: but in the time of their trouble they will say, Arise, and save us. 
But where are thy gods that thou hast made thee? let them arise, if they can save thee in the time of thy trouble: for according to the number of thy cities are thy gods, O Judah. 
Wherefore will ye plead with me? ye all have transgressed against me, saith the LORD. 
In vain have I smitten your children; they received no correction: your own 
829,or they were too strong for me. 
They prevented me in the day of my calamity: but the LORD was my stay. 
He brought me forth also into a large place; he delivered me, because he delighted in me. 
The LORD rewarded me according to my righteousness; according to the cleanness of my hands hath he recompensed me. 
For I have kept the ways of the LORD, and have not wickedly departed from my God. 
For all his judgments were before me, and I did not put away his statutes from me. 
I was also upright before him, and I kept myself from mine iniquity. 
Therefore hath the LORD recompensed me according to my righteousness, according to the cleanness of my hands in his eyesight. 
With the merciful thou wilt shew thyself merciful; with an upright man thou wilt shew thyself upright; 
With the pure thou wilt shew thyself pure; and wi
613,. 
The desire of a man is his kindness: and a poor man is better than a liar. 
The fear of the LORD tendeth to life: and he that hath it shall abide satisfied; he shall not be visited with evil. 
A slothful man hideth his hand in his bosom, and will not so much as bring it to his mouth again. 
Smite a scorner, and the simple will beware: and reprove one that hath understanding, and he will understand knowledge. 
He that wasteth his father, and chaseth away his mother, is a son that causeth shame, and bringeth reproach. 
Cease, my son, to hear the instruction that causeth to err from the words of knowledge.
621,se of the bruit is come, and a great commotion out of the north country, to make the cities of Judah desolate, and a den of dragons. 
O LORD, I know that the way of man is not in himself: it is not in man that walketh to direct his steps. 
O LORD, correct me, but with judgment; not in thine anger, lest thou bring me to nothing. 
Pour out thy fury upon the heathen that know thee not, and upon the families that call not on thy name: for they have eaten up Jacob, and devoured him, and consumed him, and have made his habitation desolate. 
The word that came to Jeremiah from the LORD saying, 
Hear ye the words of this 
753,nd his strength: seek his face evermore. 
Remember his marvellous works that he hath done; his wonders, and the judgments of his mouth; 
O ye seed of Abraham his servant, ye children of Jacob his chosen. 
He is the LORD our God: his judgments are in all the earth. 
He hath remembered his covenant for ever, the word which he commanded to a thousand generations. 
Which covenant he made with Abraham, and his oath unto Isaac; 
And confirmed the same unto Jacob for a law, and to Israel for an everlasting covenant: 
Saying, Unto thee will I give the land of Canaan, the lot of your inheritance: 
When they were but a few men in number; yea, very few, and strangers in it. 
When they went from one nation to another, from one kingdom to another people; 

683,out among you seven men of honest report, full of the Holy Ghost and wisdom, whom we may appoint over this business. 
But we will give ourselves continually to prayer, and to the ministry of the word. 
And the saying pleased the whole multitude: and they chose Stephen, a man full of faith and of the Holy Ghost, and Philip, and Prochorus, and Nicanor, and Timon, and Parmenas, and Nicolas a proselyte of Antioch: 
Whom they set before the apostles: and when they had prayed, they laid their hands on them. 
And the word of God increased; and the number of the disciples multiplied in Jerusalem greatly; and a great company of the priests were obedient to the faith. 
And Stephen, fu
597,nd hast sinned against thy soul. 
For the stone shall cry out of the wall, and the beam out of the timber shall answer it. 
Woe to him that buildeth a town with blood, and stablisheth a city by iniquity! 
Behold, is it not of the LORD of hosts that the people shall labour in the very fire, and the people shall weary themselves for very vanity? 
For the earth shall be filled with the knowledge of the glory of the LORD, as the waters cover the sea. 
Woe unto him that giveth his neighbour drink, that puttest thy bottle to him, and makest him drunken also, that thou mayest look on their nakedne
766,hraim is smitten, their root is dried up, they shall bear no fruit: yea, though they bring forth, yet will I slay even the beloved fruit of their womb. 
My God will cast them away, because they did not hearken unto him: and they shall be wanderers among the nations. 
Israel is an empty vine, he bringeth forth fruit unto himself: according to the multitude of his fruit he hath increased the altars; according to the goodness of his land they have made goodly images. 
Their heart is divided; now shall they be found faulty: he shall break down their altars, he shall spoil their images. 
For now they shall say, We have no king, because we feared not the LORD; what then should a king do to us? 
They have spoken words, swearing falsely in making a covenant: thus 
742, 
And Rehoboam the son of Solomon reigned in Judah. Rehoboam was forty and one years old when he began to reign, and he reigned seventeen years in Jerusalem, the city which the LORD did choose out of all the tribes of Israel, to put his name there. And his mother's name was Naamah an Ammonitess. 
And Judah did evil in the sight of the LORD, and they provoked him to jealousy with their sins which they had committed, above all that their fathers had done. 
For they also built them high places, and images, and groves, on every high hill, and under every green tree. 
And there were also sodomites in the land: and they did according to all the abominations of the nations which the LORD cast out before the children of Israel. 
And it came
805,God by faith in Christ Jesus. 
For as many of you as have been baptized into Christ have put on Christ. 
There is neither Jew nor Greek, there is neither bond nor free, there is neither male nor female: for ye are all one in Christ Jesus. 
And if ye be Christ's, then are ye Abraham's seed, and heirs according to the promise. 
Now I say, That the heir, as long as he is a child, differeth nothing from a servant, though he be lord of all; 
But is under tutors and governors until the time appointed of the father. 
Even so we, when we were children, were in bondage under the elements of the world: 
But when the fulness of the time was come, God sent forth his Son, made of a woman, made under the law, 
To redeem them that were under the law, that we might receive the adoption of sons. 
And because ye
709,d unto Moses, Speak thou with us, and we will hear: but let not God speak with us, lest we die. 
And Moses said unto the people, Fear not: for God is come to prove you, and that his fear may be before your faces, that ye sin not. 
And the people stood afar off, and Moses drew near unto the thick darkness where God was. 
And the LORD said unto Moses, Thus thou shalt say unto the children of Israel, Ye have seen that I have talked with you from heaven. 
Ye shall not make with me gods of silver, neither shall ye make unto you gods of gold. 
An altar of earth thou shalt make unto me, and shalt sacrifice thereon thy burnt offerings, and thy peace offerings, thy sheep, and thine oxen: in all places where I
668,gain thereof than fine gold. 
She is more precious than rubies: and all the things thou canst desire are not to be compared unto her. 
Length of days is in her right hand; and in her left hand riches and honour. 
Her ways are ways of pleasantness, and all her paths are peace. 
She is a tree of life to them that lay hold upon her: and happy is every one that retaineth her. 
The LORD by wisdom hath founded the earth; by understanding hath he established the heavens. 
By his knowledge the depths are broken up, and the clouds drop down the dew. 
My son, let not them depart from thine eyes: keep sound wisdom and discretion: 
So shall they be life unto thy soul, and
584,neyed from thence toward the south country, and dwelled between Kadesh and Shur, and sojourned in Gerar. 
And Abraham said of Sarah his wife, She is my sister: and Abimelech king of Gerar sent, and took Sarah. 
But God came to Abimelech in a dream by night, and said to him, Behold, thou art but a dead man, for the woman which thou hast taken; for she is a man's wife. 
But Abimelech had not come near her: and he said, LORD, wilt thou slay also a righteous nation? 
Said he not unto me, She is my sister? and she, even she herself said, He is my brother: in the integrity of my hear
609,el answered Saul, and said, I am the seer: go up before me unto the high place; for ye shall eat with me to day, and to morrow I will let thee go, and will tell thee all that is in thine heart. 
And as for thine asses that were lost three days ago, set not thy mind on them; for they are found. And on whom is all the desire of Israel? Is it not on thee, and on all thy father's house? 
And Saul answered and said, Am not I a Benjamite, of the smallest of the tribes of Israel? and my family the least of all the families of the tribe of Benjamin? wherefore then speakest thou so to me? 
And Samuel took Saul 
730,seek me early, but they shall not find me: 
For that they hated knowledge, and did not choose the fear of the LORD: 
They would none of my counsel: they despised all my reproof. 
Therefore shall they eat of the fruit of their own way, and be filled with their own devices. 
For the turning away of the simple shall slay them, and the prosperity of fools shall destroy them. 
But whoso hearkeneth unto me shall dwell safely, and shall be quiet from fear of evil. 
My son, if thou wilt receive my words, and hide my commandments with thee; 
So that thou incline thine ear unto wisdom, and apply thine heart to understanding; 
Yea, if thou criest after knowledge, and liftest up thy voice for understanding; 
If thou seekest her as s
839,ere increased, I have done these things unto thee. 
Therefore all they that devour thee shall be devoured; and all thine adversaries, every one of them, shall go into captivity; and they that spoil thee shall be a spoil, and all that prey upon thee will I give for a prey. 
For I will restore health unto thee, and I will heal thee of thy wounds, saith the LORD; because they called thee an Outcast, saying, This is Zion, whom no man seeketh after. 
Thus saith the LORD; Behold, I will bring again the captivity of Jacob's tents, and have mercy on his dwellingplaces; and the city shall be builded upon her own heap, and the palace shall remain after the manner thereof. 
And out of them shall proceed thanksgiving and the voice of them that make merry: and I will multiply them, and they shall not be few; I will also glorify them, and th
580,Zidon, and to them of Tyre, to bring cedar trees from Lebanon to the sea of Joppa, according to the grant that they had of Cyrus king of Persia. 
Now in the second year of their coming unto the house of God at Jerusalem, in the second month, began Zerubbabel the son of Shealtiel, and Jeshua the son of Jozadak, and the remnant of their brethren the priests and the Levites, and all they that were come out of the captivity unto Jerusalem; and appointed the Levites, from twenty years old and upward, to set forward the work of the house of the LORD. 
Then stood Jeshua with his s
685,h wine, he commanded Mehuman, Biztha, Harbona, Bigtha, and Abagtha, Zethar, and Carcas, the seven chamberlains that served in the presence of Ahasuerus the king, 
To bring Vashti the queen before the king with the crown royal, to shew the people and the princes her beauty: for she was fair to look on. 
But the queen Vashti refused to come at the king's commandment by his chamberlains: therefore was the king very wroth, and his anger burned in him. 
Then the king said to the wise men, which knew the times, (for so was the king's manner toward all that knew law and judgment: 
And the next unto him was Carshena, Shethar, Admatha, Tarshish, Meres, Marsena, and Memucan, the seven p
706,wn unto the sons of men, as it is now revealed unto his holy apostles and prophets by the Spirit; 
That the Gentiles should be fellowheirs, and of the same body, and partakers of his promise in Christ by the gospel: 
Whereof I was made a minister, according to the gift of the grace of God given unto me by the effectual working of his power. 
Unto me, who am less than the least of all saints, is this grace given, that I should preach among the Gentiles the unsearchable riches of Christ; 
And to make all men see what is the fellowship of the mystery, which from the beginning of the world hath been hid in God, who created all things by Jesus Christ: 
To the intent that now unto the principalities and
637, his father's instruction: but he that regardeth reproof is prudent. 
In the house of the righteous is much treasure: but in the revenues of the wicked is trouble. 
The lips of the wise disperse knowledge: but the heart of the foolish doeth not so. 
The sacrifice of the wicked is an abomination to the LORD: but the prayer of the upright is his delight. 
The way of the wicked is an abomination unto the LORD: but he loveth him that followeth after righteousness. 
Correction is grievous unto him that forsaketh the way: and he that hateth reproof shall die. 
Hell and destruction are before the LORD: how much more then the hearts of t
774,reprove you, if ye do secretly accept persons. 
Shall not his excellency make you afraid? and his dread fall upon you? 
Your remembrances are like unto ashes, your bodies to bodies of clay. 
Hold your peace, let me alone, that I may speak, and let come on me what will. 
Wherefore do I take my flesh in my teeth, and put my life in mine hand? 
Though he slay me, yet will I trust in him: but I will maintain mine own ways before him. 
He also shall be my salvation: for an hypocrite shall not come before him. 
Hear diligently my speech, and my declaration with your ears. 
Behold now, I have ordered my cause; I know that I shall be justified. 
Who is he that will plead with me? for now, if I hold my tongue, I shall give up the ghost. 
Only do not two things unto me: the
581,e an atonement for our souls before the LORD. 
And Moses and Eleazar the priest took the gold of them, even all wrought jewels. 
And all the gold of the offering that they offered up to the LORD, of the captains of thousands, and of the captains of hundreds, was sixteen thousand seven hundred and fifty shekels. 
(For the men of war had taken spoil, every man for himself.) 
And Moses and Eleazar the priest took the gold of the captains of thousands and of hundreds, and brought it into the tabernacle of the congregation, for a memorial for the children of Israel before the LOR
661,d on camels, and on mules, and on oxen, and meat, meal, cakes of figs, and bunches of raisins, and wine, and oil, and oxen, and sheep abundantly: for there was joy in Israel. 
And David consulted with the captains of thousands and hundreds, and with every leader. 
And David said unto all the congregation of Israel, If it seem good unto you, and that it be of the LORD our God, let us send abroad unto our brethren every where, that are left in all the land of Israel, and with them also to the priests and Levites which are in their cities and suburbs, that they may gather themselves unto us: 
And let us bring again the ark of our God to us: for we enquired
615, but the lips of knowledge are a precious jewel. 
Take his garment that is surety for a stranger: and take a pledge of him for a strange woman. 
Bread of deceit is sweet to a man; but afterwards his mouth shall be filled with gravel. 
Every purpose is established by counsel: and with good advice make war. 
He that goeth about as a talebearer revealeth secrets: therefore meddle not with him that flattereth with his lips. 
Whoso curseth his father or his mother, his lamp shall be put out in obscure darkness. 
An inheritance may be gotten hastily at the beginning; but the end thereof shall not be blessed. 
Say 
585,m thee, and will give it to thy servant. 
Notwithstanding in thy days I will not do it for David thy father's sake: but I will rend it out of the hand of thy son. 
Howbeit I will not rend away all the kingdom; but will give one tribe to thy son for David my servant's sake, and for Jerusalem's sake which I have chosen. 
And the LORD stirred up an adversary unto Solomon, Hadad the Edomite: he was of the king's seed in Edom. 
For it came to pass, when David was in Edom, and Joab the captain of the host was gone up to bury the slain, after he had smitten every male in Edom; 
(For si
644, sent thee this day to meet me: 
And blessed be thy advice, and blessed be thou, which hast kept me this day from coming to shed blood, and from avenging myself with mine own hand. 
For in very deed, as the LORD God of Israel liveth, which hath kept me back from hurting thee, except thou hadst hasted and come to meet me, surely there had not been left unto Nabal by the morning light any that pisseth against the wall. 
So David received of her hand that which she had brought him, and said unto her, Go up in peace to thine house; see, I have hearkened to thy voice, and have accepted thy person. 
And Abigail came to Nabal; and, behold, he 
808,m of war to be heard in Rabbah of the Ammonites; and it shall be a desolate heap, and her daughters shall be burned with fire: then shall Israel be heir unto them that were his heirs, saith the LORD. 
Howl, O Heshbon, for Ai is spoiled: cry, ye daughters of Rabbah, gird you with sackcloth; lament, and run to and fro by the hedges; for their king shall go into captivity, and his priests and his princes together. 
Wherefore gloriest thou in the valleys, thy flowing valley, O backsliding daughter? that trusted in her treasures, saying, Who shall come unto me? 
Behold, I will bring a fear upon thee, saith the Lord GOD of hosts, from all those that be about thee; and ye shall be driven out every man right forth; and none shall gather up him that wandereth. 
And afterward I will bring again the captivit
633, speak as a man) 
God forbid: for then how shall God judge the world? 
For if the truth of God hath more abounded through my lie unto his glory; why yet am I also judged as a sinner? 
And not rather, (as we be slanderously reported, and as some affirm that we say,) Let us do evil, that good may come? whose damnation is just. 
What then? are we better than they? No, in no wise: for we have before proved both Jews and Gentiles, that they are all under sin; 
As it is written, There is none righteous, no, not one: 
There is none that understandeth, there is none that seeketh after God. 
They are all gone out of the way, they are 
630,ountains, and have not charity, I am nothing. 
And though I bestow all my goods to feed the poor, and though I give my body to be burned, and have not charity, it profiteth me nothing. 
Charity suffereth long, and is kind; charity envieth not; charity vaunteth not itself, is not puffed up, 
Doth not behave itself unseemly, seeketh not her own, is not easily provoked, thinketh no evil; 
Rejoiceth not in iniquity, but rejoiceth in the truth; 
Beareth all things, believeth all things, hopeth all things, endureth all things. 
Charity never faileth: but whether there be prophecies, they shall fail; whether there be tongues, the
615,men on that side of the mountain: and David made haste to get away for fear of Saul; for Saul and his men compassed David and his men round about to take them. 
But there came a messenger unto Saul, saying, Haste thee, and come; for the Philistines have invaded the land. 
Wherefore Saul returned from pursuing after David, and went against the Philistines: therefore they called that place Selahammahlekoth. 
And David went up from thence, and dwelt in strong holds at Engedi. 
And it came to pass, when Saul was returned from following the Philistines, that it was told him, saying, Behold, David is in the wilder
560,d Israel beheld Joseph's sons, and said, Who are these? 
And Joseph said unto his father, They are my sons, whom God hath given me in this place. And he said, Bring them, I pray thee, unto me, and I will bless them. 
Now the eyes of Israel were dim for age, so that he could not see. And he brought them near unto him; and he kissed them, and embraced them. 
And Israel said unto Joseph, I had not thought to see thy face: and, lo, God hath shewed me also thy seed. 
And Joseph brought them out from between his knees, and he bowed himself with his face to the
681,the edge of the sea of Chinnereth on the other side Jordan eastward. 
This is the inheritance of the children of Gad after their families, the cities, and their villages. 
And Moses gave inheritance unto the half tribe of Manasseh: and this was the possession of the half tribe of the children of Manasseh by their families. 
And their coast was from Mahanaim, all Bashan, all the kingdom of Og king of Bashan, and all the towns of Jair, which are in Bashan, threescore cities: 
And half Gilead, and Ashtaroth, and Edrei, cities of the kingdom of Og in Bashan, were pertaining unto the children of Machir the son of Manasseh, even to the one half of the children of Machir by their
723, forsake you, and the city that I gave you and your fathers, and cast you out of my presence: 
And I will bring an everlasting reproach upon you, and a perpetual shame, which shall not be forgotten. 
The LORD shewed me, and, behold, two baskets of figs were set before the temple of the LORD, after that Nebuchadrezzar king of Babylon had carried away captive Jeconiah the son of Jehoiakim king of Judah, and the princes of Judah, with the carpenters and smiths, from Jerusalem, and had brought them to Babylon. 
One basket had very good figs, even like the figs that are first ripe: and the other basket had very naughty figs, which could not be eaten, they were so bad. 
Then said the LORD unto me, What seest thou, Jerem
619,od, if so be that God will think upon us, that we perish not. 
And they said every one to his fellow, Come, and let us cast lots, that we may know for whose cause this evil is upon us. So they cast lots, and the lot fell upon Jonah. 
Then said they unto him, Tell us, we pray thee, for whose cause this evil is upon us; What is thine occupation? and whence comest thou? what is thy country? and of what people art thou? 
And he said unto them, I am an Hebrew; and I fear the LORD, the God of heaven, which hath made the sea and the dry land. 
Then were the men exceedingly afraid, and said unto him. Why hast thou done 
834,she said, Behold my maid Bilhah, go in unto her; and she shall bear upon my knees, that I may also have children by her. 
And she gave him Bilhah her handmaid to wife: and Jacob went in unto her. 
And Bilhah conceived, and bare Jacob a son. 
And Rachel said, God hath judged me, and hath also heard my voice, and hath given me a son: therefore called she his name Dan. 
And Bilhah Rachel's maid conceived again, and bare Jacob a second son. 
And Rachel said, With great wrestlings have I wrestled with my sister, and I have prevailed: and she called his name Naphtali. 
When Leah saw that she had left bearing, she took Zilpah her maid, and gave her Jacob to wife. 
And Zilpah Leah's maid bare Jacob a son. 
And Leah said, A troop cometh: and she called his name Gad. 
And Zilpah Leah's maid bare Jacob a second son. 
And Leah said, H
611, tame; it is an unruly evil, full of deadly poison. 
Therewith bless we God, even the Father; and therewith curse we men, which are made after the similitude of God. 
Out of the same mouth proceedeth blessing and cursing. My brethren, these things ought not so to be. 
Doth a fountain send forth at the same place sweet water and bitter? 
Can the fig tree, my brethren, bear olive berries? either a vine, figs? so can no fountain both yield salt water and fresh. 
Who is a wise man and endued with knowledge among you? let him shew out of a good conversation his works with meekness of wisdom. 
But if ye have b
580,and four cubits, according to the measure of a man, that is, of the angel. 
And the building of the wall of it was of jasper: and the city was pure gold, like unto clear glass. 
And the foundations of the wall of the city were garnished with all manner of precious stones. The first foundation was jasper; the second, sapphire; the third, a chalcedony; the fourth, an emerald; 
The fifth, sardonyx; the sixth, sardius; the seventh, chrysolyte; the eighth, beryl; the ninth, a topaz; the tenth, a chrysoprasus; the eleventh, a jacinth; the twelfth, an amethyst. 
And the twelve gat
580,dar, but the ark of God dwelleth within curtains. 
And Nathan said to the king, Go, do all that is in thine heart; for the LORD is with thee. 
And it came to pass that night, that the word of the LORD came unto Nathan, saying, 
Go and tell my servant David, Thus saith the LORD, Shalt thou build me an house for me to dwell in? 
Whereas I have not dwelt in any house since the time that I brought up the children of Israel out of Egypt, even to this day, but have walked in a tent and in a tabernacle. 
In all the places wherein I have walked with all the children of Israel spake
825,her, hath given you treasure in your sacks: I had your money. And he brought Simeon out unto them. 
And the man brought the men into Joseph's house, and gave them water, and they washed their feet; and he gave their asses provender. 
And they made ready the present against Joseph came at noon: for they heard that they should eat bread there. 
And when Joseph came home, they brought him the present which was in their hand into the house, and bowed themselves to him to the earth. 
And he asked them of their welfare, and said, Is your father well, the old man of whom ye spake? Is he yet alive? 
And they answered, Thy servant our father is in good health, he is yet alive. And they bowed down their heads, and made obeisance. 
And he lifted up his eyes, and saw his brother Benjamin, his mother's son, and said, Is this y
806,ry thing that liveth, which moveth, whithersoever the rivers shall come, shall live: and there shall be a very great multitude of fish, because these waters shall come thither: for they shall be healed; and every thing shall live whither the river cometh. 
And it shall come to pass, that the fishers shall stand upon it from Engedi even unto Eneglaim; they shall be a place to spread forth nets; their fish shall be according to their kinds, as the fish of the great sea, exceeding many. 
But the miry places thereof and the marishes thereof shall not be healed; they shall be given to salt. 
And by the river upon the bank thereof, on this side and on that side, shall grow all trees for meat, whose leaf shall not fade, neither shall the fruit thereof be consumed: it shall bring forth new fruit accordi
777,received tithes of Abraham, and blessed him that had the promises. 
And without all contradiction the less is blessed of the better. 
And here men that die receive tithes; but there he receiveth them, of whom it is witnessed that he liveth. 
And as I may so say, Levi also, who receiveth tithes, payed tithes in Abraham. 
For he was yet in the loins of his father, when Melchisedec met him. 
If therefore perfection were by the Levitical priesthood, (for under it the people received the law,) what further need was there that another priest should rise after the order of Melchisedec, and not be called after the order of Aaron? 
For the priesthood being changed, there is made of necessity a change also of the law. 
For he of whom these things are spoken pertaineth to anoth
587,of stones: the first row shall be a sardius, a topaz, and a carbuncle: this shall be the first row. 
And the second row shall be an emerald, a sapphire, and a diamond. 
And the third row a ligure, an agate, and an amethyst. 
And the fourth row a beryl, and an onyx, and a jasper: they shall be set in gold in their inclosings. 
And the stones shall be with the names of the children of Israel, twelve, according to their names, like the engravings of a signet; every one with his name shall they be according to the twelve tribes. 
And thou shalt make upon the breastplate chains at the 
644,aid, and trembling taketh hold on my flesh. 
Wherefore do the wicked live, become old, yea, are mighty in power? 
Their seed is established in their sight with them, and their offspring before their eyes. 
Their houses are safe from fear, neither is the rod of God upon them. 
Their bull gendereth, and faileth not; their cow calveth, and casteth not her calf. 
They send forth their little ones like a flock, and their children dance. 
They take the timbrel and harp, and rejoice at the sound of the organ. 
They spend their days in wealth, and in a moment go down to the grave. 
Therefore they say unto God, Depart from us; for we desire not 
701,t what saith the answer of God unto him? I have reserved to myself seven thousand men, who have not bowed the knee to the image of Baal. 
Even so then at this present time also there is a remnant according to the election of grace. 
And if by grace, then is it no more of works: otherwise grace is no more grace. But if it be of works, then it is no more grace: otherwise work is no more work. 
What then? Israel hath not obtained that which he seeketh for; but the election hath obtained it, and the rest were blinded. 
(According as it is written, God hath given them the spirit of slumber, eyes that they should not see, and ears that they should not hear;) unto this day. 
And David saith, Let the
748,isely in a perfect way. O when wilt thou come unto me? I will walk within my house with a perfect heart. 
I will set no wicked thing before mine eyes: I hate the work of them that turn aside; it shall not cleave to me. 
A froward heart shall depart from me: I will not know a wicked person. 
Whoso privily slandereth his neighbour, him will I cut off: him that hath an high look and a proud heart will not I suffer. 
Mine eyes shall be upon the faithful of the land, that they may dwell with me: he that walketh in a perfect way, he shall serve me. 
He that worketh deceit shall not dwell within my house: he that telleth lies shall not tarry in my sight. 
I will early destroy all the wicked of the land; that I may cut off all wicked doers from t
798,h hath visited us, 
To give light to them that sit in darkness and in the shadow of death, to guide our feet into the way of peace. 
And the child grew, and waxed strong in spirit, and was in the deserts till the day of his shewing unto Israel. 
And it came to pass in those days, that there went out a decree from Caesar Augustus that all the world should be taxed. 
(And this taxing was first made when Cyrenius was governor of Syria.) 
And all went to be taxed, every one into his own city. 
And Joseph also went up from Galilee, out of the city of Nazareth, into Judaea, unto the city of David, which is called Bethlehem; (because he was of the house and lineage of David:) 
To be taxed with Mary his espoused wife, being great with child. 
And so it was, that, while they were there, the days 
617,at city, wherein are more then sixscore thousand persons that cannot discern between their right hand and their left hand; and also much cattle? 
The word of the LORD that came to Micah the Morasthite in the days of Jotham, Ahaz, and Hezekiah, kings of Judah, which he saw concerning Samaria and Jerusalem. 
Hear, all ye people; hearken, O earth, and all that therein is: and let the Lord GOD be witness against you, the LORD from his holy temple. 
For, behold, the LORD cometh forth out of his place, and will come down, and tread upon the high places of the earth. 
And the mountains shall be molten under him, and 
734,he was the firstborn; but forasmuch as he defiled his father's bed, his birthright was given unto the sons of Joseph the son of Israel: and the genealogy is not to be reckoned after the birthright. 
For Judah prevailed above his brethren, and of him came the chief ruler; but the birthright was Joseph's:) 
The sons, I say, of Reuben the firstborn of Israel were, Hanoch, and Pallu, Hezron, and Carmi. 
The sons of Joel; Shemaiah his son, Gog his son, Shimei his son, 
Micah his son, Reaia his son, Baal his son, 
Beerah his son, whom Tilgathpilneser king of Assyria carried away captive: he was prince of the Reubenites. 
And his brethren by their families, when the genealogy of their generations was reckoned, were the chief, Jeiel
727,rth out of the seas, thou filledst many people; thou didst enrich the kings of the earth with the multitude of thy riches and of thy merchandise. 
In the time when thou shalt be broken by the seas in the depths of the waters thy merchandise and all thy company in the midst of thee shall fall. 
All the inhabitants of the isles shall be astonished at thee, and their kings shall be sore afraid, they shall be troubled in their countenance. 
The merchants among the people shall hiss at thee; thou shalt be a terror, and never shalt be any more. 
The word of the LORD came again unto me, saying, 
Son of man, say unto the prince of Tyrus, Thus saith the Lord GOD; Because thine heart is lifted up, and thou hast said, I am a God
773, days we took up our carriages, and went up to Jerusalem. 
There went with us also certain of the disciples of Caesarea, and brought with them one Mnason of Cyprus, an old disciple, with whom we should lodge. 
And when we were come to Jerusalem, the brethren received us gladly. 
And the day following Paul went in with us unto James; and all the elders were present. 
And when he had saluted them, he declared particularly what things God had wrought among the Gentiles by his ministry. 
And when they heard it, they glorified the Lord, and said unto him, Thou seest, brother, how many thousands of Jews there are which believe; and they are all zealous of the law: 
And they are informed of thee, that thou teachest all the Jews which are among the Gentiles to forsake Mo
613,erness, by the fountain in the way to Shur. 
And he said, Hagar, Sarai's maid, whence camest thou? and whither wilt thou go? And she said, I flee from the face of my mistress Sarai. 
And the angel of the LORD said unto her, Return to thy mistress, and submit thyself under her hands. 
And the angel of the LORD said unto her, I will multiply thy seed exceedingly, that it shall not be numbered for multitude. 
And the angel of the LORD said unto her, Behold, thou art with child and shalt bear a son, and shalt call his name Ishmael; because the LORD hath heard thy affliction. 
And he will be a wild man; his han
612,hey might destroy him: for they feared him, because all the people was astonished at his doctrine. 
And when even was come, he went out of the city. 
And in the morning, as they passed by, they saw the fig tree dried up from the roots. 
And Peter calling to remembrance saith unto him, Master, behold, the fig tree which thou cursedst is withered away. 
And Jesus answering saith unto them, Have faith in God. 
For verily I say unto you, That whosoever shall say unto this mountain, Be thou removed, and be thou cast into the sea; and shall not doubt in his heart, but shall believe that those things which he sa
581,iver is Hiddekel: that is it which goeth toward the east of Assyria. And the fourth river is Euphrates. 
And the LORD God took the man, and put him into the garden of Eden to dress it and to keep it. 
And the LORD God commanded the man, saying, Of every tree of the garden thou mayest freely eat: 
But of the tree of the knowledge of good and evil, thou shalt not eat of it: for in the day that thou eatest thereof thou shalt surely die. 
And the LORD God said, It is not good that the man should be alone; I will make him an help meet for him. 
And out of the ground the LORD God 
754,ed the end shall be. 
The ram which thou sawest having two horns are the kings of Media and Persia. 
And the rough goat is the king of Grecia: and the great horn that is between his eyes is the first king. 
Now that being broken, whereas four stood up for it, four kingdoms shall stand up out of the nation, but not in his power. 
And in the latter time of their kingdom, when the transgressors are come to the full, a king of fierce countenance, and understanding dark sentences, shall stand up. 
And his power shall be mighty, but not by his own power: and he shall destroy wonderfully, and shall prosper, and practise, and shall destroy the mighty and the holy people. 
And through his policy also he shall cause craft to prosper in his hand; and he s
708, Israel, though it be in Jonathan my son, he shall surely die. But there was not a man among all the people that answered him. 
Then said he unto all Israel, Be ye on one side, and I and Jonathan my son will be on the other side. And the people said unto Saul, Do what seemeth good unto thee. 
Therefore Saul said unto the LORD God of Israel, Give a perfect lot. And Saul and Jonathan were taken: but the people escaped. 
And Saul said, Cast lots between me and Jonathan my son. And Jonathan was taken. 
Then Saul said to Jonathan, Tell me what thou hast done. And Jonathan told him, and said, I did but taste a little honey with the end of the rod that was in mine hand, and, lo, I must die. 
And Saul answe
821,us saith the LORD; For three transgressions of Edom, and for four, I will not turn away the punishment thereof; because he did pursue his brother with the sword, and did cast off all pity, and his anger did tear perpetually, and he kept his wrath for ever: 
But I will send a fire upon Teman, which shall devour the palaces of Bozrah. 
Thus saith the LORD; For three transgressions of the children of Ammon, and for four, I will not turn away the punishment thereof; because they have ripped up the women with child of Gilead, that they might enlarge their border: 
But I will kindle a fire in the wall of Rabbah, and it shall devour the palaces thereof, with shouting in the day of battle, with a tempest in the day of the whirlwind: 
And their king shall go into captivity, he and his princes together, saith the LORD. 
610,d his hinder part toward the utmost sea, and his stink shall come up, and his ill savour shall come up, because he hath done great things. 
Fear not, O land; be glad and rejoice: for the LORD will do great things. 
Be not afraid, ye beasts of the field: for the pastures of the wilderness do spring, for the tree beareth her fruit, the fig tree and the vine do yield their strength. 
Be glad then, ye children of Zion, and rejoice in the LORD your God: for he hath given you the former rain moderately, and he will cause to come down for you the rain, the former rain, and the latter rain in the first month. 

637,vereth them out of all their troubles. 
The LORD is nigh unto them that are of a broken heart; and saveth such as be of a contrite spirit. 
Many are the afflictions of the righteous: but the LORD delivereth him out of them all. 
He keepeth all his bones: not one of them is broken. 
Evil shall slay the wicked: and they that hate the righteous shall be desolate. 
The LORD redeemeth the soul of his servants: and none of them that trust in him shall be desolate. 
Plead my cause, O LORD, with them that strive with me: fight against them that fight against me. 
Take hold of shield and buckler, and stand up for mine help. 
Draw out also
756,s of their service, and all that is made for them: so shall they serve. 
At the appointment of Aaron and his sons shall be all the service of the sons of the Gershonites, in all their burdens, and in all their service: and ye shall appoint unto them in charge all their burdens. 
This is the service of the families of the sons of Gershon in the tabernacle of the congregation: and their charge shall be under the hand of Ithamar the son of Aaron the priest. 
As for the sons of Merari, thou shalt number them after their families, by the house of their fathers; 
From thirty years old and upward even unto fifty years old shalt thou number them, every one that entereth into the service, to do the work of the tabernacle of the congregation. 
And this is 
569,nd fall, and be broken, and be snared, and be taken. 
Bind up the testimony, seal the law among my disciples. 
And I will wait upon the LORD, that hideth his face from the house of Jacob, and I will look for him. 
Behold, I and the children whom the LORD hath given me are for signs and for wonders in Israel from the LORD of hosts, which dwelleth in mount Zion. 
And when they shall say unto you, Seek unto them that have familiar spirits, and unto wizards that peep, and that mutter: should not a people seek unto their God? for the living to the dead? 
To the law an
659,. 
Likewise reckon ye also yourselves to be dead indeed unto sin, but alive unto God through Jesus Christ our Lord. 
Let not sin therefore reign in your mortal body, that ye should obey it in the lusts thereof. 
Neither yield ye your members as instruments of unrighteousness unto sin: but yield yourselves unto God, as those that are alive from the dead, and your members as instruments of righteousness unto God. 
For sin shall not have dominion over you: for ye are not under the law, but under grace. 
What then? shall we sin, because we are not under the law, but under grace? God forbid. 
Know ye not, that to whom ye yield yourselves servants to obey, 
817,which had two debtors: the one owed five hundred pence, and the other fifty. 
And when they had nothing to pay, he frankly forgave them both. Tell me therefore, which of them will love him most? 
Simon answered and said, I suppose that he, to whom he forgave most. And he said unto him, Thou hast rightly judged. 
And he turned to the woman, and said unto Simon, Seest thou this woman? I entered into thine house, thou gavest me no water for my feet: but she hath washed my feet with tears, and wiped them with the hairs of her head. 
Thou gavest me no kiss: but this woman since the time I came in hath not ceased to kiss my feet. 
My head with oil thou didst not anoint: but this woman hath anointed my feet with ointment. 
Wherefore I say unto thee, Her sins, which are many, are forgiven; for she loved much: but 
604,h not unto thee, Uzziah, to burn incense unto the LORD, but to the priests the sons of Aaron, that are consecrated to burn incense: go out of the sanctuary; for thou hast trespassed; neither shall it be for thine honour from the LORD God. 
Then Uzziah was wroth, and had a censer in his hand to burn incense: and while he was wroth with the priests, the leprosy even rose up in his forehead before the priests in the house of the LORD, from beside the incense altar. 
And Azariah the chief priest, and all the priests, looked upon him, and, behold, he was leprous in his forehead, and they thrust him out
779,saith the Lord GOD; I will also take of the highest branch of the high cedar, and will set it; I will crop off from the top of his young twigs a tender one, and will plant it upon an high mountain and eminent: 
In the mountain of the height of Israel will I plant it: and it shall bring forth boughs, and bear fruit, and be a goodly cedar: and under it shall dwell all fowl of every wing; in the shadow of the branches thereof shall they dwell. 
And all the trees of the field shall know that I the LORD have brought down the high tree, have exalted the low tree, have dried up the green tree, and have made the dry tree to flourish: I the LORD have spoken and have done it. 
The word of the LORD came unto me again, saying, 
What mean ye, that ye use this proverb concerning the
785,hites: and the children of Aaron the priest, which were of the Levites, had by lot out of the tribe of Judah, and out of the tribe of Simeon, and out of the tribe of Benjamin, thirteen cities. 
And the rest of the children of Kohath had by lot out of the families of the tribe of Ephraim, and out of the tribe of Dan, and out of the half tribe of Manasseh, ten cities. 
And the children of Gershon had by lot out of the families of the tribe of Issachar, and out of the tribe of Asher, and out of the tribe of Naphtali, and out of the half tribe of Manasseh in Bashan, thirteen cities. 
The children of Merari by their families had out of the tribe of Reuben, and out of the tribe of Gad, and out of the tribe of Zebulun, twelve cities. 
And the children of Israel gave by lot unto the
616,rtion should be for the singers, due for every day. 
And Pethahiah the son of Meshezabeel, of the children of Zerah the son of Judah, was at the king's hand in all matters concerning the people. 
And for the villages, with their fields, some of the children of Judah dwelt at Kirjatharba, and in the villages thereof, and at Dibon, and in the villages thereof, and at Jekabzeel, and in the villages thereof, 
And at Jeshua, and at Moladah, and at Bethphelet, 
And at Hazarshual, and at Beersheba, and in the villages thereof, 
And at Ziklag, and at Mekonah, and in the villages thereof, 
And at Enrimmon, and at Zare
660,e king. 
And the drinking was according to the law; none did compel: for so the king had appointed to all the officers of his house, that they should do according to every man's pleasure. 
Also Vashti the queen made a feast for the women in the royal house which belonged to king Ahasuerus. 
On the seventh day, when the heart of the king was merry with wine, he commanded Mehuman, Biztha, Harbona, Bigtha, and Abagtha, Zethar, and Carcas, the seven chamberlains that served in the presence of Ahasuerus the king, 
To bring Vashti the queen before the king with the crown royal, to shew the people and the princes her beauty: for she was fair to look on. 
But 
753,me before the LORD, and before his anointed: whose ox have I taken? or whose ass have I taken? or whom have I defrauded? whom have I oppressed? or of whose hand have I received any bribe to blind mine eyes therewith? and I will restore it you. 
And they said, Thou hast not defrauded us, nor oppressed us, neither hast thou taken ought of any man's hand. 
And he said unto them, The LORD is witness against you, and his anointed is witness this day, that ye have not found ought in my hand. And they answered, He is witness. 
And Samuel said unto the people, It is the LORD that advanced Moses and Aaron, and that brought your fathers up out of the land of Egypt. 
Now therefore stand still, that I may reason with you before the LORD of all the righteo
741, to come up to take vengeance; I have set her blood upon the top of a rock, that it should not be covered. 
Therefore thus saith the Lord GOD; Woe to the bloody city! I will even make the pile for fire great. 
Heap on wood, kindle the fire, consume the flesh, and spice it well, and let the bones be burned. 
Then set it empty upon the coals thereof, that the brass of it may be hot, and may burn, and that the filthiness of it may be molten in it, that the scum of it may be consumed. 
She hath wearied herself with lies, and her great scum went not forth out of her: her scum shall be in the fire. 
In thy filthiness is lewdness: because I have purged thee, and thou wast not purged, thou shalt not be purged from thy filthiness any more, 
652,d did yield fruit that sprang up and increased; and brought forth, some thirty, and some sixty, and some an hundred. 
And he said unto them, He that hath ears to hear, let him hear. 
And when he was alone, they that were about him with the twelve asked of him the parable. 
And he said unto them, Unto you it is given to know the mystery of the kingdom of God: but unto them that are without, all these things are done in parables: 
That seeing they may see, and not perceive; and hearing they may hear, and not understand; lest at any time they should be converted, and their sins should be forgiven them. 
And he said unto them, Know ye not this para
667,n the eyes of Pharaoh, and in the eyes of all his servants. 
And Pharaoh said unto his servants, Can we find such a one as this is, a man in whom the Spirit of God is? 
And Pharaoh said unto Joseph, Forasmuch as God hath shewed thee all this, there is none so discreet and wise as thou art: 
Thou shalt be over my house, and according unto thy word shall all my people be ruled: only in the throne will I be greater than thou. 
And Pharaoh said unto Joseph, See, I have set thee over all the land of Egypt. 
And Pharaoh took off his ring from his hand, and put it upon Joseph's hand, and arrayed him in vestures of fine linen, and put a gold chain about his neck; 
An
782, and I say unto one, Go, and he goeth; and to another, Come, and he cometh; and to my servant, Do this, and he doeth it. 
When Jesus heard these things, he marvelled at him, and turned him about, and said unto the people that followed him, I say unto you, I have not found so great faith, no, not in Israel. 
And they that were sent, returning to the house, found the servant whole that had been sick. 
And it came to pass the day after, that he went into a city called Nain; and many of his disciples went with him, and much people. 
Now when he came nigh to the gate of the city, behold, there was a dead man carried out, the only son of his mother, and she was a widow: and much people of the city was with her. 
And when the Lord saw her, he had compassion on her, and said unto
728,. 
Beloved, now are we the sons of God, and it doth not yet appear what we shall be: but we know that, when he shall appear, we shall be like him; for we shall see him as he is. 
And every man that hath this hope in him purifieth himself, even as he is pure. 
Whosoever committeth sin transgresseth also the law: for sin is the transgression of the law. 
And ye know that he was manifested to take away our sins; and in him is no sin. 
Whosoever abideth in him sinneth not: whosoever sinneth hath not seen him, neither known him. 
Little children, let no man deceive you: he that doeth righteousness is righteous, even as he is righteous. 
He that committeth sin is of the devil; for the devil sinneth from the beginning. For th
571,anon which cometh from the rock of the field? or shall the cold flowing waters that come from another place be forsaken? 
Because my people hath forgotten me, they have burned incense to vanity, and they have caused them to stumble in their ways from the ancient paths, to walk in paths, in a way not cast up; 
To make their land desolate, and a perpetual hissing; every one that passeth thereby shall be astonished, and wag his head. 
I will scatter them as with an east wind before the enemy; I will shew them the back, and not the face, in the day of their calamity. 

638,ce bones. 
Take the choice of the flock, and burn also the bones under it, and make it boil well, and let them seethe the bones of it therein. 
Wherefore thus saith the Lord GOD; Woe to the bloody city, to the pot whose scum is therein, and whose scum is not gone out of it! bring it out piece by piece; let no lot fall upon it. 
For her blood is in the midst of her; she set it upon the top of a rock; she poured it not upon the ground, to cover it with dust; 
That it might cause fury to come up to take vengeance; I have set her blood upon the top of a rock, that it should not be covered. 
Therefore thus saith the Lord GOD; Woe to th
588,t all the trees of Eden, that were in the garden of God, envied him. 
Therefore thus saith the Lord GOD; Because thou hast lifted up thyself in height, and he hath shot up his top among the thick boughs, and his heart is lifted up in his height; 
I have therefore delivered him into the hand of the mighty one of the heathen; he shall surely deal with him: I have driven him out for his wickedness. 
And strangers, the terrible of the nations, have cut him off, and have left him: upon the mountains and in all the valleys his branches are fallen, and his boughs are broken by all the riv
827,y ministered to the Lord, and fasted, the Holy Ghost said, Separate me Barnabas and Saul for the work whereunto I have called them. 
And when they had fasted and prayed, and laid their hands on them, they sent them away. 
So they, being sent forth by the Holy Ghost, departed unto Seleucia; and from thence they sailed to Cyprus. 
And when they were at Salamis, they preached the word of God in the synagogues of the Jews: and they had also John to their minister. 
And when they had gone through the isle unto Paphos, they found a certain sorcerer, a false prophet, a Jew, whose name was Barjesus: 
Which was with the deputy of the country, Sergius Paulus, a prudent man; who called for Barnabas and Saul, and desired to hear the word of God. 
But Elymas the sorcerer (for so is his name by interpretation) withstood them, see
737,ll fall down unto thee, they shall make supplication unto thee, saying, Surely God is in thee; and there is none else, there is no God. 
Verily thou art a God that hidest thyself, O God of Israel, the Saviour. 
They shall be ashamed, and also confounded, all of them: they shall go to confusion together that are makers of idols. 
But Israel shall be saved in the LORD with an everlasting salvation: ye shall not be ashamed nor confounded world without end. 
For thus saith the LORD that created the heavens; God himself that formed the earth and made it; he hath established it, he created it not in vain, he formed it to be inhabited: I am the LORD; and there is none else. 
I have not spoken in secret, in a dark place of the earth: I
837, own fields; for thou art worthy of death: but I will not at this time put thee to death, because thou barest the ark of the LORD God before David my father, and because thou hast been afflicted in all wherein my father was afflicted. 
So Solomon thrust out Abiathar from being priest unto the LORD; that he might fulfil the word of the LORD, which he spake concerning the house of Eli in Shiloh. 
Then tidings came to Joab: for Joab had turned after Adonijah, though he turned not after Absalom. And Joab fled unto the tabernacle of the LORD, and caught hold on the horns of the altar. 
And it was told king Solomon that Joab was fled unto the tabernacle of the LORD; and, behold, he is by the altar. Then Solomon sent Benaiah the son of Jehoiada, saying, Go, fall upon him. 
And Benaiah came to the tabernacle of the LORD, and said unt
609,er; she is the daughter of my father, but not the daughter of my mother; and she became my wife. 
And it came to pass, when God caused me to wander from my father's house, that I said unto her, This is thy kindness which thou shalt shew unto me; at every place whither we shall come, say of me, He is my brother. 
And Abimelech took sheep, and oxen, and menservants, and womenservants, and gave them unto Abraham, and restored him Sarah his wife. 
And Abimelech said, Behold, my land is before thee: dwell where it pleaseth thee. 
And unto Sarah he said, Behold, I have given thy brother a thousand pieces of 
792,ng, 
Speak unto the children of Israel, and take of every one of them a rod according to the house of their fathers, of all their princes according to the house of their fathers twelve rods: write thou every man's name upon his rod. 
And thou shalt write Aaron's name upon the rod of Levi: for one rod shall be for the head of the house of their fathers. 
And thou shalt lay them up in the tabernacle of the congregation before the testimony, where I will meet with you. 
And it shall come to pass, that the man's rod, whom I shall choose, shall blossom: and I will make to cease from me the murmurings of the children of Israel, whereby they murmur against you. 
And Moses spake unto the children of Israel, and every one of their princes gave him a rod apiece, for each prince one, accordin
743,, except he first bind the strong man? and then he will spoil his house. 
He that is not with me is against me; and he that gathereth not with me scattereth abroad. 
Wherefore I say unto you, All manner of sin and blasphemy shall be forgiven unto men: but the blasphemy against the Holy Ghost shall not be forgiven unto men. 
And whosoever speaketh a word against the Son of man, it shall be forgiven him: but whosoever speaketh against the Holy Ghost, it shall not be forgiven him, neither in this world, neither in the world to come. 
Either make the tree good, and his fruit good; or else make the tree corrupt, and his fruit corrupt: for the tree is known by his fruit. 
O generation of vipers, how can ye, being evil, speak good things? f
774,o did Nathan speak unto David. 
And David the king came and sat before the LORD, and said, Who am I, O LORD God, and what is mine house, that thou hast brought me hitherto? 
And yet this was a small thing in thine eyes, O God; for thou hast also spoken of thy servant's house for a great while to come, and hast regarded me according to the estate of a man of high degree, O LORD God. 
What can David speak more to thee for the honour of thy servant? for thou knowest thy servant. 
O LORD, for thy servant's sake, and according to thine own heart, hast thou done all this greatness, in making known all these great things. 
O LORD, there is none like thee, neither is there any God beside thee, according to all that we have heard with our ears. 
And what one nation in the 
575,o her house which Solomon had built for her: then did he build Millo. 
And three times in a year did Solomon offer burnt offerings and peace offerings upon the altar which he built unto the LORD, and he burnt incense upon the altar that was before the LORD. So he finished the house. 
And king Solomon made a navy of ships in Eziongeber, which is beside Eloth, on the shore of the Red sea, in the land of Edom. 
And Hiram sent in the navy his servants, shipmen that had knowledge of the sea, with the servants of Solomon. 
And they came to Ophir, and fetched from thence gold
761, offence, even to them which stumble at the word, being disobedient: whereunto also they were appointed. 
But ye are a chosen generation, a royal priesthood, an holy nation, a peculiar people; that ye should shew forth the praises of him who hath called you out of darkness into his marvellous light; 
Which in time past were not a people, but are now the people of God: which had not obtained mercy, but now have obtained mercy. 
Dearly beloved, I beseech you as strangers and pilgrims, abstain from fleshly lusts, which war against the soul; 
Having your conversation honest among the Gentiles: that, whereas they speak against you as evildoers, they may by your good works, which they shall behold, glorify God in the day of visitation. 
Submit yourselves to
811,king of Babylon by the sword, and by the famine, and by the pestilence; 
Behold, I will gather them out of all countries, whither I have driven them in mine anger, and in my fury, and in great wrath; and I will bring them again unto this place, and I will cause them to dwell safely: 
And they shall be my people, and I will be their God: 
And I will give them one heart, and one way, that they may fear me for ever, for the good of them, and of their children after them: 
And I will make an everlasting covenant with them, that I will not turn away from them, to do them good; but I will put my fear in their hearts, that they shall not depart from me. 
Yea, I will rejoice over them to do them good, and I will plant them in this land assuredly with my whole heart and with my whole soul. 
For thus saith the
705,tophathite, 
Heleb the son of Baanah, a Netophathite, Ittai the son of Ribai out of Gibeah of the children of Benjamin, 
Benaiah the Pirathonite, Hiddai of the brooks of Gaash, 
Abialbon the Arbathite, Azmaveth the Barhumite, 
Eliahba the Shaalbonite, of the sons of Jashen, Jonathan, 
Shammah the Hararite, Ahiam the son of Sharar the Hararite, 
Eliphelet the son of Ahasbai, the son of the Maachathite, Eliam the son of Ahithophel the Gilonite, 
Hezrai the Carmelite, Paarai the Arbite, 
Igal the son of Nathan of Zobah, Bani the Gadite, 
Zelek the Ammonite, Nahari the Beerothite, armourbearer to Joab the son of Zeruiah, 
Ira an Ithrite, Gareb an Ithrite, 
Uriah the Hittite: thirty and seven in all. 
587,er, and be unclean until the even. 
And he that toucheth the flesh of him that hath the issue shall wash his clothes, and bathe himself in water, and be unclean until the even. 
And if he that hath the issue spit upon him that is clean; then he shall wash his clothes, and bathe himself in water, and be unclean until the even. 
And what saddle soever he rideth upon that hath the issue shall be unclean. 
And whosoever toucheth any thing that was under him shall be unclean until the even: and he that beareth any of those things shall wash his clothes, and bathe himself in water, and 
612, son of Gedaliah, the son of Amariah, the son of Hizkiah, in the days of Josiah the son of Amon, king of Judah. 
I will utterly consume all things from off the land, saith the LORD. 
I will consume man and beast; I will consume the fowls of the heaven, and the fishes of the sea, and the stumbling blocks with the wicked: and I will cut off man from off the land, saith the LORD. 
I will also stretch out mine hand upon Judah, and upon all the inhabitants of Jerusalem; and I will cut off the remnant of Baal from this place, and the name of the Chemarims with the priests; 
And them that worship the host of hea
798,ildren of Israel out of Egypt? 
And he said, Certainly I will be with thee; and this shall be a token unto thee, that I have sent thee: When thou hast brought forth the people out of Egypt, ye shall serve God upon this mountain. 
And Moses said unto God, Behold, when I come unto the children of Israel, and shall say unto them, The God of your fathers hath sent me unto you; and they shall say to me, What is his name? what shall I say unto them? 
And God said unto Moses, I AM THAT I AM: and he said, Thus shalt thou say unto the children of Israel, I AM hath sent me unto you. 
And God said moreover unto Moses, Thus shalt thou say unto the children of Israel, the LORD God of your fathers, the God of Abraham, the God of Isaac, and the God of Jacob, hath sent me unto you: this is my name for e
619,saith the king, Let not Hezekiah deceive you: for he shall not be able to deliver you. 
Neither let Hezekiah make you trust in the LORD, saying, The LORD will surely deliver us: this city shall not be delivered into the hand of the king of Assyria. 
Hearken not to Hezekiah: for thus saith the king of Assyria, Make an agreement with me by a present, and come out to me: and eat ye every one of his vine, and every one of his fig tree, and drink ye every one the waters of his own cistern; 
Until I come and take you away to a land like your own land, a land of corn and wine, a land of bread and vineyards. 
Beware les
834,the first was Isshiah. 
Of the Izharites; Shelomoth: of the sons of Shelomoth; Jahath. 
And the sons of Hebron; Jeriah the first, Amariah the second, Jahaziel the third, Jekameam the fourth. 
Of the sons of Uzziel; Michah: of the sons of Michah; Shamir. 
The brother of Michah was Isshiah: of the sons of Isshiah; Zechariah. 
The sons of Merari were Mahli and Mushi: the sons of Jaaziah; Beno. 
The sons of Merari by Jaaziah; Beno, and Shoham, and Zaccur, and Ibri. 
Of Mahli came Eleazar, who had no sons. 
Concerning Kish: the son of Kish was Jerahmeel. 
The sons also of Mushi; Mahli, and Eder, and Jerimoth. These were the sons of the Levites after the house of their fathers. 
These likewise cast lots over against their brethren the sons of Aaron in the presence of David the king, and Zadok, and Ahimelech, and the chief of the
796, poor, a strength to the needy in his distress, a refuge from the storm, a shadow from the heat, when the blast of the terrible ones is as a storm against the wall. 
Thou shalt bring down the noise of strangers, as the heat in a dry place; even the heat with the shadow of a cloud: the branch of the terrible ones shall be brought low. 
And in this mountain shall the LORD of hosts make unto all people a feast of fat things, a feast of wines on the lees, of fat things full of marrow, of wines on the lees well refined. 
And he will destroy in this mountain the face of the covering cast over all people, and the vail that is spread over all nations. 
He will swallow up death in victory; and the Lord GOD will wipe away tears from off all faces; and the rebuke of his people shall he take away 
724, the midst of the altar. 
And thou shalt make staves for the altar, staves of shittim wood, and overlay them with brass. 
And the staves shall be put into the rings, and the staves shall be upon the two sides of the altar, to bear it. 
Hollow with boards shalt thou make it: as it was shewed thee in the mount, so shall they make it. 
And thou shalt make the court of the tabernacle: for the south side southward there shall be hangings for the court of fine twined linen of an hundred cubits long for one side: 
And the twenty pillars thereof and their twenty sockets shall be of brass; the hooks of the pillars and their fillets shall be of silver. 
And likewise for the north side in length there shall be hangings of an 
687,the prophet. 
For as Jonas was a sign unto the Ninevites, so shall also the Son of man be to this generation. 
The queen of the south shall rise up in the judgment with the men of this generation, and condemn them: for she came from the utmost parts of the earth to hear the wisdom of Solomon; and, behold, a greater than Solomon is here. 
The men of Nineve shall rise up in the judgment with this generation, and shall condemn it: for they repented at the preaching of Jonas; and, behold, a greater than Jonas is here. 
No man, when he hath lighted a candle, putteth it in a secret place, neither under a bushel, but on a candlestick, that they which come in may see the light. 
The lig
821, is strong that executeth his word: for the day of the LORD is great and very terrible; and who can abide it? 
Therefore also now, saith the LORD, turn ye even to me with all your heart, and with fasting, and with weeping, and with mourning: 
And rend your heart, and not your garments, and turn unto the LORD your God: for he is gracious and merciful, slow to anger, and of great kindness, and repenteth him of the evil. 
Who knoweth if he will return and repent, and leave a blessing behind him; even a meat offering and a drink offering unto the LORD your God? 
Blow the trumpet in Zion, sanctify a fast, call a solemn assembly: 
Gather the people, sanctify the congregation, assemble the elders, gather the children, and those that suck the breasts: let the bridegroom go forth of his chamber, and the bride out of he
721,nd the people shall ascend up every man straight before him. 
And Joshua the son of Nun called the priests, and said unto them, Take up the ark of the covenant, and let seven priests bear seven trumpets of rams' horns before the ark of the LORD. 
And he said unto the people, Pass on, and compass the city, and let him that is armed pass on before the ark of the LORD. 
And it came to pass, when Joshua had spoken unto the people, that the seven priests bearing the seven trumpets of rams' horns passed on before the LORD, and blew with the trumpets: and the ark of the covenant of the LORD followed them. 
And the armed men went before the priests that blew with the trumpets, and the rereward came after the ark, the pr
814,ut it in a basket, and shalt go unto the place which the LORD thy God shall choose to place his name there. 
And thou shalt go unto the priest that shall be in those days, and say unto him, I profess this day unto the LORD thy God, that I am come unto the country which the LORD sware unto our fathers for to give us. 
And the priest shall take the basket out of thine hand, and set it down before the altar of the LORD thy God. 
And thou shalt speak and say before the LORD thy God, A Syrian ready to perish was my father, and he went down into Egypt, and sojourned there with a few, and became there a nation, great, mighty, and populous: 
And the Egyptians evil entreated us, and afflicted us, and laid upon us hard bondage: 
And when we cried unto the LORD God of our fathers, the LORD heard our voice, and loo
661,he LORD hearkened unto me at that time also. 
And the LORD was very angry with Aaron to have destroyed him: and I prayed for Aaron also the same time. 
And I took your sin, the calf which ye had made, and burnt it with fire, and stamped it, and ground it very small, even until it was as small as dust: and I cast the dust thereof into the brook that descended out of the mount. 
And at Taberah, and at Massah, and at Kibrothhattaavah, ye provoked the LORD to wrath. 
Likewise when the LORD sent you from Kadeshbarnea, saying, Go up and possess the land which I have given you; then ye rebelled against the commandment of the LORD your God, and ye believed him 
734,. 
And the man Micah had an house of gods, and made an ephod, and teraphim, and consecrated one of his sons, who became his priest. 
In those days there was no king in Israel, but every man did that which was right in his own eyes. 
And there was a young man out of Bethlehemjudah of the family of Judah, who was a Levite, and he sojourned there. 
And the man departed out of the city from Bethlehemjudah to sojourn where he could find a place: and he came to mount Ephraim to the house of Micah, as he journeyed. 
And Micah said unto him, Whence comest thou? And he said unto him, I am a Levite of Bethlehemjudah, and I go to sojourn where I may find a place. 
And Micah said unto him, Dwell with me, and be unto me a father and a pr
621,the son of Abiathar the priest came; and Adonijah said unto him, Come in; for thou art a valiant man, and bringest good tidings. 
And Jonathan answered and said to Adonijah, Verily our lord king David hath made Solomon king. 
And the king hath sent with him Zadok the priest, and Nathan the prophet, and Benaiah the son of Jehoiada, and the Cherethites, and the Pelethites, and they have caused him to ride upon the king's mule: 
And Zadok the priest and Nathan the prophet have anointed him king in Gihon: and they are come up from thence rejoicing, so that the city rang again. This is the noise that ye have heard. 
An
574,e river unto the ends of the earth. 
They that dwell in the wilderness shall bow before him; and his enemies shall lick the dust. 
The kings of Tarshish and of the isles shall bring presents: the kings of Sheba and Seba shall offer gifts. 
Yea, all kings shall fall down before him: all nations shall serve him. 
For he shall deliver the needy when he crieth; the poor also, and him that hath no helper. 
He shall spare the poor and needy, and shall save the souls of the needy. 
He shall redeem their soul from deceit and violence: and precious shall their blood be in his 
739,en in the book of the acts of Solomon? 
And the time that Solomon reigned in Jerusalem over all Israel was forty years. 
And Solomon slept with his fathers, and was buried in the city of David his father: and Rehoboam his son reigned in his stead. 
And Rehoboam went to Shechem: for all Israel were come to Shechem to make him king. 
And it came to pass, when Jeroboam the son of Nebat, who was yet in Egypt, heard of it, (for he was fled from the presence of king Solomon, and Jeroboam dwelt in Egypt;) 
That they sent and called him. And Jeroboam and all the congregation of Israel came, and spake unto Rehoboam, saying, 
Thy father made our yoke grievous: now therefore make thou the grievous service of thy father, and his heavy yoke w
640,stress; as with the buyer, so with the seller; as with the lender, so with the borrower; as with the taker of usury, so with the giver of usury to him. 
The land shall be utterly emptied, and utterly spoiled: for the LORD hath spoken this word. 
The earth mourneth and fadeth away, the world languisheth and fadeth away, the haughty people of the earth do languish. 
The earth also is defiled under the inhabitants thereof; because they have transgressed the laws, changed the ordinance, broken the everlasting covenant. 
Therefore hath the curse devoured the earth, and they that dwell therein are desolate: therefore the inhabitants of th
639,hat it was good: and God divided the light from the darkness. 
And God called the light Day, and the darkness he called Night. And the evening and the morning were the first day. 
And God said, Let there be a firmament in the midst of the waters, and let it divide the waters from the waters. 
And God made the firmament, and divided the waters which were under the firmament from the waters which were above the firmament: and it was so. 
And God called the firmament Heaven. And the evening and the morning were the second day. 
And God said, Let the waters under the heaven be gathered together unto one place, and let the dry land appe
606,answer me: 
The baptism of John, was it from heaven, or of men? 
And they reasoned with themselves, saying, If we shall say, From heaven; he will say, Why then believed ye him not? 
But and if we say, Of men; all the people will stone us: for they be persuaded that John was a prophet. 
And they answered, that they could not tell whence it was. 
And Jesus said unto them, Neither tell I you by what authority I do these things. 
Then began he to speak to the people this parable; A certain man planted a vineyard, and let it forth to husbandmen, and went into a far country for a long time. 
And at the se
828,s commandments. This is the commandment, That, as ye have heard from the beginning, ye should walk in it. 
For many deceivers are entered into the world, who confess not that Jesus Christ is come in the flesh. This is a deceiver and an antichrist. 
Look to yourselves, that we lose not those things which we have wrought, but that we receive a full reward. 
Whosoever transgresseth, and abideth not in the doctrine of Christ, hath not God. He that abideth in the doctrine of Christ, he hath both the Father and the Son. 
If there come any unto you, and bring not this doctrine, receive him not into your house, neither bid him God speed: 
For he that biddeth him God speed is partaker of his evil deeds. 
Having many things to write unto you, I would not write with paper and ink: but I trust to come unto you, and speak face to
709,ding to their father's house. 
The sons of Kohath; Amram, Izhar, Hebron, and Uzziel, four. 
The sons of Amram; Aaron and Moses: and Aaron was separated, that he should sanctify the most holy things, he and his sons for ever, to burn incense before the LORD, to minister unto him, and to bless in his name for ever. 
Now concerning Moses the man of God, his sons were named of the tribe of Levi. 
The sons of Moses were, Gershom, and Eliezer. 
Of the sons of Gershom, Shebuel was the chief. 
And the sons of Eliezer were, Rehabiah the chief. And Eliezer had none other sons; but the sons of Rehabiah were very many. 
Of the sons of Izhar; Shelomith the chief. 
Of the sons of Hebron; Jeriah the first, Amariah 
769,man be so with his wife, it is not good to marry. 
But he said unto them, All men cannot receive this saying, save they to whom it is given. 
For there are some eunuchs, which were so born from their mother's womb: and there are some eunuchs, which were made eunuchs of men: and there be eunuchs, which have made themselves eunuchs for the kingdom of heaven's sake. He that is able to receive it, let him receive it. 
Then were there brought unto him little children, that he should put his hands on them, and pray: and the disciples rebuked them. 
But Jesus said, Suffer little children, and forbid them not, to come unto me: for of such is the kingdom of heaven. 
And he laid his hands on them, and departed thence. 
And, behold, one came and said unto him, Good Mast
700,, and lament, ye priests: howl, ye ministers of the altar: come, lie all night in sackcloth, ye ministers of my God: for the meat offering and the drink offering is withholden from the house of your God. 
Sanctify ye a fast, call a solemn assembly, gather the elders and all the inhabitants of the land into the house of the LORD your God, and cry unto the LORD, 
Alas for the day! for the day of the LORD is at hand, and as a destruction from the Almighty shall it come. 
Is not the meat cut off before our eyes, yea, joy and gladness from the house of our God? 
The seed is rotten under their clods, the garners are laid desolate, the barns are broken down; for the corn is withered. 
How do the be
648,all bless thee in all that thou doest. 
All the firstling males that come of thy herd and of thy flock thou shalt sanctify unto the LORD thy God: thou shalt do no work with the firstling of thy bullock, nor shear the firstling of thy sheep. 
Thou shalt eat it before the LORD thy God year by year in the place which the LORD shall choose, thou and thy household. 
And if there be any blemish therein, as if it be lame, or blind, or have any ill blemish, thou shalt not sacrifice it unto the LORD thy God. 
Thou shalt eat it within thy gates: the unclean and the clean person shall eat it alike, as the roebuck, and as the hart. 
Only thou shalt not
783,e out, his servants came; and when they saw that, behold, the doors of the parlour were locked, they said, Surely he covereth his feet in his summer chamber. 
And they tarried till they were ashamed: and, behold, he opened not the doors of the parlour; therefore they took a key, and opened them: and, behold, their lord was fallen down dead on the earth. 
And Ehud escaped while they tarried, and passed beyond the quarries, and escaped unto Seirath. 
And it came to pass, when he was come, that he blew a trumpet in the mountain of Ephraim, and the children of Israel went down with him from the mount, and he before them. 
And he said unto them, Follow after me: for the LORD hath delivered your enemies the Moabites into your hand. And they went down after him, and took the ford
685,vid were come to Abigail to Carmel, they spake unto her, saying, David sent us unto thee, to take thee to him to wife. 
And she arose, and bowed herself on her face to the earth, and said, Behold, let thine handmaid be a servant to wash the feet of the servants of my lord. 
And Abigail hasted, and arose and rode upon an ass, with five damsels of hers that went after her; and she went after the messengers of David, and became his wife. 
David also took Ahinoam of Jezreel; and they were also both of them his wives. 
But Saul had given Michal his daughter, David's wife, to Phalti the son of Laish, which was of Gallim. 
And the Ziphites came unto Saul to Gibeah, saying, Doth not D
588,went unto the city where the man of God was. 
And as they went up the hill to the city, they found young maidens going out to draw water, and said unto them, Is the seer here? 
And they answered them, and said, He is; behold, he is before you: make haste now, for he came to day to the city; for there is a sacrifice of the people to day in the high place: 
As soon as ye be come into the city, ye shall straightway find him, before he go up to the high place to eat: for the people will not eat until he come, because he doth bless the sacrifice; and afterwards they eat that be bidden. 
586,, as if I were present, the second time; and being absent now I write to them which heretofore have sinned, and to all other, that, if I come again, I will not spare: 
Since ye seek a proof of Christ speaking in me, which to you-ward is not weak, but is mighty in you. 
For though he was crucified through weakness, yet he liveth by the power of God. For we also are weak in him, but we shall live with him by the power of God toward you. 
Examine yourselves, whether ye be in the faith; prove your own selves. Know ye not your own selves, how that Jesus Christ is in you, except ye be 
650, if ye receive another spirit, which ye have not received, or another gospel, which ye have not accepted, ye might well bear with him. 
For I suppose I was not a whit behind the very chiefest apostles. 
But though I be rude in speech, yet not in knowledge; but we have been throughly made manifest among you in all things. 
Have I committed an offence in abasing myself that ye might be exalted, because I have preached to you the gospel of God freely? 
I robbed other churches, taking wages of them, to do you service. 
And when I was present with you, and wanted, I was chargeable to no man: for that which was lacking to me the brethren which came
749,themselves. 
Therefore I was left alone, and saw this great vision, and there remained no strength in me: for my comeliness was turned in me into corruption, and I retained no strength. 
Yet heard I the voice of his words: and when I heard the voice of his words, then was I in a deep sleep on my face, and my face toward the ground. 
And, behold, an hand touched me, which set me upon my knees and upon the palms of my hands. 
And he said unto me, O Daniel, a man greatly beloved, understand the words that I speak unto thee, and stand upright: for unto thee am I now sent. And when he had spoken this word unto me, I stood trembling. 
Then said he unto me, Fear not, Daniel: for from the first day that thou didst set thine heart to understand, an
818,imeon went with him. 
And Judah went up; and the LORD delivered the Canaanites and the Perizzites into their hand: and they slew of them in Bezek ten thousand men. 
And they found Adonibezek in Bezek: and they fought against him, and they slew the Canaanites and the Perizzites. 
But Adonibezek fled; and they pursued after him, and caught him, and cut off his thumbs and his great toes. 
And Adonibezek said, Threescore and ten kings, having their thumbs and their great toes cut off, gathered their meat under my table: as I have done, so God hath requited me. And they brought him to Jerusalem, and there he died. 
Now the children of Judah had fought against Jerusalem, and had taken it, and smitten it with the edge of the sword, and set the city on fire. 
And afterward the children of Judah went down to fight a
828,or Israel. 
And David commanded to gather together the strangers that were in the land of Israel; and he set masons to hew wrought stones to build the house of God. 
And David prepared iron in abundance for the nails for the doors of the gates, and for the joinings; and brass in abundance without weight; 
Also cedar trees in abundance: for the Zidonians and they of Tyre brought much cedar wood to David. 
And David said, Solomon my son is young and tender, and the house that is to be builded for the LORD must be exceeding magnifical, of fame and of glory throughout all countries: I will therefore now make preparation for it. So David prepared abundantly before his death. 
Then he called for Solomon his son, and charged him to build an house for the LORD God of Israel. 
And David said to Solomon, My son, as for me, it 
562,rs of the fruits doth he sell unto thee. 
Ye shall not therefore oppress one another; but thou shalt fear thy God:for I am the LORD your God. 
Wherefore ye shall do my statutes, and keep my judgments, and do them; and ye shall dwell in the land in safety. 
And the land shall yield her fruit, and ye shall eat your fill, and dwell therein in safety. 
And if ye shall say, What shall we eat the seventh year? behold, we shall not sow, nor gather in our increase: 
Then I will command my blessing upon you in the sixth year, and it shall bring forth fruit for thre
619,rge of my sanctuary when the children of Israel went astray from me, they shall come near to me to minister unto me, and they shall stand before me to offer unto me the fat and the blood, saith the Lord GOD: 
They shall enter into my sanctuary, and they shall come near to my table, to minister unto me, and they shall keep my charge. 
And it shall come to pass, that when they enter in at the gates of the inner court, they shall be clothed with linen garments; and no wool shall come upon them, whiles they minister in the gates of the inner court, and within. 
They shall have linen bonnets upon their heads, and sha
607,f the matter of the kingdom, whereof Samuel spake, he told him not. 
And Samuel called the people together unto the LORD to Mizpeh; 
And said unto the children of Israel, Thus saith the LORD God of Israel, I brought up Israel out of Egypt, and delivered you out of the hand of the Egyptians, and out of the hand of all kingdoms, and of them that oppressed you: 
And ye have this day rejected your God, who himself saved you out of all your adversities and your tribulations; and ye have said unto him, Nay, but set a king over us. Now therefore present yourselves before the LORD by your tribes, and by your
771, thy throne to all generations. Selah. 
And the heavens shall praise thy wonders, O LORD: thy faithfulness also in the congregation of the saints. 
For who in the heaven can be compared unto the LORD? who among the sons of the mighty can be likened unto the LORD? 
God is greatly to be feared in the assembly of the saints, and to be had in reverence of all them that are about him. 
O LORD God of hosts, who is a strong LORD like unto thee? or to thy faithfulness round about thee? 
Thou rulest the raging of the sea: when the waves thereof arise, thou stillest them. 
Thou hast broken Rahab in pieces, as one that is slain; thou hast scattered thine enemies with thy strong arm. 
The heavens are thine, the earth also is thine: as for the world and the fulness thereof,
795,of the east wind. 
By this therefore shall the iniquity of Jacob be purged; and this is all the fruit to take away his sin; when he maketh all the stones of the altar as chalkstones that are beaten in sunder, the groves and images shall not stand up. 
Yet the defenced city shall be desolate, and the habitation forsaken, and left like a wilderness: there shall the calf feed, and there shall he lie down, and consume the branches thereof. 
When the boughs thereof are withered, they shall be broken off: the women come, and set them on fire: for it is a people of no understanding: therefore he that made them will not have mercy on them, and he that formed them will shew them no favour. 
And it shall come to pass in that day, that the LORD shall beat off from the channel of the river unto t
753,have chosen before all the tribes of Israel, will I put my name for ever: 
Neither will I any more remove the foot of Israel from out of the land which I have appointed for your fathers; so that they will take heed to do all that I have commanded them, according to the whole law and the statutes and the ordinances by the hand of Moses. 
So Manasseh made Judah and the inhabitants of Jerusalem to err, and to do worse than the heathen, whom the LORD had destroyed before the children of Israel. 
And the LORD spake to Manasseh, and to his people: but they would not hearken. 
Wherefore the LORD brought upon them the captains of the host of the king of Assyria, which took Manasseh among the thorns, and bound him with fetters, and carried him to Babyl
721,ehold, they be rent: and these our garments and our shoes are become old by reason of the very long journey. 
And the men took of their victuals, and asked not counsel at the mouth of the LORD. 
And Joshua made peace with them, and made a league with them, to let them live: and the princes of the congregation sware unto them. 
And it came to pass at the end of three days after they had made a league with them, that they heard that they were their neighbours, and that they dwelt among them. 
And the children of Israel journeyed, and came unto their cities on the third day. Now their cities were Gibeon, and Chephirah, and Beeroth, and Kirjathjearim. 
And the children of Israel smote them not, because the princes o
739,nd they bowed their heads and worshipped. 
Then Hezekiah answered and said, Now ye have consecrated yourselves unto the LORD, come near and bring sacrifices and thank offerings into the house of the LORD. And the congregation brought in sacrifices and thank offerings; and as many as were of a free heart burnt offerings. 
And the number of the burnt offerings, which the congregation brought, was threescore and ten bullocks, an hundred rams, and two hundred lambs: all these were for a burnt offering to the LORD. 
And the consecrated things were six hundred oxen and three thousand sheep. 
But the priests were too few, so that they could not flay all the burnt offerings: wherefore their brethren the Levites did help them, till the wo
776,s house arose, and went to him, to raise him up from the earth: but he would not, neither did he eat bread with them. 
And it came to pass on the seventh day, that the child died. And the servants of David feared to tell him that the child was dead: for they said, Behold, while the child was yet alive, we spake unto him, and he would not hearken unto our voice: how will he then vex himself, if we tell him that the child is dead? 
But when David saw that his servants whispered, David perceived that the child was dead: therefore David said unto his servants, Is the child dead? And they said, He is dead. 
Then David arose from the earth, and washed, and anointed himself, and changed his apparel, and came into the house of the LORD, and worshipped: then he came to his o
701,
Nor consider that it is expedient for us, that one man should die for the people, and that the whole nation perish not. 
And this spake he not of himself: but being high priest that year, he prophesied that Jesus should die for that nation; 
And not for that nation only, but that also he should gather together in one the children of God that were scattered abroad. 
Then from that day forth they took counsel together for to put him to death. 
Jesus therefore walked no more openly among the Jews; but went thence unto a country near to the wilderness, into a city called Ephraim, and there continued with his disciples. 
And the Jews' passover was nigh at hand: and many went out of the country up
775,m be crucified. 
When Pilate saw that he could prevail nothing, but that rather a tumult was made, he took water, and washed his hands before the multitude, saying, I am innocent of the blood of this just person: see ye to it. 
Then answered all the people, and said, His blood be on us, and on our children. 
Then released he Barabbas unto them: and when he had scourged Jesus, he delivered him to be crucified. 
Then the soldiers of the governor took Jesus into the common hall, and gathered unto him the whole band of soldiers. 
And they stripped him, and put on him a scarlet robe. 
And when they had platted a crown of thorns, they put it upon his head, and a reed in his right hand: and they bowed the knee before him, and mocked him, saying, Hail, King of the Jews! 
A
568,And also I have withholden the rain from you, when there were yet three months to the harvest: and I caused it to rain upon one city, and caused it not to rain upon another city: one piece was rained upon, and the piece whereupon it rained not withered. 
So two or three cities wandered unto one city, to drink water; but they were not satisfied: yet have ye not returned unto me, saith the LORD. 
I have smitten you with blasting and mildew: when your gardens and your vineyards and your fig trees and your olive trees increased, the palmerworm devoured them: yet hav
780, the rain, as the latter and former rain unto the earth. 
O Ephraim, what shall I do unto thee? O Judah, what shall I do unto thee? for your goodness is as a morning cloud, and as the early dew it goeth away. 
Therefore have I hewed them by the prophets; I have slain them by the words of my mouth: and thy judgments are as the light that goeth forth. 
For I desired mercy, and not sacrifice; and the knowledge of God more than burnt offerings. 
But they like men have transgressed the covenant: there have they dealt treacherously against me. 
Gilead is a city of them that work iniquity, and is polluted with blood. 
And as troops of robbers wait for a man, so the company of priests murder in the way by consent: for they commit lewdness. 
I have seen an horrible thing in the 
653, ashamed in the evil time: and in the days of famine they shall be satisfied. 
But the wicked shall perish, and the enemies of the LORD shall be as the fat of lambs: they shall consume; into smoke shall they consume away. 
The wicked borroweth, and payeth not again: but the righteous sheweth mercy, and giveth. 
For such as be blessed of him shall inherit the earth; and they that be cursed of him shall be cut off. 
The steps of a good man are ordered by the LORD: and he delighteth in his way. 
Though he fall, he shall not be utterly cast down: for the LORD upholdeth him with his hand. 
I have been young, and now am old; yet have I not seen the ri
809,me, and in thy righteousness. 
And enter not into judgment with thy servant: for in thy sight shall no man living be justified. 
For the enemy hath persecuted my soul; he hath smitten my life down to the ground; he hath made me to dwell in darkness, as those that have been long dead. 
Therefore is my spirit overwhelmed within me; my heart within me is desolate. 
I remember the days of old; I meditate on all thy works; I muse on the work of thy hands. 
I stretch forth my hands unto thee: my soul thirsteth after thee, as a thirsty land. Selah. 
Hear me speedily, O LORD: my spirit faileth: hide not thy face from me, lest I be like unto them that go down into the pit. 
Cause me to hear thy lovingkindness in the morning; for in thee do I trust: cause me to know the way wherein I should walk; for I lift 
780,wrought in Egypt, and my signs which I have done among them; that ye may know how that I am the LORD. 
And Moses and Aaron came in unto Pharaoh, and said unto him, Thus saith the LORD God of the Hebrews, How long wilt thou refuse to humble thyself before me? let my people go, that they may serve me. 
Else, if thou refuse to let my people go, behold, to morrow will I bring the locusts into thy coast: 
And they shall cover the face of the earth, that one cannot be able to see the earth: and they shall eat the residue of that which is escaped, which remaineth unto you from the hail, and shall eat every tree which groweth for you out of the field: 
And they shall fill thy houses, and the houses of all thy servants, and the houses of all the Egyptians; which neither thy fath
830,ed maketh the heart sick: but when the desire cometh, it is a tree of life. 
Whoso despiseth the word shall be destroyed: but he that feareth the commandment shall be rewarded. 
The law of the wise is a fountain of life, to depart from the snares of death. 
Good understanding giveth favour: but the way of transgressors is hard. 
Every prudent man dealeth with knowledge: but a fool layeth open his folly. 
A wicked messenger falleth into mischief: but a faithful ambassador is health. 
Poverty and shame shall be to him that refuseth instruction: but he that regardeth reproof shall be honoured. 
The desire accomplished is sweet to the soul: but it is abomination to fools to depart from evil. 
He that walketh with wise men shall be wise: but a companion of fools shall be destroyed. 
Evil pursueth sinners: but to the righteo
825, mystery of Christ, for which I am also in bonds: 
That I may make it manifest, as I ought to speak. 
Walk in wisdom toward them that are without, redeeming the time. 
Let your speech be alway with grace, seasoned with salt, that ye may know how ye ought to answer every man. 
All my state shall Tychicus declare unto you, who is a beloved brother, and a faithful minister and fellowservant in the Lord: 
Whom I have sent unto you for the same purpose, that he might know your estate, and comfort your hearts; 
With Onesimus, a faithful and beloved brother, who is one of you. They shall make known unto you all things which are done here. 
Aristarchus my fellowprisoner saluteth you, and Marcus, sister's son to Barnabas, (touching whom ye received commandments: if he come unto you, receive him;) 
And Jesus, which is calle
570,savour unto the LORD. 
And if his offering for a sacrifice of peace offering unto the LORD be of the flock; male or female, he shall offer it without blemish. 
If he offer a lamb for his offering, then shall he offer it before the LORD. 
And he shall lay his hand upon the head of his offering, and kill it before the tabernacle of the congregation: and Aaron's sons shall sprinkle the blood thereof round about upon the altar. 
And he shall offer of the sacrifice of the peace offering an offering made by fire unto the LORD; the fat thereof, and the whole rump, it sha
757,well in the midst of Jerusalem: and they shall be my people, and I will be their God, in truth and in righteousness. 
Thus saith the LORD of hosts; Let your hands be strong, ye that hear in these days these words by the mouth of the prophets, which were in the day that the foundation of the house of the LORD of hosts was laid, that the temple might be built. 
For before these days there was no hire for man, nor any hire for beast; neither was there any peace to him that went out or came in because of the affliction: for I set all men every one against his neighbour. 
But now I will not be unto the residue of this people as in the former days, saith the LORD of hosts. 
For the seed shall be prosperous; the vine shall give her fruit, and the ground 
738,ent the present over before him: and himself lodged that night in the company. 
And he rose up that night, and took his two wives, and his two womenservants, and his eleven sons, and passed over the ford Jabbok. 
And he took them, and sent them over the brook, and sent over that he had. 
And Jacob was left alone; and there wrestled a man with him until the breaking of the day. 
And when he saw that he prevailed not against him, he touched the hollow of his thigh; and the hollow of Jacob's thigh was out of joint, as he wrestled with him. 
And he said, Let me go, for the day breaketh. And he said, I will not let thee go, except thou bless me. 
And he said unto him, What is thy name? And he said, Jacob. 
And he said, Thy name shall
584,st thou not charitably. Destroy not him with thy meat, for whom Christ died. 
Let not then your good be evil spoken of: 
For the kingdom of God is not meat and drink; but righteousness, and peace, and joy in the Holy Ghost. 
For he that in these things serveth Christ is acceptable to God, and approved of men. 
Let us therefore follow after the things which make for peace, and things wherewith one may edify another. 
For meat destroy not the work of God. All things indeed are pure; but it is evil for that man who eateth with offence. 
It is good neither to eat flesh, nor to drin
635,ll send swarms of flies upon thee, and upon thy servants, and upon thy people, and into thy houses: and the houses of the Egyptians shall be full of swarms of flies, and also the ground whereon they are. 
And I will sever in that day the land of Goshen, in which my people dwell, that no swarms of flies shall be there; to the end thou mayest know that I am the LORD in the midst of the earth. 
And I will put a division between my people and thy people: to morrow shall this sign be. 
And the LORD did so; and there came a grievous swarm of flies into the house of Pharaoh, and into his servants' houses, and into all the land of Egyp
686,irit of God moved upon the face of the waters. 
And God said, Let there be light: and there was light. 
And God saw the light, that it was good: and God divided the light from the darkness. 
And God called the light Day, and the darkness he called Night. And the evening and the morning were the first day. 
And God said, Let there be a firmament in the midst of the waters, and let it divide the waters from the waters. 
And God made the firmament, and divided the waters which were under the firmament from the waters which were above the firmament: and it was so. 
And God called the firmament Heaven. And the evening and the morning were the second day. 
And God said, Let the water
753,d the back with shame! so shall Moab be a derision and a dismaying to all them about him. 
For thus saith the LORD; Behold, he shall fly as an eagle, and shall spread his wings over Moab. 
Kerioth is taken, and the strong holds are surprised, and the mighty men's hearts in Moab at that day shall be as the heart of a woman in her pangs. 
And Moab shall be destroyed from being a people, because he hath magnified himself against the LORD. 
Fear, and the pit, and the snare, shall be upon thee, O inhabitant of Moab, saith the LORD. 
He that fleeth from the fear shall fall into the pit; and he that getteth up out of the pit shall be taken in the snare: for I will bring upon it, even upon Moab, the year of their visitation, saith the LORD. 
They that
815,me to the hill of God, where is the garrison of the Philistines: and it shall come to pass, when thou art come thither to the city, that thou shalt meet a company of prophets coming down from the high place with a psaltery, and a tabret, and a pipe, and a harp, before them; and they shall prophesy: 
And the Spirit of the LORD will come upon thee, and thou shalt prophesy with them, and shalt be turned into another man. 
And let it be, when these signs are come unto thee, that thou do as occasion serve thee; for God is with thee. 
And thou shalt go down before me to Gilgal; and, behold, I will come down unto thee, to offer burnt offerings, and to sacrifice sacrifices of peace offerings: seven days shalt thou tarry, till I come to thee, and shew thee what thou shalt do. 
And it was so, that when he had turn
678, his songs were a thousand and five. 
And he spake of trees, from the cedar tree that is in Lebanon even unto the hyssop that springeth out of the wall: he spake also of beasts, and of fowl, and of creeping things, and of fishes. 
And there came of all people to hear the wisdom of Solomon, from all kings of the earth, which had heard of his wisdom. 
And Hiram king of Tyre sent his servants unto Solomon; for he had heard that they had anointed him king in the room of his father: for Hiram was ever a lover of David. 
And Solomon sent to Hiram, saying, 
Thou knowest how that David my father could not build an house unto the name of the LORD his God for the wars which were 
677,will take heed to my ways, that I sin not with my tongue: I will keep my mouth with a bridle, while the wicked is before me. 
I was dumb with silence, I held my peace, even from good; and my sorrow was stirred. 
My heart was hot within me, while I was musing the fire burned: then spake I with my tongue, 
LORD, make me to know mine end, and the measure of my days, what it is: that I may know how frail I am. 
Behold, thou hast made my days as an handbreadth; and mine age is as nothing before thee: verily every man at his best state is altogether vanity. Selah. 
Surely every man walketh in a vain shew: surely they are disquieted in vain: he heapeth up riches, and knoweth 
704,e out of thy brother's eye. 
Give not that which is holy unto the dogs, neither cast ye your pearls before swine, lest they trample them under their feet, and turn again and rend you. 
Ask, and it shall be given you; seek, and ye shall find; knock, and it shall be opened unto you: 
For every one that asketh receiveth; and he that seeketh findeth; and to him that knocketh it shall be opened. 
Or what man is there of you, whom if his son ask bread, will he give him a stone? 
Or if he ask a fish, will he give him a serpent? 
If ye then, being evil, know how to give good gifts unto your children, how much more shall your Father which is in heaven give good things to them that ask him? 
Therefore all
657,ver a ferry boat to carry over the king's household, and to do what he thought good. And Shimei the son of Gera fell down before the king, as he was come over Jordan; 
And said unto the king, Let not my lord impute iniquity unto me, neither do thou remember that which thy servant did perversely the day that my lord the king went out of Jerusalem, that the king should take it to his heart. 
For thy servant doth know that I have sinned: therefore, behold, I am come the first this day of all the house of Joseph to go down to meet my lord the king. 
But Abishai the son of Zeruiah answered and said, Shall not Shimei be put to death for this, because he c
570,hosoever he be of the children of Israel, or of the strangers that sojourn in Israel, that giveth any of his seed unto Molech; he shall surely be put to death: the people of the land shall stone him with stones. 
And I will set my face against that man, and will cut him off from among his people; because he hath given of his seed unto Molech, to defile my sanctuary, and to profane my holy name. 
And if the people of the land do any ways hide their eyes from the man, when he giveth of his seed unto Molech, and kill him not: 
Then I will set my face against that man
730,o his father's house. 
And they shall hang upon him all the glory of his father's house, the offspring and the issue, all vessels of small quantity, from the vessels of cups, even to all the vessels of flagons. 
In that day, saith the LORD of hosts, shall the nail that is fastened in the sure place be removed, and be cut down, and fall; and the burden that was upon it shall be cut off: for the LORD hath spoken it. 
The burden of Tyre. Howl, ye ships of Tarshish; for it is laid waste, so that there is no house, no entering in: from the land of Chittim it is revealed to them. 
Be still, ye inhabitants of the isle; thou whom the merchants of Zidon, that pass over the sea, have replenished. 
And by great waters the seed of S
840, to the offerings made by fire unto the LORD: and the priest shall make an atonement for his sin that he hath committed, and it shall be forgiven him. 
And if a soul sin, and hear the voice of swearing, and is a witness, whether he hath seen or known of it; if he do not utter it, then he shall bear his iniquity. 
Or if a soul touch any unclean thing, whether it be a carcase of an unclean beast, or a carcase of unclean cattle, or the carcase of unclean creeping things, and if it be hidden from him; he also shall be unclean, and guilty. 
Or if he touch the uncleanness of man, whatsoever uncleanness it be that a man shall be defiled withal, and it be hid from him; when he knoweth of it, then he shall be guilty. 
Or if a soul swear, pronouncing with his lips to do evil, or to do good, whatsoever it be that a man shall pronounce with
560,reescore and seven. 
The children of Bigvai, two thousand threescore and seven. 
The children of Adin, six hundred fifty and five. 
The children of Ater of Hezekiah, ninety and eight. 
The children of Hashum, three hundred twenty and eight. 
The children of Bezai, three hundred twenty and four. 
The children of Hariph, an hundred and twelve. 
The children of Gibeon, ninety and five. 
The men of Bethlehem and Netophah, an hundred fourscore and eight. 
The men of Anathoth, an hundred twenty and eight. 
The men of Bethazmaveth, forty and two. 
The men of Ki
753, they unto thee? And Hezekiah said, They are come from a far country unto me, even from Babylon. 
Then said he, What have they seen in thine house? And Hezekiah answered, All that is in mine house have they seen: there is nothing among my treasures that I have not shewed them. 
Then said Isaiah to Hezekiah, Hear the word of the LORD of hosts: 
Behold, the days come, that all that is in thine house, and that which thy fathers have laid up in store until this day, shall be carried to Babylon: nothing shall be left, saith the LORD. 
And of thy sons that shall issue from thee, which thou shalt beget, shall they take away; and they shall be eunuchs in the palace of the king of Babylon. 
Then said Hezekiah to Isaiah, Good is the word of the LORD whi
781,cording unto thy mercy, and teach me thy statutes. 
I am thy servant; give me understanding, that I may know thy testimonies. 
It is time for thee, LORD, to work: for they have made void thy law. 
Therefore I love thy commandments above gold; yea, above fine gold. 
Therefore I esteem all thy precepts concerning all things to be right; and I hate every false way. 
Thy testimonies are wonderful: therefore doth my soul keep them. 
The entrance of thy words giveth light; it giveth understanding unto the simple. 
I opened my mouth, and panted: for I longed for thy commandments. 
Look thou upon me, and be merciful unto me, as thou usest to do unto those that love thy name. 
Order my steps in thy word: and let not any iniquity have dominion over me. 
Deliver me from the oppress
708,t it as a willow tree. 
And it grew, and became a spreading vine of low stature, whose branches turned toward him, and the roots thereof were under him: so it became a vine, and brought forth branches, and shot forth sprigs. 
There was also another great eagle with great wings and many feathers: and, behold, this vine did bend her roots toward him, and shot forth her branches toward him, that he might water it by the furrows of her plantation. 
It was planted in a good soil by great waters, that it might bring forth branches, and that it might bear fruit, that it might be a goodly vine. 
Say thou, Thus saith the Lord GOD; Shall it prosper? shall he not pull up the roots thereof, and cut off the frui
673,aven, and save me from the reproach of him that would swallow me up. Selah. God shall send forth his mercy and his truth. 
My soul is among lions: and I lie even among them that are set on fire, even the sons of men, whose teeth are spears and arrows, and their tongue a sharp sword. 
Be thou exalted, O God, above the heavens; let thy glory be above all the earth. 
They have prepared a net for my steps; my soul is bowed down: they have digged a pit before me, into the midst whereof they are fallen themselves. Selah. 
My heart is fixed, O God, my heart is fixed: I will sing and give praise. 
Awake up, my glory; awake, psaltery and harp: I myself will awake early. 
I 
693,ht us up out of Egypt, to kill us and our children and our cattle with thirst? 
And Moses cried unto the LORD, saying, What shall I do unto this people? they be almost ready to stone me. 
And the LORD said unto Moses, Go on before the people, and take with thee of the elders of Israel; and thy rod, wherewith thou smotest the river, take in thine hand, and go. 
Behold, I will stand before thee there upon the rock in Horeb; and thou shalt smite the rock, and there shall come water out of it, that the people may drink. And Moses did so in the sight of the elders of Israel. 
And he called the name of the place Massah, and Meribah, because of the chiding of the children of Israel, and beca
794,, Amos hath conspired against thee in the midst of the house of Israel: the land is not able to bear all his words. 
For thus Amos saith, Jeroboam shall die by the sword, and Israel shall surely be led away captive out of their own land. 
Also Amaziah said unto Amos, O thou seer, go, flee thee away into the land of Judah, and there eat bread, and prophesy there: 
But prophesy not again any more at Bethel: for it is the king's chapel, and it is the king's court. 
Then answered Amos, and said to Amaziah, I was no prophet, neither was I a prophet's son; but I was an herdman, and a gatherer of sycomore fruit: 
And the LORD took me as I followed the flock, and the LORD said unto me, Go, prophesy unto my people Israel. 
Now therefore hear thou the word of the LORD: Thou sayest, Prophesy no
627,ity, and smite: let not your eye spare, neither have ye pity: 
Slay utterly old and young, both maids, and little children, and women: but come not near any man upon whom is the mark; and begin at my sanctuary. Then they began at the ancient men which were before the house. 
And he said unto them, Defile the house, and fill the courts with the slain: go ye forth. And they went forth, and slew in the city. 
And it came to pass, while they were slaying them, and I was left, that I fell upon my face, and cried, and said, Ah Lord GOD! wilt thou destroy all the residue of Israel in thy pouring out of thy fury upon Jerusalem?
698,he vineyard, and slew him. 
When the lord therefore of the vineyard cometh, what will he do unto those husbandmen? 
They say unto him, He will miserably destroy those wicked men, and will let out his vineyard unto other husbandmen, which shall render him the fruits in their seasons. 
Jesus saith unto them, Did ye never read in the scriptures, The stone which the builders rejected, the same is become the head of the corner: this is the Lord's doing, and it is marvellous in our eyes? 
Therefore say I unto you, The kingdom of God shall be taken from you, and given to a nation bringing forth the fruits thereof. 
And whosoever shall fall on this stone shall be broken: but on whomsoever it shall
838,g the pillars, and concerning the sea, and concerning the bases, and concerning the residue of the vessels that remain in this city. 
Which Nebuchadnezzar king of Babylon took not, when he carried away captive Jeconiah the son of Jehoiakim king of Judah from Jerusalem to Babylon, and all the nobles of Judah and Jerusalem; 
Yea, thus saith the LORD of hosts, the God of Israel, concerning the vessels that remain in the house of the LORD, and in the house of the king of Judah and of Jerusalem; 
They shall be carried to Babylon, and there shall they be until the day that I visit them, saith the LORD; then will I bring them up, and restore them to this place. 
And it came to pass the same year, in the beginning of the reign of Zedekiah king of Judah, in the fourth year, and in the fifth month, that Hananiah the son of Azur the prop
645,and they anointed David king over Israel, according to the word of the LORD by Samuel. 
And David and all Israel went to Jerusalem, which is Jebus; where the Jebusites were, the inhabitants of the land. 
And the inhabitants of Jebus said to David, Thou shalt not come hither. Nevertheless David took the castle of Zion, which is the city of David. 
And David said, Whosoever smiteth the Jebusites first shall be chief and captain. So Joab the son of Zeruiah went first up, and was chief. 
And David dwelt in the castle; therefore they called it the city of David. 
And he built the city round about, even from Millo round about: and Joab repaire
744,he, which gave counsel to the Jews, that it was expedient that one man should die for the people. 
And Simon Peter followed Jesus, and so did another disciple: that disciple was known unto the high priest, and went in with Jesus into the palace of the high priest. 
But Peter stood at the door without. Then went out that other disciple, which was known unto the high priest, and spake unto her that kept the door, and brought in Peter. 
Then saith the damsel that kept the door unto Peter, Art not thou also one of this man's disciples? He saith, I am not. 
And the servants and officers stood there, who had made a fire of coals; for it was cold: and they warmed themselves: and Peter stood with them, and warmed himself. 
The high priest the
778,e firstfruits unto God and to the Lamb. 
And in their mouth was found no guile: for they are without fault before the throne of God. 
And I saw another angel fly in the midst of heaven, having the everlasting gospel to preach unto them that dwell on the earth, and to every nation, and kindred, and tongue, and people, 
Saying with a loud voice, Fear God, and give glory to him; for the hour of his judgment is come: and worship him that made heaven, and earth, and the sea, and the fountains of waters. 
And there followed another angel, saying, Babylon is fallen, is fallen, that great city, because she made all nations drink of the wine of the wrath of her fornication. 
And the third angel followed them, saying with a loud voice, If any man worship the beast and his image
743,of the LORD came unto me, saying, 
Son of man, because that Tyrus hath said against Jerusalem, Aha, she is broken that was the gates of the people: she is turned unto me: I shall be replenished, now she is laid waste: 
Therefore thus saith the Lord GOD; Behold, I am against thee, O Tyrus, and will cause many nations to come up against thee, as the sea causeth his waves to come up. 
And they shall destroy the walls of Tyrus, and break down her towers: I will also scrape her dust from her, and make her like the top of a rock. 
It shall be a place for the spreading of nets in the midst of the sea: for I have spoken it, saith the Lord GOD: and it shall become a spoil to the nations. 
And her daughters which are in the field shall be slai
718, Israel have only provoked me to anger with the work of their hands, saith the LORD. 
For this city hath been to me as a provocation of mine anger and of my fury from the day that they built it even unto this day; that I should remove it from before my face, 
Because of all the evil of the children of Israel and of the children of Judah, which they have done to provoke me to anger, they, their kings, their princes, their priests, and their prophets, and the men of Judah, and the inhabitants of Jerusalem. 
And they have turned unto me the back, and not the face: though I taught them, rising up early and teaching them, yet they have not hearkened to receive instruction. 
But they set their abominations in the h
665,OD; Behold, I will take the stick of Joseph, which is in the hand of Ephraim, and the tribes of Israel his fellows, and will put them with him, even with the stick of Judah, and make them one stick, and they shall be one in mine hand. 
And the sticks whereon thou writest shall be in thine hand before their eyes. 
And say unto them, Thus saith the Lord GOD; Behold, I will take the children of Israel from among the heathen, whither they be gone, and will gather them on every side, and bring them into their own land: 
And I will make them one nation in the land upon the mountains of Israel; and one king shall be king to them all: and they shall be no more two 
594,d, Died Abner as a fool dieth? 
Thy hands were not bound, nor thy feet put into fetters: as a man falleth before wicked men, so fellest thou. And all the people wept again over him. 
And when all the people came to cause David to eat meat while it was yet day, David sware, saying, So do God to me, and more also, if I taste bread, or ought else, till the sun be down. 
And all the people took notice of it, and it pleased them: as whatsoever the king did pleased all the people. 
For all the people and all Israel understood that day that it was not of the king to slay Abner the son of Ner. 

757,illed thy prophets, and digged down thine altars; and I am left alone, and they seek my life. 
But what saith the answer of God unto him? I have reserved to myself seven thousand men, who have not bowed the knee to the image of Baal. 
Even so then at this present time also there is a remnant according to the election of grace. 
And if by grace, then is it no more of works: otherwise grace is no more grace. But if it be of works, then it is no more grace: otherwise work is no more work. 
What then? Israel hath not obtained that which he seeketh for; but the election hath obtained it, and the rest were blinded. 
(According as it is written, God hath given them the spirit of slumber, eyes that they should not see, and ears that they should not hear;)
632,o hath slain him: 
Then thy elders and thy judges shall come forth, and they shall measure unto the cities which are round about him that is slain: 
And it shall be, that the city which is next unto the slain man, even the elders of that city shall take an heifer, which hath not been wrought with, and which hath not drawn in the yoke; 
And the elders of that city shall bring down the heifer unto a rough valley, which is neither eared nor sown, and shall strike off the heifer's neck there in the valley: 
And the priests the sons of Levi shall come near; for them the LORD thy God hath chosen to minister unto him, and to bless 
622,tiness of men shall be bowed down, and the LORD alone shall be exalted in that day. 
For the day of the LORD of hosts shall be upon every one that is proud and lofty, and upon every one that is lifted up; and he shall be brought low: 
And upon all the cedars of Lebanon, that are high and lifted up, and upon all the oaks of Bashan, 
And upon all the high mountains, and upon all the hills that are lifted up, 
And upon every high tower, and upon every fenced wall, 
And upon all the ships of Tarshish, and upon all pleasant pictures. 
And the loftiness of man shall be bowed down, and the haughtiness of men shall be made
568,d. 
In whom we have redemption through his blood, the forgiveness of sins, according to the riches of his grace; 
Wherein he hath abounded toward us in all wisdom and prudence; 
Having made known unto us the mystery of his will, according to his good pleasure which he hath purposed in himself: 
That in the dispensation of the fulness of times he might gather together in one all things in Christ, both which are in heaven, and which are on earth; even in him: 
In whom also we have obtained an inheritance, being predestinated according to the purpose of him who wor
668,. 
Consume them in wrath, consume them, that they may not be: and let them know that God ruleth in Jacob unto the ends of the earth. Selah. 
And at evening let them return; and let them make a noise like a dog, and go round about the city. 
Let them wander up and down for meat, and grudge if they be not satisfied. 
But I will sing of thy power; yea, I will sing aloud of thy mercy in the morning: for thou hast been my defence and refuge in the day of my trouble. 
Unto thee, O my strength, will I sing: for God is my defence, and the God of my mercy. 
O God, thou hast cast us off, thou hast scattered us, thou hast been displeased; O turn thyself to us again. 
Tho
766, come to repentance. 
But the day of the Lord will come as a thief in the night; in the which the heavens shall pass away with a great noise, and the elements shall melt with fervent heat, the earth also and the works that are therein shall be burned up. 
Seeing then that all these things shall be dissolved, what manner of persons ought ye to be in all holy conversation and godliness, 
Looking for and hasting unto the coming of the day of God, wherein the heavens being on fire shall be dissolved, and the elements shall melt with fervent heat? 
Nevertheless we, according to his promise, look for new heavens and a new earth, wherein dwelleth righteousness. 
Wherefore, beloved, seeing that ye look for such things, be diligent that ye may be found of him in pe
818,he one in Bethel, and the other put he in Dan. 
And this thing became a sin: for the people went to worship before the one, even unto Dan. 
And he made an house of high places, and made priests of the lowest of the people, which were not of the sons of Levi. 
And Jeroboam ordained a feast in the eighth month, on the fifteenth day of the month, like unto the feast that is in Judah, and he offered upon the altar. So did he in Bethel, sacrificing unto the calves that he had made: and he placed in Bethel the priests of the high places which he had made. 
So he offered upon the altar which he had made in Bethel the fifteenth day of the eighth month, even in the month which he had devised of his own heart; and ordained a feast unto the children of Israel: and he offered upon the altar, and burnt incense. 
And, be
639,d they departed quickly from the sepulchre with fear and great joy; and did run to bring his disciples word. 
And as they went to tell his disciples, behold, Jesus met them, saying, All hail. And they came and held him by the feet, and worshipped him. 
Then said Jesus unto them, Be not afraid: go tell my brethren that they go into Galilee, and there shall they see me. 
Now when they were going, behold, some of the watch came into the city, and shewed unto the chief priests all the things that were done. 
And when they were assembled with the elders, and had taken counsel, they gave large money unto the soldiers, 
Saying, Say ye, Hi
597, of Jeroboam; and because he killed him. 
In the twenty and sixth year of Asa king of Judah began Elah the son of Baasha to reign over Israel in Tirzah, two years. 
And his servant Zimri, captain of half his chariots, conspired against him, as he was in Tirzah, drinking himself drunk in the house of Arza steward of his house in Tirzah. 
And Zimri went in and smote him, and killed him, in the twenty and seventh year of Asa king of Judah, and reigned in his stead. 
And it came to pass, when he began to reign, as soon as he sat on his throne, that he slew all the house of Baasha: he left him n
799,e wheels. 
When those went, these went; and when those stood, these stood; and when those were lifted up from the earth, the wheels were lifted up over against them: for the spirit of the living creature was in the wheels. 
And the likeness of the firmament upon the heads of the living creature was as the colour of the terrible crystal, stretched forth over their heads above. 
And under the firmament were their wings straight, the one toward the other: every one had two, which covered on this side, and every one had two, which covered on that side, their bodies. 
And when they went, I heard the noise of their wings, like the noise of great waters, as the voice of the Almighty, the voice of speech, as the noise of an host: when they stood, they let down their wings. 
And there was a voice 
590,in the land of the living. 
Wait on the LORD: be of good courage, and he shall strengthen thine heart: wait, I say, on the LORD. 
Unto thee will I cry, O LORD my rock; be not silent to me: lest, if thou be silent to me, I become like them that go down into the pit. 
Hear the voice of my supplications, when I cry unto thee, when I lift up my hands toward thy holy oracle. 
Draw me not away with the wicked, and with the workers of iniquity, which speak peace to their neighbours, but mischief is in their hearts. 
Give them according to their deeds, and according to the wickedness of thei
783, the belly. 
He also that is slothful in his work is brother to him that is a great waster. 
The name of the LORD is a strong tower: the righteous runneth into it, and is safe. 
The rich man's wealth is his strong city, and as an high wall in his own conceit. 
Before destruction the heart of man is haughty, and before honour is humility. 
He that answereth a matter before he heareth it, it is folly and shame unto him. 
The spirit of a man will sustain his infirmity; but a wounded spirit who can bear? 
The heart of the prudent getteth knowledge; and the ear of the wise seeketh knowledge. 
A man's gift maketh room for him, and bringeth him before great men. 
He that is first in his own cause seemeth just; but his neighbour cometh and searcheth him. 
The lot causeth contentio
686, not be revealed; neither hid, that shall not be known. 
Therefore whatsoever ye have spoken in darkness shall be heard in the light; and that which ye have spoken in the ear in closets shall be proclaimed upon the housetops. 
And I say unto you my friends, Be not afraid of them that kill the body, and after that have no more that they can do. 
But I will forewarn you whom ye shall fear: Fear him, which after he hath killed hath power to cast into hell; yea, I say unto you, Fear him. 
Are not five sparrows sold for two farthings, and not one of them is forgotten before God? 
But even the very hairs of your head are all numbered. Fear not therefore: ye are of more value than man
798,on of Zeror, the son of Bechorath, the son of Aphiah, a Benjamite, a mighty man of power. 
And he had a son, whose name was Saul, a choice young man, and a goodly: and there was not among the children of Israel a goodlier person than he: from his shoulders and upward he was higher than any of the people. 
And the asses of Kish Saul's father were lost. And Kish said to Saul his son, Take now one of the servants with thee, and arise, go seek the asses. 
And he passed through mount Ephraim, and passed through the land of Shalisha, but they found them not: then they passed through the land of Shalim, and there they were not: and he passed through the land of the Benjamites, but they found them not. 
And when they were come to the land of Zuph, Saul said to his servant that was with him, Come
784,hey asked, By what power, or by what name, have ye done this? 
Then Peter, filled with the Holy Ghost, said unto them, Ye rulers of the people, and elders of Israel, 
If we this day be examined of the good deed done to the impotent man, by what means he is made whole; 
Be it known unto you all, and to all the people of Israel, that by the name of Jesus Christ of Nazareth, whom ye crucified, whom God raised from the dead, even by him doth this man stand here before you whole. 
This is the stone which was set at nought of you builders, which is become the head of the corner. 
Neither is there salvation in any other: for there is none other name under heaven given among men, whereby we must be saved. 
Now when they saw the boldness of Peter and John, and perceived that they we
773,he sanctify his field from the year of jubile, according to thy estimation it shall stand. 
But if he sanctify his field after the jubile, then the priest shall reckon unto him the money according to the years that remain, even unto the year of the jubile, and it shall be abated from thy estimation. 
And if he that sanctified the field will in any wise redeem it, then he shall add the fifth part of the money of thy estimation unto it, and it shall be assured to him. 
And if he will not redeem the field, or if he have sold the field to another man, it shall not be redeemed any more. 
But the field, when it goeth out in the jubile, shall be holy unto the LORD, as a field devoted; the possession thereof shall be the priest's. 
And if a man sanctify unto the LORD a f
649,n all the leaves of her spring, even without great power or many people to pluck it up by the roots thereof. 
Yea, behold, being planted, shall it prosper? shall it not utterly wither, when the east wind toucheth it? it shall wither in the furrows where it grew. 
Moreover the word of the LORD came unto me, saying, 
Say now to the rebellious house, Know ye not what these things mean? tell them, Behold, the king of Babylon is come to Jerusalem, and hath taken the king thereof, and the princes thereof, and led them with him to Babylon; 
And hath taken of the king's seed, and made a covenant with him, and hath taken an oath of him: he hath also 
607,his kingdom was full of darkness; and they gnawed their tongues for pain, 
And blasphemed the God of heaven because of their pains and their sores, and repented not of their deeds. 
And the sixth angel poured out his vial upon the great river Euphrates; and the water thereof was dried up, that the way of the kings of the east might be prepared. 
And I saw three unclean spirits like frogs come out of the mouth of the dragon, and out of the mouth of the beast, and out of the mouth of the false prophet. 
For they are the spirits of devils, working miracles, which go forth unto the kings of the earth and
714,a sword. And they brought a sword before the king. 
And the king said, Divide the living child in two, and give half to the one, and half to the other. 
Then spake the woman whose the living child was unto the king, for her bowels yearned upon her son, and she said, O my lord, give her the living child, and in no wise slay it. But the other said, Let it be neither mine nor thine, but divide it. 
Then the king answered and said, Give her the living child, and in no wise slay it: she is the mother thereof. 
And all Israel heard of the judgment which the king had judged; and they feared the king: for they saw that the wisdom of God was in him, to do judgment. 
So king Solomon was king over all Israel. 
And t
748,ervants shall continue, and their seed shall be established before thee. 
Bless the LORD, O my soul: and all that is within me, bless his holy name. 
Bless the LORD, O my soul, and forget not all his benefits: 
Who forgiveth all thine iniquities; who healeth all thy diseases; 
Who redeemeth thy life from destruction; who crowneth thee with lovingkindness and tender mercies; 
Who satisfieth thy mouth with good things; so that thy youth is renewed like the eagle's. 
The LORD executeth righteousness and judgment for all that are oppressed. 
He made known his ways unto Moses, his acts unto the children of Israel. 
The LORD is merciful and gracious, slow to anger, and plenteous in mercy. 
He will not always chide: neither will he keep his ange
665,and to Zephaniah the son of Maaseiah the priest, and to all the priests, saying, 
The LORD hath made thee priest in the stead of Jehoiada the priest, that ye should be officers in the house of the LORD, for every man that is mad, and maketh himself a prophet, that thou shouldest put him in prison, and in the stocks. 
Now therefore why hast thou not reproved Jeremiah of Anathoth, which maketh himself a prophet to you? 
For therefore he sent unto us in Babylon, saying, This captivity is long: build ye houses, and dwell in them; and plant gardens, and eat the fruit of them. 
And Zephaniah the priest read this letter in the ears of Jeremiah the prophet. 
Then c
716,ation, and a thing of nought, and the deceit of their heart. 
Therefore thus saith the LORD concerning the prophets that prophesy in my name, and I sent them not, yet they say, Sword and famine shall not be in this land; By sword and famine shall those prophets be consumed. 
And the people to whom they prophesy shall be cast out in the streets of Jerusalem because of the famine and the sword; and they shall have none to bury them, them, their wives, nor their sons, nor their daughters: for I will pour their wickedness upon them. 
Therefore thou shalt say this word unto them; Let mine eyes run down with tears night and day, and let them not cease: for the virgin daughter of my people is broken with a great b
578,d it shall come to pass in that day, that every place shall be, where there were a thousand vines at a thousand silverlings, it shall even be for briers and thorns. 
With arrows and with bows shall men come thither; because all the land shall become briers and thorns. 
And on all hills that shall be digged with the mattock, there shall not come thither the fear of briers and thorns: but it shall be for the sending forth of oxen, and for the treading of lesser cattle. 
Moreover the LORD said unto me, Take thee a great roll, and write in it with a man's pen concerning Maher
739,ave received their inheritance, which Moses gave them, beyond Jordan eastward, even as Moses the servant of the LORD gave them; 
From Aroer, that is upon the bank of the river Arnon, and the city that is in the midst of the river, and all the plain of Medeba unto Dibon; 
And all the cities of Sihon king of the Amorites, which reigned in Heshbon, unto the border of the children of Ammon; 
And Gilead, and the border of the Geshurites and Maachathites, and all mount Hermon, and all Bashan unto Salcah; 
All the kingdom of Og in Bashan, which reigned in Ashtaroth and in Edrei, who remained of the remnant of the giants: for these did Moses smite, and cast them out. 
Nevertheless the children of Israel expelled not the Geshurites, nor t
644,old, and rent, and bound up; 
And old shoes and clouted upon their feet, and old garments upon them; and all the bread of their provision was dry and mouldy. 
And they went to Joshua unto the camp at Gilgal, and said unto him, and to the men of Israel, We be come from a far country: now therefore make ye a league with us. 
And the men of Israel said unto the Hivites, Peradventure ye dwell among us; and how shall we make a league with you? 
And they said unto Joshua, We are thy servants. And Joshua said unto them, Who are ye? and from whence come ye? 
And they said unto him, From a very far country thy servants are come because of the na
644,t hour. 
And when Jesus came into the ruler's house, and saw the minstrels and the people making a noise, 
He said unto them, Give place: for the maid is not dead, but sleepeth. And they laughed him to scorn. 
But when the people were put forth, he went in, and took her by the hand, and the maid arose. 
And the fame hereof went abroad into all that land. 
And when Jesus departed thence, two blind men followed him, crying, and saying, Thou son of David, have mercy on us. 
And when he was come into the house, the blind men came to him: and Jesus saith unto them, Believe ye that I am able to do this? They said unto him, Yea, Lord. 
Then to
593,he offering of Eliab the son of Helon. 
On the fourth day Elizur the son of Shedeur, prince of the children of Reuben, did offer: 
His offering was one silver charger of the weight of an hundred and thirty shekels, one silver bowl of seventy shekels, after the shekel of the sanctuary; both of them full of fine flour mingled with oil for a meat offering: 
One golden spoon of ten shekels, full of incense: 
One young bullock, one ram, one lamb of the first year, for a burnt offering: 
One kid of the goats for a sin offering: 
And for a sacrifice of peace offerings, two oxen, five rams, fiv
607,y departed from before Pihahiroth, and passed through the midst of the sea into the wilderness, and went three days'journey in the wilderness of Etham, and pitched in Marah. 
And they removed from Marah, and came unto Elim: and in Elim were twelve fountains of water, and threescore and ten palm trees; and they pitched there. 
And they removed from Elim, and encamped by the Red sea. 
And they removed from the Red sea, and encamped in the wilderness of Sin. 
And they took their journey out of the wilderness of Sin, and encamped in Dophkah. 
And they departed from Dophkah, and encamped in Alush. 
And th
651,will scourge you in their synagogues; 
And ye shall be brought before governors and kings for my sake, for a testimony against them and the Gentiles. 
But when they deliver you up, take no thought how or what ye shall speak: for it shall be given you in that same hour what ye shall speak. 
For it is not ye that speak, but the Spirit of your Father which speaketh in you. 
And the brother shall deliver up the brother to death, and the father the child: and the children shall rise up against their parents, and cause them to be put to death. 
And ye shall be hated of all men for my name's sake: but he that endureth to the end shall be saved. 
But 
793,iends of the mammon of unrighteousness; that, when ye fail, they may receive you into everlasting habitations. 
He that is faithful in that which is least is faithful also in much: and he that is unjust in the least is unjust also in much. 
If therefore ye have not been faithful in the unrighteous mammon, who will commit to your trust the true riches? 
And if ye have not been faithful in that which is another man's, who shall give you that which is your own? 
No servant can serve two masters: for either he will hate the one, and love the other; or else he will hold to the one, and despise the other. Ye cannot serve God and mammon. 
And the Pharisees also, who were covetous, heard all these things: and they derided him. 
And he said unto them, Ye are they which justify yourselves bef
679,he sword which I will send among you. 
And it shall be, if they refuse to take the cup at thine hand to drink, then shalt thou say unto them, Thus saith the LORD of hosts; Ye shall certainly drink. 
For, lo, I begin to bring evil on the city which is called by my name, and should ye be utterly unpunished? Ye shall not be unpunished: for I will call for a sword upon all the inhabitants of the earth, saith the LORD of hosts. 
Therefore prophesy thou against them all these words, and say unto them, The LORD shall roar from on high, and utter his voice from his holy habitation; he shall mightily roar upon his habitation; he shall give a shout, as they that tread the grapes, 
577,hall keep it a feast to the LORD throughout your generations; ye shall keep it a feast by an ordinance for ever. 
Seven days shall ye eat unleavened bread; even the first day ye shall put away leaven out of your houses: for whosoever eateth leavened bread from the first day until the seventh day, that soul shall be cut off from Israel. 
And in the first day there shall be an holy convocation, and in the seventh day there shall be an holy convocation to you; no manner of work shall be done in them, save that which every man must eat, that only may be done of you. 
And ye 
572,hall not fail nor be discouraged, till he have set judgment in the earth: and the isles shall wait for his law. 
Thus saith God the LORD, he that created the heavens, and stretched them out; he that spread forth the earth, and that which cometh out of it; he that giveth breath unto the people upon it, and spirit to them that walk therein: 
I the LORD have called thee in righteousness, and will hold thine hand, and will keep thee, and give thee for a covenant of the people, for a light of the Gentiles; 
To open the blind eyes, to bring out the prisoners from the pris
761,e mercy, and have compassion upon thee, and multiply thee, as he hath sworn unto thy fathers; 
When thou shalt hearken to the voice of the LORD thy God, to keep all his commandments which I command thee this day, to do that which is right in the eyes of the LORD thy God. 
Ye are the children of the LORD your God: ye shall not cut yourselves, nor make any baldness between your eyes for the dead. 
For thou art an holy people unto the LORD thy God, and the LORD hath chosen thee to be a peculiar people unto himself, above all the nations that are upon the earth. 
Thou shalt not eat any abominable thing. 
These are the beasts which ye shall eat: the ox, the sheep, and the goat, 
The hart, and the roebuck, and the fallow deer, and the wild goat, and the pyg
768, the place where thou art northward, and southward, and eastward, and westward: 
For all the land which thou seest, to thee will I give it, and to thy seed for ever. 
And I will make thy seed as the dust of the earth: so that if a man can number the dust of the earth, then shall thy seed also be numbered. 
Arise, walk through the land in the length of it and in the breadth of it; for I will give it unto thee. 
Then Abram removed his tent, and came and dwelt in the plain of Mamre, which is in Hebron, and built there an altar unto the LORD. 
And it came to pass in the days of Amraphel king of Shinar, Arioch king of Ellasar, Chedorlaomer king of Elam, and Tidal king of nations; 
That these made war with Bera king of Sodom, and with Birsha king of Gomorrah, Shin
708,he ark of our God to us: for we enquired not at it in the days of Saul. 
And all the congregation said that they would do so: for the thing was right in the eyes of all the people. 
So David gathered all Israel together, from Shihor of Egypt even unto the entering of Hemath, to bring the ark of God from Kirjathjearim. 
And David went up, and all Israel, to Baalah, that is, to Kirjathjearim, which belonged to Judah, to bring up thence the ark of God the LORD, that dwelleth between the cherubims, whose name is called on it. 
And they carried the ark of God in a new cart out of the house of Abinadab: and Uzza and Ahio drave the cart. 
And David and all Israel played before God with all their might, and
747,the villages thereof, and called it Nobah, after his own name. 
These are the journeys of the children of Israel, which went forth out of the land of Egypt with their armies under the hand of Moses and Aaron. 
And Moses wrote their goings out according to their journeys by the commandment of the LORD: and these are their journeys according to their goings out. 
And they departed from Rameses in the first month, on the fifteenth day of the first month; on the morrow after the passover the children of Israel went out with an high hand in the sight of all the Egyptians. 
For the Egyptians buried all their firstborn, which the LORD had smitten among them: upon their gods also the LORD executed judgments. 
And the children of Israel removed f
797,hem that mourn in Zion, to give unto them beauty for ashes, the oil of joy for mourning, the garment of praise for the spirit of heaviness; that they might be called trees of righteousness, the planting of the LORD, that he might be glorified. 
And they shall build the old wastes, they shall raise up the former desolations, and they shall repair the waste cities, the desolations of many generations. 
And strangers shall stand and feed your flocks, and the sons of the alien shall be your plowmen and your vinedressers. 
But ye shall be named the Priests of the LORD: men shall call you the Ministers of our God: ye shall eat the riches of the Gentiles, and in their glory shall ye boast yourselves. 
For your shame ye shall have double; and for confusion they shall rejoice in their portion: t
784,t same night; and took of that which came to his hand a present for Esau his brother; 
Two hundred she goats, and twenty he goats, two hundred ewes, and twenty rams, 
Thirty milch camels with their colts, forty kine, and ten bulls, twenty she asses, and ten foals. 
And he delivered them into the hand of his servants, every drove by themselves; and said unto his servants, Pass over before me, and put a space betwixt drove and drove. 
And he commanded the foremost, saying, When Esau my brother meeteth thee, and asketh thee, saying, Whose art thou? and whither goest thou? and whose are these before thee? 
Then thou shalt say, They be thy servant Jacob's; it is a present sent unto my lord Esau: and, behold, also he is behind us. 
And so commanded he the second, and the third, a
786,er, Go up in peace to thine house; see, I have hearkened to thy voice, and have accepted thy person. 
And Abigail came to Nabal; and, behold, he held a feast in his house, like the feast of a king; and Nabal's heart was merry within him, for he was very drunken: wherefore she told him nothing, less or more, until the morning light. 
But it came to pass in the morning, when the wine was gone out of Nabal, and his wife had told him these things, that his heart died within him, and he became as a stone. 
And it came to pass about ten days after, that the LORD smote Nabal, that he died. 
And when David heard that Nabal was dead, he said, Blessed be the LORD, that hath pleaded the cause of my reproach from the hand of Nabal, and hath kept his servant from evil: for the LORD hath r
833,d unto him, Thus saith the king, Come forth. And he said, Nay; but I will die here. And Benaiah brought the king word again, saying, Thus said Joab, and thus he answered me. 
And the king said unto him, Do as he hath said, and fall upon him, and bury him; that thou mayest take away the innocent blood, which Joab shed, from me, and from the house of my father. 
And the LORD shall return his blood upon his own head, who fell upon two men more righteous and better than he, and slew them with the sword, my father David not knowing thereof, to wit, Abner the son of Ner, captain of the host of Israel, and Amasa the son of Jether, captain of the host of Judah. 
Their blood shall therefore return upon the head of Joab, and upon the head of his seed for ever: but upon David, and upon his seed, and upon his house, and upon his thro
826,e hand of the Philistines. 
And Samuel took a sucking lamb, and offered it for a burnt offering wholly unto the LORD: and Samuel cried unto the LORD for Israel; and the LORD heard him. 
And as Samuel was offering up the burnt offering, the Philistines drew near to battle against Israel: but the LORD thundered with a great thunder on that day upon the Philistines, and discomfited them; and they were smitten before Israel. 
And the men of Israel went out of Mizpeh, and pursued the Philistines, and smote them, until they came under Bethcar. 
Then Samuel took a stone, and set it between Mizpeh and Shen, and called the name of it Ebenezer, saying, Hitherto hath the LORD helped us. 
So the Philistines were subdued, and they came no more into the coast of Israel: and the hand of the LORD was against the Philistines all th
738,asphemed me, in that they have committed a trespass against me. 
For when I had brought them into the land, for the which I lifted up mine hand to give it to them, then they saw every high hill, and all the thick trees, and they offered there their sacrifices, and there they presented the provocation of their offering: there also they made their sweet savour, and poured out there their drink offerings. 
Then I said unto them, What is the high place whereunto ye go? And the name whereof is called Bamah unto this day. 
Wherefore say unto the house of Israel, Thus saith the Lord GOD; Are ye polluted after the manner of your fathers? and commit ye whoredom after their abominations? 
For when ye offer your gifts, when ye make your so
709,the rings by the sides of the ark, that the ark may be borne with them. 
The staves shall be in the rings of the ark: they shall not be taken from it. 
And thou shalt put into the ark the testimony which I shall give thee. 
And thou shalt make a mercy seat of pure gold: two cubits and a half shall be the length thereof, and a cubit and a half the breadth thereof. 
And thou shalt make two cherubims of gold, of beaten work shalt thou make them, in the two ends of the mercy seat. 
And make one cherub on the one end, and the other cherub on the other end: even of the mercy seat shall ye make the cherubims on the two ends thereof. 
And the cherubims shall stretch forth their wings on high, covering the me
720,
They came round about me daily like water; they compassed me about together. 
Lover and friend hast thou put far from me, and mine acquaintance into darkness. 
I will sing of the mercies of the LORD for ever: with my mouth will I make known thy faithfulness to all generations. 
For I have said, Mercy shall be built up for ever: thy faithfulness shalt thou establish in the very heavens. 
I have made a covenant with my chosen, I have sworn unto David my servant, 
Thy seed will I establish for ever, and build up thy throne to all generations. Selah. 
And the heavens shall praise thy wonders, O LORD: thy faithfulness also in the congregation of the saints. 
For who in the heaven can be compared unto the LORD? who 
706,as fear God, men of truth, hating covetousness; and place such over them, to be rulers of thousands, and rulers of hundreds, rulers of fifties, and rulers of tens: 
And let them judge the people at all seasons: and it shall be, that every great matter they shall bring unto thee, but every small matter they shall judge: so shall it be easier for thyself, and they shall bear the burden with thee. 
If thou shalt do this thing, and God command thee so, then thou shalt be able to endure, and all this people shall also go to their place in peace. 
So Moses hearkened to the voice of his father in law, and did all that he had said. 
And Moses chose able men out of all Israel, and made them heads over the 
669, the pools. 
They go from strength to strength, every one of them in Zion appeareth before God. 
O LORD God of hosts, hear my prayer: give ear, O God of Jacob. Selah. 
Behold, O God our shield, and look upon the face of thine anointed. 
For a day in thy courts is better than a thousand. I had rather be a doorkeeper in the house of my God, than to dwell in the tents of wickedness. 
For the LORD God is a sun and shield: the LORD will give grace and glory: no good thing will he withhold from them that walk uprightly. 
O LORD of hosts, blessed is the man that trusteth in thee. 
Lord, thou hast been favourable unto thy land: thou hast brought back the captivity of J
608,thee in time to come, saying, What is this? that thou shalt say unto him, By strength of hand the LORD brought us out from Egypt, from the house of bondage: 
And it came to pass, when Pharaoh would hardly let us go, that the LORD slew all the firstborn in the land of Egypt, both the firstborn of man, and the firstborn of beast: therefore I sacrifice to the LORD all that openeth the matrix, being males; but all the firstborn of my children I redeem. 
And it shall be for a token upon thine hand, and for frontlets between thine eyes: for by strength of hand the LORD brought us forth out of Egypt. 
And it
752,he prophesied that Jesus should die for that nation; 
And not for that nation only, but that also he should gather together in one the children of God that were scattered abroad. 
Then from that day forth they took counsel together for to put him to death. 
Jesus therefore walked no more openly among the Jews; but went thence unto a country near to the wilderness, into a city called Ephraim, and there continued with his disciples. 
And the Jews' passover was nigh at hand: and many went out of the country up to Jerusalem before the passover, to purify themselves. 
Then sought they for Jesus, and spake among themselves, as they stood in the temple, What think ye, that he will not come to the feast? 
Now both the chief priests and the Pharisees 
566,e God of hosts, the God of Israel; If thou wilt assuredly go forth unto the king of Babylon's princes, then thy soul shall live, and this city shall not be burned with fire; and thou shalt live, and thine house: 
But if thou wilt not go forth to the king of Babylon's princes, then shall this city be given into the hand of the Chaldeans, and they shall burn it with fire, and thou shalt not escape out of their hand. 
And Zedekiah the king said unto Jeremiah, I am afraid of the Jews that are fallen to the Chaldeans, lest they deliver me into their hand, and they 
601,ural branches, be graffed into their own olive tree? 
For I would not, brethren, that ye should be ignorant of this mystery, lest ye should be wise in your own conceits; that blindness in part is happened to Israel, until the fulness of the Gentiles be come in. 
And so all Israel shall be saved: as it is written, There shall come out of Sion the Deliverer, and shall turn away ungodliness from Jacob: 
For this is my covenant unto them, when I shall take away their sins. 
As concerning the gospel, they are enemies for your sakes: but as touching the election, they are beloved for the father's sak
834,er: 
Even an heritage unto Israel his servant: for his mercy endureth for ever. 
Who remembered us in our low estate: for his mercy endureth for ever: 
And hath redeemed us from our enemies: for his mercy endureth for ever. 
Who giveth food to all flesh: for his mercy endureth for ever. 
O give thanks unto the God of heaven: for his mercy endureth for ever. 
By the rivers of Babylon, there we sat down, yea, we wept, when we remembered Zion. 
We hanged our harps upon the willows in the midst thereof. 
For there they that carried us away captive required of us a song; and they that wasted us required of us mirth, saying, Sing us one of the songs of Zion. 
How shall we sing the LORD's song in a strange land? 
If I forget thee, O Jerusalem, let my right hand forget her cunning. 
If I do not remember thee, let my tongue cleave 
580,ngdoms, there is none like unto thee. 
But they are altogether brutish and foolish: the stock is a doctrine of vanities. 
Silver spread into plates is brought from Tarshish, and gold from Uphaz, the work of the workman, and of the hands of the founder: blue and purple is their clothing: they are all the work of cunning men. 
But the LORD is the true God, he is the living God, and an everlasting king: at his wrath the earth shall tremble, and the nations shall not be able to abide his indignation. 
Thus shall ye say unto them, The gods that have not made the heavens and the 
836,es. 
But what went ye out for to see? A prophet? yea, I say unto you, and more than a prophet. 
For this is he, of whom it is written, Behold, I send my messenger before thy face, which shall prepare thy way before thee. 
Verily I say unto you, Among them that are born of women there hath not risen a greater than John the Baptist: notwithstanding he that is least in the kingdom of heaven is greater than he. 
And from the days of John the Baptist until now the kingdom of heaven suffereth violence, and the violent take it by force. 
For all the prophets and the law prophesied until John. 
And if ye will receive it, this is Elias, which was for to come. 
He that hath ears to hear, let him hear. 
But whereunto shall I liken this generation? It is like unto children sitting in the markets, and calling unto their fellows, 
And say
768,A man that flattereth his neighbour spreadeth a net for his feet. 
In the transgression of an evil man there is a snare: but the righteous doth sing and rejoice. 
The righteous considereth the cause of the poor: but the wicked regardeth not to know it. 
Scornful men bring a city into a snare: but wise men turn away wrath. 
If a wise man contendeth with a foolish man, whether he rage or laugh, there is no rest. 
The bloodthirsty hate the upright: but the just seek his soul. 
A fool uttereth all his mind: but a wise man keepeth it in till afterwards. 
If a ruler hearken to lies, all his servants are wicked. 
The poor and the deceitful man meet together: the LORD lighteneth both their eyes. 
The king that faithfully judgeth the poor, his throne shall be establi
674,lt turn back and cover that which cometh from thee: 
For the LORD thy God walketh in the midst of thy camp, to deliver thee, and to give up thine enemies before thee; therefore shall thy camp be holy: that he see no unclean thing in thee, and turn away from thee. 
Thou shalt not deliver unto his master the servant which is escaped from his master unto thee: 
He shall dwell with thee, even among you, in that place which he shall choose in one of thy gates, where it liketh him best: thou shalt not oppress him. 
There shall be no whore of the daughters of Israel, nor a sodomite of the sons of Israel. 
Thou shalt not bring the hire of a whore, or the price of a dog, int
652,and from the north even to the east, they shall run to and fro to seek the word of the LORD, and shall not find it. 
In that day shall the fair virgins and young men faint for thirst. 
They that swear by the sin of Samaria, and say, Thy god, O Dan, liveth; and, The manner of Beersheba liveth; even they shall fall, and never rise up again. 
I saw the LORD standing upon the altar: and he said, Smite the lintel of the door, that the posts may shake: and cut them in the head, all of them; and I will slay the last of them with the sword: he that fleeth of them shall not flee away, and he that escapeth of them shall not be delivered. 
Though they dig
592,re fell of Benjamin eighteen thousand men; all these were men of valour. 
And they turned and fled toward the wilderness unto the rock of Rimmon: and they gleaned of them in the highways five thousand men; and pursued hard after them unto Gidom, and slew two thousand men of them. 
So that all which fell that day of Benjamin were twenty and five thousand men that drew the sword; all these were men of valour. 
But six hundred men turned and fled to the wilderness unto the rock Rimmon, and abode in the rock Rimmon four months. 
And the men of Israel turned again upon the children of Benja
815,gh hand join in hand, the wicked shall not be unpunished: but the seed of the righteous shall be delivered. 
As a jewel of gold in a swine's snout, so is a fair woman which is without discretion. 
The desire of the righteous is only good: but the expectation of the wicked is wrath. 
There is that scattereth, and yet increaseth; and there is that withholdeth more than is meet, but it tendeth to poverty. 
The liberal soul shall be made fat: and he that watereth shall be watered also himself. 
He that withholdeth corn, the people shall curse him: but blessing shall be upon the head of him that selleth it. 
He that diligently seeketh good procureth favour: but he that seeketh mischief, it shall come unto him. 
He that trusteth in his riches shall fall; but the righteous shall flourish as a branch. 
He that t
660,, and his chosen with gladness: 
And gave them the lands of the heathen: and they inherited the labour of the people; 
That they might observe his statutes, and keep his laws. Praise ye the LORD. 
Praise ye the LORD. O give thanks unto the LORD; for he is good: for his mercy endureth for ever. 
Who can utter the mighty acts of the LORD? who can shew forth all his praise? 
Blessed are they that keep judgment, and he that doeth righteousness at all times. 
Remember me, O LORD, with the favour that thou bearest unto thy people: O visit me with thy salvation; 
That I may see the good of thy chosen, that I may rejoice in the gladness of thy nation, that I m
685,esus to them again, Peace be unto you: as my Father hath sent me, even so send I you. 
And when he had said this, he breathed on them, and saith unto them, Receive ye the Holy Ghost: 
Whose soever sins ye remit, they are remitted unto them; and whose soever sins ye retain, they are retained. 
But Thomas, one of the twelve, called Didymus, was not with them when Jesus came. 
The other disciples therefore said unto him, We have seen the LORD. But he said unto them, Except I shall see in his hands the print of the nails, and put my finger into the print of the nails, and thrust my hand into his side, I will not believe. 
And after eight days again his disciples were within, and T
657,imon called Peter, and Andrew his brother, casting a net into the sea: for they were fishers. 
And he saith unto them, Follow me, and I will make you fishers of men. 
And they straightway left their nets, and followed him. 
And going on from thence, he saw other two brethren, James the son of Zebedee, and John his brother, in a ship with Zebedee their father, mending their nets; and he called them. 
And they immediately left the ship and their father, and followed him. 
And Jesus went about all Galilee, teaching in their synagogues, and preaching the gospel of the kingdom, and healing all manner of sickness and all manner of disease among the people
653, he cometh to meet thee, and four hundred men with him. 
Then Jacob was greatly afraid and distressed: and he divided the people that was with him, and the flocks, and herds, and the camels, into two bands; 
And said, If Esau come to the one company, and smite it, then the other company which is left shall escape. 
And Jacob said, O God of my father Abraham, and God of my father Isaac, the LORD which saidst unto me, Return unto thy country, and to thy kindred, and I will deal well with thee: 
I am not worthy of the least of all the mercies, and of all the truth, which thou hast shewed unto thy servant; for with my staff I passed over this Jordan
757, thou art Peter, and upon this rock I will build my church; and the gates of hell shall not prevail against it. 
And I will give unto thee the keys of the kingdom of heaven: and whatsoever thou shalt bind on earth shall be bound in heaven: and whatsoever thou shalt loose on earth shall be loosed in heaven. 
Then charged he his disciples that they should tell no man that he was Jesus the Christ. 
From that time forth began Jesus to shew unto his disciples, how that he must go unto Jerusalem, and suffer many things of the elders and chief priests and scribes, and be killed, and be raised again the third day. 
Then Peter took him, and began to rebuke him, saying, Be it far from thee, Lord: this shall not be unto thee. 
But he turned, and said unto Pe
761, hundred. All these did Sheshbazzar bring up with them of the captivity that were brought up from Babylon unto Jerusalem. 
Now these are the children of the province that went up out of the captivity, of those which had been carried away, whom Nebuchadnezzar the king of Babylon had carried away unto Babylon, and came again unto Jerusalem and Judah, every one unto his city; 
Which came with Zerubbabel: Jeshua, Nehemiah, Seraiah, Reelaiah, Mordecai, Bilshan, Mizpar, Bigvai, Rehum, Baanah. The number of the men of the people of Israel: 
The children of Parosh, two thousand an hundred seventy and two. 
The children of Shephatiah, three hundred seventy and two. 
The children of Arah, seven hundred seventy and five. 
The children of Pahathmoab, of the child
649,o smell thereto, shall even be cut off from his people. 
And the LORD spake unto Moses, saying, 
See, I have called by name Bezaleel the son of Uri, the son of Hur, of the tribe of Judah: 
And I have filled him with the spirit of God, in wisdom, and in understanding, and in knowledge, and in all manner of workmanship, 
To devise cunning works, to work in gold, and in silver, and in brass, 
And in cutting of stones, to set them, and in carving of timber, to work in all manner of workmanship. 
And I, behold, I have given with him Aholiab, the son of Ahisamach, of the tribe of Dan: and in the hearts of all that are wise hearted I have put wisdo
760,readeth upon the high places of the earth, The LORD, The God of hosts, is his name. 
Hear ye this word which I take up against you, even a lamentation, O house of Israel. 
The virgin of Israel is fallen; she shall no more rise: she is forsaken upon her land; there is none to raise her up. 
For thus saith the Lord GOD; The city that went out by a thousand shall leave an hundred, and that which went forth by an hundred shall leave ten, to the house of Israel. 
For thus saith the LORD unto the house of Israel, Seek ye me, and ye shall live: 
But seek not Bethel, nor enter into Gilgal, and pass not to Beersheba: for Gilgal shall surely go into captivity, and Bethel shall come to nought. 
Seek the LORD, and ye shall live; lest he break out like fire in th
592,r form, and set them in the temple, five on the right hand, and five on the left. 
He made also ten tables, and placed them in the temple, five on the right side, and five on the left. And he made an hundred basons of gold. 
Furthermore he made the court of the priests, and the great court, and doors for the court, and overlaid the doors of them with brass. 
And he set the sea on the right side of the east end, over against the south. 
And Huram made the pots, and the shovels, and the basons. And Huram finished the work that he was to make for king Solomon for the house of God; 
To wit
838,ng of Elijah: and she, and he, and her house, did eat many days. 
And the barrel of meal wasted not, neither did the cruse of oil fail, according to the word of the LORD, which he spake by Elijah. 
And it came to pass after these things, that the son of the woman, the mistress of the house, fell sick; and his sickness was so sore, that there was no breath left in him. 
And she said unto Elijah, What have I to do with thee, O thou man of God? art thou come unto me to call my sin to remembrance, and to slay my son? 
And he said unto her, Give me thy son. And he took him out of her bosom, and carried him up into a loft, where he abode, and laid him upon his own bed. 
And he cried unto the LORD, and said, O LORD my God, hast thou also brought evil upon the widow with whom I sojourn, by slaying her son? 
And he stretched himself up
708, king shall be, whether in death or life, even there also will thy servant be. 
And David said to Ittai, Go and pass over. And Ittai the Gittite passed over, and all his men, and all the little ones that were with him. 
And all the country wept with a loud voice, and all the people passed over: the king also himself passed over the brook Kidron, and all the people passed over, toward the way of the wilderness. 
And lo Zadok also, and all the Levites were with him, bearing the ark of the covenant of God: and they set down the ark of God; and Abiathar went up, until all the people had done passing out of the city. 
And the king said unto Zadok, Carry back the ark of God into the city: if I shall find 
650,hen, The LORD hath done great things for them. 
The LORD hath done great things for us; whereof we are glad. 
Turn again our captivity, O LORD, as the streams in the south. 
They that sow in tears shall reap in joy. 
He that goeth forth and weepeth, bearing precious seed, shall doubtless come again with rejoicing, bringing his sheaves with him. 
Except the LORD build the house, they labour in vain that build it: except the LORD keep the city, the watchman waketh but in vain. 
It is vain for you to rise up early, to sit up late, to eat the bread of sorrows: for so he giveth his beloved sleep. 
Lo, children are an heritage of the LORD: and the 
772,res ran and returned as the appearance of a flash of lightning. 
Now as I beheld the living creatures, behold one wheel upon the earth by the living creatures, with his four faces. 
The appearance of the wheels and their work was like unto the colour of a beryl: and they four had one likeness: and their appearance and their work was as it were a wheel in the middle of a wheel. 
When they went, they went upon their four sides: and they turned not when they went. 
As for their rings, they were so high that they were dreadful; and their rings were full of eyes round about them four. 
And when the living creatures went, the wheels went by them: and when the living creatures were lifted up from the earth, the wheels were lifted up. 
Whithersoever the spirit was to go
606,ow, so did I chatter: I did mourn as a dove: mine eyes fail with looking upward: O LORD, I am oppressed; undertake for me. 
What shall I say? he hath both spoken unto me, and himself hath done it: I shall go softly all my years in the bitterness of my soul. 
O LORD, by these things men live, and in all these things is the life of my spirit: so wilt thou recover me, and make me to live. 
Behold, for peace I had great bitterness: but thou hast in love to my soul delivered it from the pit of corruption: for thou hast cast all my sins behind thy back. 
For the grave cannot praise thee, death can not cel
696, the word of God, and for the testimony which they held: 
And they cried with a loud voice, saying, How long, O Lord, holy and true, dost thou not judge and avenge our blood on them that dwell on the earth? 
And white robes were given unto every one of them; and it was said unto them, that they should rest yet for a little season, until their fellowservants also and their brethren, that should be killed as they were, should be fulfilled. 
And I beheld when he had opened the sixth seal, and, lo, there was a great earthquake; and the sun became black as sackcloth of hair, and the moon became as blood; 
And the stars of heaven fell unto the earth, even as a fig tree casteth her untimely fig
828,d it shall come to pass after the end of seventy years, that the LORD will visit Tyre, and she shall turn to her hire, and shall commit fornication with all the kingdoms of the world upon the face of the earth. 
And her merchandise and her hire shall be holiness to the LORD: it shall not be treasured nor laid up; for her merchandise shall be for them that dwell before the LORD, to eat sufficiently, and for durable clothing. 
Behold, the LORD maketh the earth empty, and maketh it waste, and turneth it upside down, and scattereth abroad the inhabitants thereof. 
And it shall be, as with the people, so with the priest; as with the servant, so with his master; as with the maid, so with her mistress; as with the buyer, so with the seller; as with the lender, so with the borrower; as with the taker of usury, so with the gi
802,o his pieces, and unto his head. 
And thou shalt burn the whole ram upon the altar: it is a burnt offering unto the LORD: it is a sweet savour, an offering made by fire unto the LORD. 
And thou shalt take the other ram; and Aaron and his sons shall put their hands upon the head of the ram. 
Then shalt thou kill the ram, and take of his blood, and put it upon the tip of the right ear of Aaron, and upon the tip of the right ear of his sons, and upon the thumb of their right hand, and upon the great toe of their right foot, and sprinkle the blood upon the altar round about. 
And thou shalt take of the blood that is upon the altar, and of the anointing oil, and sprinkle it upon Aaron, and upon his garments, and upon his sons, and upon the garments of his sons with him: and he shall be hallowed, 
727,into the den of lions? The king answered and said, The thing is true, according to the law of the Medes and Persians, which altereth not. 
Then answered they and said before the king, That Daniel, which is of the children of the captivity of Judah, regardeth not thee, O king, nor the decree that thou hast signed, but maketh his petition three times a day. 
Then the king, when he heard these words, was sore displeased with himself, and set his heart on Daniel to deliver him: and he laboured till the going down of the sun to deliver him. 
Then these men assembled unto the king, and said unto the king, Know, O king, that the law of the Medes and Persians is, That no decree nor statute which the king establisheth may be c
590,lleth an ox, or lamb, or goat, in the camp, or that killeth it out of the camp, 
And bringeth it not unto the door of the tabernacle of the congregation, to offer an offering unto the LORD before the tabernacle of the LORD; blood shall be imputed unto that man; he hath shed blood; and that man shall be cut off from among his people: 
To the end that the children of Israel may bring their sacrifices, which they offer in the open field, even that they may bring them unto the LORD, unto the door of the tabernacle of the congregation, unto the priest, and offer them for peace offerings u
728, was a true report that I heard in mine own land of thy acts and of thy wisdom. 
Howbeit I believed not the words, until I came, and mine eyes had seen it: and, behold, the half was not told me: thy wisdom and prosperity exceedeth the fame which I heard. 
Happy are thy men, happy are these thy servants, which stand continually before thee, and that hear thy wisdom. 
Blessed be the LORD thy God, which delighted in thee, to set thee on the throne of Israel: because the LORD loved Israel for ever, therefore made he thee king, to do judgment and justice. 
And she gave the king an hundred and twenty talents of gold, and of spices very great store, and precious stones: there came no more such abundance of spices as these whi
632,teous person in his own house upon his bed? shall I not therefore now require his blood of your hand, and take you away from the earth? 
And David commanded his young men, and they slew them, and cut off their hands and their feet, and hanged them up over the pool in Hebron. But they took the head of Ishbosheth, and buried it in the sepulchre of Abner in Hebron. 
Then came all the tribes of Israel to David unto Hebron, and spake, saying, Behold, we are thy bone and thy flesh. 
Also in time past, when Saul was king over us, thou wast he that leddest out and broughtest in Israel: and the LORD said to thee, Thou shalt feed my p
709, and the inhabitants of Jerusalem, Will ye not receive instruction to hearken to my words? saith the LORD. 
The words of Jonadab the son of Rechab, that he commanded his sons not to drink wine, are performed; for unto this day they drink none, but obey their father's commandment: notwithstanding I have spoken unto you, rising early and speaking; but ye hearkened not unto me. 
I have sent also unto you all my servants the prophets, rising up early and sending them, saying, Return ye now every man from his evil way, and amend your doings, and go not after other gods to serve them, and ye shall dwell in the land which I have given to you and to your fathers: but ye have not inclined your ear, nor hearke
733,nd by the border of Judah, from the east side unto the west side, shall be the offering which ye shall offer of five and twenty thousand reeds in breadth, and in length as one of the other parts, from the east side unto the west side: and the sanctuary shall be in the midst of it. 
The oblation that ye shall offer unto the LORD shall be of five and twenty thousand in length, and of ten thousand in breadth. 
And for them, even for the priests, shall be this holy oblation; toward the north five and twenty thousand in length, and toward the west ten thousand in breadth, and toward the east ten thousand in breadth, and toward the south five and twenty thousand in length: and the sanctuary of the LORD shall be in the midst there
647,e land is made desolate, because no man layeth it to heart. 
The spoilers are come upon all high places through the wilderness: for the sword of the LORD shall devour from the one end of the land even to the other end of the land: no flesh shall have peace. 
They have sown wheat, but shall reap thorns: they have put themselves to pain, but shall not profit: and they shall be ashamed of your revenues because of the fierce anger of the LORD. 
Thus saith the LORD against all mine evil neighbours, that touch the inheritance which I have caused my people Israel to inherit; Behold, I will pluck them out of their land, and pluck out the house of 
813,. 
And as one of them opened his sack to give his ass provender in the inn, he espied his money; for, behold, it was in his sack's mouth. 
And he said unto his brethren, My money is restored; and, lo, it is even in my sack: and their heart failed them, and they were afraid, saying one to another, What is this that God hath done unto us? 
And they came unto Jacob their father unto the land of Canaan, and told him all that befell unto them; saying, 
The man, who is the lord of the land, spake roughly to us, and took us for spies of the country. 
And we said unto him, We are true men; we are no spies: 
We be twelve brethren, sons of our father; one is not, and the youngest is this day with our father in the land of Canaan. 
And the man, the lord of the country, said unto us, Hereby shall I know that ye ar
757,e the outcasts; bewray not him that wandereth. 
Let mine outcasts dwell with thee, Moab; be thou a covert to them from the face of the spoiler: for the extortioner is at an end, the spoiler ceaseth, the oppressors are consumed out of the land. 
And in mercy shall the throne be established: and he shall sit upon it in truth in the tabernacle of David, judging, and seeking judgment, and hasting righteousness. 
We have heard of the pride of Moab; he is very proud: even of his haughtiness, and his pride, and his wrath: but his lies shall not be so. 
Therefore shall Moab howl for Moab, every one shall howl: for the foundations of Kirhareseth shall ye mourn; surely they are stricken. 
For the fields of Heshbon languish, and the vine of Sibmah: the lords
815,me and did work in the house of the LORD of hosts, their God, 
In the four and twentieth day of the sixth month, in the second year of Darius the king. 
In the seventh month, in the one and twentieth day of the month, came the word of the LORD by the prophet Haggai, saying, 
Speak now to Zerubbabel the son of Shealtiel, governor of Judah, and to Joshua the son of Josedech, the high priest, and to the residue of the people, saying, 
Who is left among you that saw this house in her first glory? and how do ye see it now? is it not in your eyes in comparison of it as nothing? 
Yet now be strong, O Zerubbabel, saith the LORD; and be strong, O Joshua, son of Josedech, the high priest; and be strong, all ye people of the land, saith the LORD, and work: for I am with you, saith the LORD of hosts: 
According to t
628, the water of Meribah; because the children of Israel strove with the LORD, and he was sanctified in them. 
And Moses sent messengers from Kadesh unto the king of Edom, Thus saith thy brother Israel, Thou knowest all the travail that hath befallen us: 
How our fathers went down into Egypt, and we have dwelt in Egypt a long time; and the Egyptians vexed us, and our fathers: 
And when we cried unto the LORD, he heard our voice, and sent an angel, and hath brought us forth out of Egypt: and, behold, we are in Kadesh, a city in the uttermost of thy border: 
Let us pass, I pray thee, through thy country: we will not pass thro
713,Zion: he hath stretched out a line, he hath not withdrawn his hand from destroying: therefore he made the rampart and the wall to lament; they languished together. 
Her gates are sunk into the ground; he hath destroyed and broken her bars: her king and her princes are among the Gentiles: the law is no more; her prophets also find no vision from the LORD. 
The elders of the daughter of Zion sit upon the ground, and keep silence: they have cast up dust upon their heads; they have girded themselves with sackcloth: the virgins of Jerusalem hang down their heads to the ground. 
Mine eyes do fail with tears, my bowels are troubled, my liver is poured upon the earth, for the destruction of the daughter of my pe
833,omen, and the children, and the eunuchs, whom he had brought again from Gibeon: 
And they departed, and dwelt in the habitation of Chimham, which is by Bethlehem, to go to enter into Egypt, 
Because of the Chaldeans: for they were afraid of them, because Ishmael the son of Nethaniah had slain Gedaliah the son of Ahikam, whom the king of Babylon made governor in the land. 
Then all the captains of the forces, and Johanan the son of Kareah, and Jezaniah the son of Hoshaiah, and all the people from the least even unto the greatest, came near, 
And said unto Jeremiah the prophet, Let, we beseech thee, our supplication be accepted before thee, and pray for us unto the LORD thy God, even for all this remnant; (for we are left but a few of many, as thine eyes do behold us:) 
That the LORD thy God may shew us the way wherein we m
660,ad her, and left no seed: last of all the woman died also. 
In the resurrection therefore, when they shall rise, whose wife shall she be of them? for the seven had her to wife. 
And Jesus answering said unto them, Do ye not therefore err, because ye know not the scriptures, neither the power of God? 
For when they shall rise from the dead, they neither marry, nor are given in marriage; but are as the angels which are in heaven. 
And as touching the dead, that they rise: have ye not read in the book of Moses, how in the bush God spake unto him, saying, I am the God of Abraham, and the God of Isaac, and the God of Jacob? 
He is not the God of the dead, b
769,st High he shall not be moved. 
Thine hand shall find out all thine enemies: thy right hand shall find out those that hate thee. 
Thou shalt make them as a fiery oven in the time of thine anger: the LORD shall swallow them up in his wrath, and the fire shall devour them. 
Their fruit shalt thou destroy from the earth, and their seed from among the children of men. 
For they intended evil against thee: they imagined a mischievous device, which they are not able to perform. 
Therefore shalt thou make them turn their back, when thou shalt make ready thine arrows upon thy strings against the face of them. 
Be thou exalted, LORD, in thine own strength: so will we sing and praise thy power. 
My God, my God, why hast thou forsaken me? why art thou so far from helpin
616,. 
For the love of Christ constraineth us; because we thus judge, that if one died for all, then were all dead: 
And that he died for all, that they which live should not henceforth live unto themselves, but unto him which died for them, and rose again. 
Wherefore henceforth know we no man after the flesh: yea, though we have known Christ after the flesh, yet now henceforth know we him no more. 
Therefore if any man be in Christ, he is a new creature: old things are passed away; behold, all things are become new. 
And all things are of God, who hath reconciled us to himself by Jesus Christ, and hath given to 
803,ildren of Israel shall not a dog move his tongue, against man or beast: that ye may know how that the LORD doth put a difference between the Egyptians and Israel. 
And all these thy servants shall come down unto me, and bow down themselves unto me, saying, Get thee out, and all the people that follow thee: and after that I will go out. And he went out from Pharaoh in a great anger. 
And the LORD said unto Moses, Pharaoh shall not hearken unto you; that my wonders may be multiplied in the land of Egypt. 
And Moses and Aaron did all these wonders before Pharaoh: and the LORD hardened Pharaoh's heart, so that he would not let the children of Israel go out of his land. 
And the LORD spake unto Moses and Aaron in the land of Egypt saying, 
This month shall be unto you the beginning of months: it s
723,and then I will bring him, that he may appear before the LORD, and there abide for ever. 
And Elkanah her husband said unto her, Do what seemeth thee good; tarry until thou have weaned him; only the LORD establish his word. So the woman abode, and gave her son suck until she weaned him. 
And when she had weaned him, she took him up with her, with three bullocks, and one ephah of flour, and a bottle of wine, and brought him unto the house of the LORD in Shiloh: and the child was young. 
And they slew a bullock, and brought the child to Eli. 
And she said, Oh my lord, as thy soul liveth, my lord, I am the woman that stood by thee here, praying unto the LORD. 
For this child I prayed; and the LORD hath given me my pe
592, to the earth. 
I will mention the lovingkindnesses of the LORD, and the praises of the LORD, according to all that the LORD hath bestowed on us, and the great goodness toward the house of Israel, which he hath bestowed on them according to his mercies, and according to the multitude of his lovingkindnesses. 
For he said, Surely they are my people, children that will not lie: so he was their Saviour. 
In all their affliction he was afflicted, and the angel of his presence saved them: in his love and in his pity he redeemed them; and he bare them, and carried them all the days of old. 

744, found favour in thy sight, O king, and if it please the king, let my life be given me at my petition, and my people at my request: 
For we are sold, I and my people, to be destroyed, to be slain, and to perish. But if we had been sold for bondmen and bondwomen, I had held my tongue, although the enemy could not countervail the king's damage. 
Then the king Ahasuerus answered and said unto Esther the queen, Who is he, and where is he, that durst presume in his heart to do so? 
And Esther said, The adversary and enemy is this wicked Haman. Then Haman was afraid before the king and the queen. 
And the king arising from the banquet of wine in his wrath went into the palace garden: and Haman stood up to make request for his life to Esther
799,t me. 
And they lifted up their voice, and wept again: and Orpah kissed her mother in law; but Ruth clave unto her. 
And she said, Behold, thy sister in law is gone back unto her people, and unto her gods: return thou after thy sister in law. 
And Ruth said, Intreat me not to leave thee, or to return from following after thee: for whither thou goest, I will go; and where thou lodgest, I will lodge: thy people shall be my people, and thy God my God: 
Where thou diest, will I die, and there will I be buried: the LORD do so to me, and more also, if ought but death part thee and me. 
When she saw that she was stedfastly minded to go with her, then she left speaking unto her. 
So they two went until they came to Bethlehem. And it came to pass, when they were come to Bethlehem, that all the cit
775,ry good work: 
(As it is written, He hath dispersed abroad; he hath given to the poor: his righteousness remaineth for ever. 
Now he that ministereth seed to the sower both minister bread for your food, and multiply your seed sown, and increase the fruits of your righteousness;) 
Being enriched in every thing to all bountifulness, which causeth through us thanksgiving to God. 
For the administration of this service not only supplieth the want of the saints, but is abundant also by many thanksgivings unto God; 
Whiles by the experiment of this ministration they glorify God for your professed subjection unto the gospel of Christ, and for your liberal distribution unto them, and unto all men; 
And by their prayer for you, which long after you for the exceeding grace o
806,chariah the son of Jeberechiah. 
And I went unto the prophetess; and she conceived, and bare a son. Then said the LORD to me, Call his name Mahershalalhashbaz. 
For before the child shall have knowledge to cry, My father, and my mother, the riches of Damascus and the spoil of Samaria shall be taken away before the king of Assyria. 
The LORD spake also unto me again, saying, 
Forasmuch as this people refuseth the waters of Shiloah that go softly, and rejoice in Rezin and Remaliah's son; 
Now therefore, behold, the Lord bringeth up upon them the waters of the river, strong and many, even the king of Assyria, and all his glory: and he shall come up over all his channels, and go over all his banks: 
And he shall pass through Judah; he shall overflow and go over, he shall reach even to the neck; and 
655,riest shall offer the one for a sin offering, and the other for a burnt offering; and the priest shall make an atonement for her before the LORD for the issue of her uncleanness. 
Thus shall ye separate the children of Israel from their uncleanness; that they die not in their uncleanness, when they defile my tabernacle that is among them. 
This is the law of him that hath an issue, and of him whose seed goeth from him, and is defiled therewith; 
And of her that is sick of her flowers, and of him that hath an issue, of the man, and of the woman, and of him that lieth with her that is unclean. 
And the LORD spake unto Moses after the death of the tw
833,
Then went Jeremiah unto Gedaliah the son of Ahikam to Mizpah; and dwelt with him among the people that were left in the land. 
Now when all the captains of the forces which were in the fields, even they and their men, heard that the king of Babylon had made Gedaliah the son of Ahikam governor in the land, and had committed unto him men, and women, and children, and of the poor of the land, of them that were not carried away captive to Babylon; 
Then they came to Gedaliah to Mizpah, even Ishmael the son of Nethaniah, and Johanan and Jonathan the sons of Kareah, and Seraiah the son of Tanhumeth, and the sons of Ephai the Netophathite, and Jezaniah the son of a Maachathite, they and their men. 
And Gedaliah the son of Ahikam the son of Shaphan sware unto them and to their men, saying, Fear not to serve the Chaldeans: dwell 
570,t all thine enemies from before thee, as the LORD hath spoken. 
And when thy son asketh thee in time to come, saying, What mean the testimonies, and the statutes, and the judgments, which the LORD our God hath commanded you? 
Then thou shalt say unto thy son, We were Pharaoh's bondmen in Egypt; and the LORD brought us out of Egypt with a mighty hand: 
And the LORD shewed signs and wonders, great and sore, upon Egypt, upon Pharaoh, and upon all his household, before our eyes: 
And he brought us out from thence, that he might bring us in, to give us the land which h
657, and as a sheep before her shearers is dumb, so he openeth not his mouth. 
He was taken from prison and from judgment: and who shall declare his generation? for he was cut off out of the land of the living: for the transgression of my people was he stricken. 
And he made his grave with the wicked, and with the rich in his death; because he had done no violence, neither was any deceit in his mouth. 
Yet it pleased the LORD to bruise him; he hath put him to grief: when thou shalt make his soul an offering for sin, he shall see his seed, he shall prolong his days, and the pleasure of the LORD shall prosper in his hand. 
He shall see of the travail of h
577, ye indeed speak righteousness, O congregation? do ye judge uprightly, O ye sons of men? 
Yea, in heart ye work wickedness; ye weigh the violence of your hands in the earth. 
The wicked are estranged from the womb: they go astray as soon as they be born, speaking lies. 
Their poison is like the poison of a serpent: they are like the deaf adder that stoppeth her ear; 
Which will not hearken to the voice of charmers, charming never so wisely. 
Break their teeth, O God, in their mouth: break out the great teeth of the young lions, O LORD. 
Let them melt away as waters which
696,s nigh, even at the doors. 
Verily I say unto you, that this generation shall not pass, till all these things be done. 
Heaven and earth shall pass away: but my words shall not pass away. 
But of that day and that hour knoweth no man, no, not the angels which are in heaven, neither the Son, but the Father. 
Take ye heed, watch and pray: for ye know not when the time is. 
For the Son of Man is as a man taking a far journey, who left his house, and gave authority to his servants, and to every man his work, and commanded the porter to watch. 
Watch ye therefore: for ye know not when the master of the house cometh, at even, or at midnight, or at the cockcrowing, or in the morning: 
Lest comi
593,en that sacrifice kiss the calves. 
Therefore they shall be as the morning cloud and as the early dew that passeth away, as the chaff that is driven with the whirlwind out of the floor, and as the smoke out of the chimney. 
Yet I am the LORD thy God from the land of Egypt, and thou shalt know no god but me: for there is no saviour beside me. 
I did know thee in the wilderness, in the land of great drought. 
According to their pasture, so were they filled; they were filled, and their heart was exalted; therefore have they forgotten me. 
Therefore I will be unto them as a lion: as a leopa
703,lace his name in, there thou shalt sacrifice the passover at even, at the going down of the sun, at the season that thou camest forth out of Egypt. 
And thou shalt roast and eat it in the place which the LORD thy God shall choose: and thou shalt turn in the morning, and go unto thy tents. 
Six days thou shalt eat unleavened bread: and on the seventh day shall be a solemn assembly to the LORD thy God: thou shalt do no work therein. 
Seven weeks shalt thou number unto thee: begin to number the seven weeks from such time as thou beginnest to put the sickle to the corn. 
And thou shalt keep the feast of weeks unto the LORD thy God with a tribute of a freewill offering of thine hand, which thou shal
808,wave breast shall they bring with the offerings made by fire of the fat, to wave it for a wave offering before the LORD; and it shall be thine, and thy sons' with thee, by a statute for ever; as the LORD hath commanded. 
And Moses diligently sought the goat of the sin offering, and, behold, it was burnt: and he was angry with Eleazar and Ithamar, the sons of Aaron which were left alive, saying, 
Wherefore have ye not eaten the sin offering in the holy place, seeing it is most holy, and God hath given it you to bear the iniquity of the congregation, to make atonement for them before the LORD? 
Behold, the blood of it was not brought in within the holy place: ye should indeed have eaten it in the holy place, as I commanded. 
And Aaron said unto Moses, Behold, this day have they offered their sin off
577,e of thee, and of thine own have we given thee. 
For we are strangers before thee, and sojourners, as were all our fathers: our days on the earth are as a shadow, and there is none abiding. 
O LORD our God, all this store that we have prepared to build thee an house for thine holy name cometh of thine hand, and is all thine own. 
I know also, my God, that thou triest the heart, and hast pleasure in uprightness. As for me, in the uprightness of mine heart I have willingly offered all these things: and now have I seen with joy thy people, which are present here, to offer w
761,ey went out both of them, he and Samuel, abroad. 
And as they were going down to the end of the city, Samuel said to Saul, Bid the servant pass on before us, (and he passed on), but stand thou still a while, that I may shew thee the word of God. 
Then Samuel took a vial of oil, and poured it upon his head, and kissed him, and said, Is it not because the LORD hath anointed thee to be captain over his inheritance? 
When thou art departed from me to day, then thou shalt find two men by Rachel's sepulchre in the border of Benjamin at Zelzah; and they will say unto thee, The asses which thou wentest to seek are found: and, lo, thy father hath left the care of the asses, and sorroweth for you, saying, What shall I do for my son? 
Then shalt thou go on forwa
767,f ground which Jacob bought of the sons of Hamor the father of Shechem for an hundred pieces of silver: and it became the inheritance of the children of Joseph. 
And Eleazar the son of Aaron died; and they buried him in a hill that pertained to Phinehas his son, which was given him in mount Ephraim. 
Now after the death of Joshua it came to pass, that the children of Israel asked the LORD, saying, Who shall go up for us against the Canaanites first, to fight against them? 
And the LORD said, Judah shall go up: behold, I have delivered the land into his hand. 
And Judah said unto Simeon his brother, Come up with me into my lot, that we may fight against the Canaanites; and I likewise will go with thee into thy lot. So Simeon went with him. 
And Judah went up
756, multitude out of the cities round about unto Jerusalem, bringing sick folks, and them which were vexed with unclean spirits: and they were healed every one. 
Then the high priest rose up, and all they that were with him, (which is the sect of the Sadducees,) and were filled with indignation, 
And laid their hands on the apostles, and put them in the common prison. 
But the angel of the Lord by night opened the prison doors, and brought them forth, and said, 
Go, stand and speak in the temple to the people all the words of this life. 
And when they heard that, they entered into the temple early in the morning, and taught. But the high priest came, and they that were with him, and called the council together, and all the senate of the children of 
705,well in the fenced cities because of the inhabitants of the land. 
We will not return unto our houses, until the children of Israel have inherited every man his inheritance. 
For we will not inherit with them on yonder side Jordan, or forward; because our inheritance is fallen to us on this side Jordan eastward. 
And Moses said unto them, If ye will do this thing, if ye will go armed before the LORD to war, 
And will go all of you armed over Jordan before the LORD, until he hath driven out his enemies from before him, 
And the land be subdued before the LORD: then afterward ye shall return, and be guiltless before the LORD, and before Israel; and this land shall be your possession before the LORD
613,tablished the world by his wisdom, and hath stretched out the heaven by his understanding. 
When he uttereth his voice, there is a multitude of waters in the heavens; and he causeth the vapours to ascend from the ends of the earth: he maketh lightnings with rain, and bringeth forth the wind out of his treasures. 
Every man is brutish by his knowledge; every founder is confounded by the graven image: for his molten image is falsehood, and there is no breath in them. 
They are vanity, the work of errors: in the time of their visitation they shall perish. 
The portion of Jacob is not like them; for he is the 
561, departed without being desired. Howbeit they buried him in the city of David, but not in the sepulchres of the kings. 
And the inhabitants of Jerusalem made Ahaziah his youngest son king in his stead: for the band of men that came with the Arabians to the camp had slain all the eldest. So Ahaziah the son of Jehoram king of Judah reigned. 
Forty and two years old was Ahaziah when he began to reign, and he reigned one year in Jerusalem. His mother's name also was Athaliah the daughter of Omri. 
He also walked in the ways of the house of Ahab: for his mothe
797,a far country, and there wasted his substance with riotous living. 
And when he had spent all, there arose a mighty famine in that land; and he began to be in want. 
And he went and joined himself to a citizen of that country; and he sent him into his fields to feed swine. 
And he would fain have filled his belly with the husks that the swine did eat: and no man gave unto him. 
And when he came to himself, he said, How many hired servants of my father's have bread enough and to spare, and I perish with hunger! 
I will arise and go to my father, and will say unto him, Father, I have sinned against heaven, and before thee, 
And am no more worthy to be called thy son: make me as one of thy hired servants. 
And he arose, and came to his father. But when he was yet a great way off, his fathe
619, Jonathan arose from the table in fierce anger, and did eat no meat the second day of the month: for he was grieved for David, because his father had done him shame. 
And it came to pass in the morning, that Jonathan went out into the field at the time appointed with David, and a little lad with him. 
And he said unto his lad, Run, find out now the arrows which I shoot. And as the lad ran, he shot an arrow beyond him. 
And when the lad was come to the place of the arrow which Jonathan had shot, Jonathan cried after the lad, and said, Is not the arrow beyond thee? 
And Jonathan cried after the lad, Make speed, ha
737,; and he healed them: 
Insomuch that the multitude wondered, when they saw the dumb to speak, the maimed to be whole, the lame to walk, and the blind to see: and they glorified the God of Israel. 
Then Jesus called his disciples unto him, and said, I have compassion on the multitude, because they continue with me now three days, and have nothing to eat: and I will not send them away fasting, lest they faint in the way. 
And his disciples say unto him, Whence should we have so much bread in the wilderness, as to fill so great a multitude? 
And Jesus saith unto them, How many loaves have ye? And they said, Seven, and a few little fishes. 
And he commanded the multitude to sit down on the ground. 
And he took the seven loaves and 
654,isfieth thy mouth with good things; so that thy youth is renewed like the eagle's. 
The LORD executeth righteousness and judgment for all that are oppressed. 
He made known his ways unto Moses, his acts unto the children of Israel. 
The LORD is merciful and gracious, slow to anger, and plenteous in mercy. 
He will not always chide: neither will he keep his anger for ever. 
He hath not dealt with us after our sins; nor rewarded us according to our iniquities. 
For as the heaven is high above the earth, so great is his mercy toward them that fear him. 
As far as the east is from the west, so far hath he removed our transgressions from us. 
Like as 
771,and bless the LORD your God for ever and ever: and blessed be thy glorious name, which is exalted above all blessing and praise. 
Thou, even thou, art LORD alone; thou hast made heaven, the heaven of heavens, with all their host, the earth, and all things that are therein, the seas, and all that is therein, and thou preservest them all; and the host of heaven worshippeth thee. 
Thou art the LORD the God, who didst choose Abram, and broughtest him forth out of Ur of the Chaldees, and gavest him the name of Abraham; 
And foundest his heart faithful before thee, and madest a covenant with him to give the land of the Canaanites, the Hittites, the Amorites, and the Perizzites, and the Jebusites, and the Girgashites, to give it, I say, to his seed, and hast performed
678,ere spoken by Paul, contradicting and blaspheming. 
Then Paul and Barnabas waxed bold, and said, It was necessary that the word of God should first have been spoken to you: but seeing ye put it from you, and judge yourselves unworthy of everlasting life, lo, we turn to the Gentiles. 
For so hath the Lord commanded us, saying, I have set thee to be a light of the Gentiles, that thou shouldest be for salvation unto the ends of the earth. 
And when the Gentiles heard this, they were glad, and glorified the word of the Lord: and as many as were ordained to eternal life believed. 
And the word of the Lord was published throughout all the region. 
But the Jews stirred up the 
661,be a god, let him plead for himself, because one hath cast down his altar. 
Therefore on that day he called him Jerubbaal, saying, Let Baal plead against him, because he hath thrown down his altar. 
Then all the Midianites and the Amalekites and the children of the east were gathered together, and went over, and pitched in the valley of Jezreel. 
But the Spirit of the LORD came upon Gideon, and he blew a trumpet; and Abiezer was gathered after him. 
And he sent messengers throughout all Manasseh; who also was gathered after him: and he sent messengers unto Asher, and unto Zebulun, and unto Naphtali; and they came up to meet them. 
And Gideon said unto G
578,as an heavy burden they are too heavy for me. 
My wounds stink and are corrupt because of my foolishness. 
I am troubled; I am bowed down greatly; I go mourning all the day long. 
For my loins are filled with a loathsome disease: and there is no soundness in my flesh. 
I am feeble and sore broken: I have roared by reason of the disquietness of my heart. 
Lord, all my desire is before thee; and my groaning is not hid from thee. 
My heart panteth, my strength faileth me: as for the light of mine eyes, it also is gone from me. 
My lovers and my friends stand aloof from my so
769, thou and the son of Jesse, in that thou hast given him bread, and a sword, and hast enquired of God for him, that he should rise against me, to lie in wait, as at this day? 
Then Ahimelech answered the king, and said, And who is so faithful among all thy servants as David, which is the king's son in law, and goeth at thy bidding, and is honourable in thine house? 
Did I then begin to enquire of God for him? be it far from me: let not the king impute any thing unto his servant, nor to all the house of my father: for thy servant knew nothing of all this, less or more. 
And the king said, Thou shalt surely die, Ahimelech, thou, and all thy father's house. 
And the king said unto the footmen that stood about him, Turn, and slay the priests of the LORD: because t
600,, when he overthrew the cities in the which Lot dwelt. 
And Lot went up out of Zoar, and dwelt in the mountain, and his two daughters with him; for he feared to dwell in Zoar: and he dwelt in a cave, he and his two daughters. 
And the firstborn said unto the younger, Our father is old, and there is not a man in the earth to come in unto us after the manner of all the earth: 
Come, let us make our father drink wine, and we will lie with him, that we may preserve seed of our father. 
And they made their father drink wine that night: and the firstborn went in, and lay with her father; and he perc
610,ese many years do I serve thee, neither transgressed I at any time thy commandment: and yet thou never gavest me a kid, that I might make merry with my friends: 
But as soon as this thy son was come, which hath devoured thy living with harlots, thou hast killed for him the fatted calf. 
And he said unto him, Son, thou art ever with me, and all that I have is thine. 
It was meet that we should make merry, and be glad: for this thy brother was dead, and is alive again; and was lost, and is found. 
And he said also unto his disciples, There was a certain rich man, which had a steward; and the same was accu
758,e told not his father or his mother what he had done. 
And he went down, and talked with the woman; and she pleased Samson well. 
And after a time he returned to take her, and he turned aside to see the carcase of the lion: and, behold, there was a swarm of bees and honey in the carcase of the lion. 
And he took thereof in his hands, and went on eating, and came to his father and mother, and he gave them, and they did eat: but he told not them that he had taken the honey out of the carcase of the lion. 
So his father went down unto the woman: and Samson made there a feast; for so used the young men to do. 
And it came to pass, when they saw him, that they brought thirty companions to be with him. 
And Samson said unto them, I will now put forth a r
816, they were sad. 
And he asked Pharaoh's officers that were with him in the ward of his lord's house, saying, Wherefore look ye so sadly to day? 
And they said unto him, We have dreamed a dream, and there is no interpreter of it. And Joseph said unto them, Do not interpretations belong to God? tell me them, I pray you. 
And the chief butler told his dream to Joseph, and said to him, In my dream, behold, a vine was before me; 
And in the vine were three branches: and it was as though it budded, and her blossoms shot forth; and the clusters thereof brought forth ripe grapes: 
And Pharaoh's cup was in my hand: and I took the grapes, and pressed them into Pharaoh's cup, and I gave the cup into Pharaoh's hand. 
And Joseph said unto him, This is the interpretation of it: The three branches are three days: 
Yet w
620,tish woman, was Zimri, the son of Salu, a prince of a chief house among the Simeonites. 
And the name of the Midianitish woman that was slain was Cozbi, the daughter of Zur; he was head over a people, and of a chief house in Midian. 
And the LORD spake unto Moses, saying, 
Vex the Midianites, and smite them: 
For they vex you with their wiles, wherewith they have beguiled you in the matter of Peor, and in the matter of Cozbi, the daughter of a prince of Midian, their sister, which was slain in the day of the plague for Peor's sake. 
And it came to pass after the plague, that the LORD spake unto Moses and unto Ele
697, of the city, which was before the king's gate. 
And Mordecai told him of all that had happened unto him, and of the sum of the money that Haman had promised to pay to the king's treasuries for the Jews, to destroy them. 
Also he gave him the copy of the writing of the decree that was given at Shushan to destroy them, to shew it unto Esther, and to declare it unto her, and to charge her that she should go in unto the king, to make supplication unto him, and to make request before him for her people. 
And Hatach came and told Esther the words of Mordecai. 
Again Esther spake unto Hatach, and gave him commandment unto Mordecai; 
All the king's servants, and the people of the king's province
702,What therefore God hath joined together, let not man put asunder. 
They say unto him, Why did Moses then command to give a writing of divorcement, and to put her away? 
He saith unto them, Moses because of the hardness of your hearts suffered you to put away your wives: but from the beginning it was not so. 
And I say unto you, Whosoever shall put away his wife, except it be for fornication, and shall marry another, committeth adultery: and whoso marrieth her which is put away doth commit adultery. 
His disciples say unto him, If the case of the man be so with his wife, it is not good to marry. 
But he said unto them, All men cannot receive this saying, save they to whom it is given. 
For ther
739, and offered it upon a rock unto the LORD: and the angel did wonderously; and Manoah and his wife looked on. 
For it came to pass, when the flame went up toward heaven from off the altar, that the angel of the LORD ascended in the flame of the altar. And Manoah and his wife looked on it, and fell on their faces to the ground. 
But the angel of the LORD did no more appear to Manoah and to his wife. Then Manoah knew that he was an angel of the LORD. 
And Manoah said unto his wife, We shall surely die, because we have seen God. 
But his wife said unto him, If the LORD were pleased to kill us, he would not have received a burnt offering and a meat offering at our hands, neither would he have shewed us all these things, nor would as a
742,ah and Eshtaol: and their brethren said unto them, What say ye? 
And they said, Arise, that we may go up against them: for we have seen the land, and, behold, it is very good: and are ye still? be not slothful to go, and to enter to possess the land. 
When ye go, ye shall come unto a people secure, and to a large land: for God hath given it into your hands; a place where there is no want of any thing that is in the earth. 
And there went from thence of the family of the Danites, out of Zorah and out of Eshtaol, six hundred men appointed with weapons of war. 
And they went up, and pitched in Kirjathjearim, in Judah: wherefore they called that place Mahanehdan unto this day: behold, it is behind Kirjathjearim. 
And they passed thence 
602,s a certain Levite sojourning on the side of mount Ephraim, who took to him a concubine out of Bethlehemjudah. 
And his concubine played the whore against him, and went away from him unto her father's house to Bethlehemjudah, and was there four whole months. 
And her husband arose, and went after her, to speak friendly unto her, and to bring her again, having his servant with him, and a couple of asses: and she brought him into her father's house: and when the father of the damsel saw him, he rejoiced to meet him. 
And his father in law, the damsel's father, retained him; and he abode with him t
795,he had begun, so he would also finish in you the same grace also. 
Therefore, as ye abound in every thing, in faith, and utterance, and knowledge, and in all diligence, and in your love to us, see that ye abound in this grace also. 
I speak not by commandment, but by occasion of the forwardness of others, and to prove the sincerity of your love. 
For ye know the grace of our Lord Jesus Christ, that, though he was rich, yet for your sakes he became poor, that ye through his poverty might be rich. 
And herein I give my advice: for this is expedient for you, who have begun before, not only to do, but also to be forward a year ago. 
Now therefore perform the doing of it; that as there was a readiness to will, so there may be a performance also out of that which ye have. 
For it there be f
592,mon desired to build in Jerusalem, and in Lebanon, and throughout all the land of his dominion. 
As for all the people that were left of the Hittites, and the Amorites, and the Perizzites, and the Hivites, and the Jebusites, which were not of Israel, 
But of their children, who were left after them in the land, whom the children of Israel consumed not, them did Solomon make to pay tribute until this day. 
But of the children of Israel did Solomon make no servants for his work; but they were men of war, and chief of his captains, and captains of his chariots and horsemen. 
And these wer
585,ber these things, I pour out my soul in me: for I had gone with the multitude, I went with them to the house of God, with the voice of joy and praise, with a multitude that kept holyday. 
Why art thou cast down, O my soul? and why art thou disquieted in me? hope thou in God: for I shall yet praise him for the help of his countenance. 
O my God, my soul is cast down within me: therefore will I remember thee from the land of Jordan, and of the Hermonites, from the hill Mizar. 
Deep calleth unto deep at the noise of thy waterspouts: all thy waves and thy billows are gone over me. 

736,d, and for four which it cannot bear: 
For a servant when he reigneth; and a fool when he is filled with meat; 
For an odious woman when she is married; and an handmaid that is heir to her mistress. 
There be four things which are little upon the earth, but they are exceeding wise: 
The ants are a people not strong, yet they prepare their meat in the summer; 
The conies are but a feeble folk, yet make they their houses in the rocks; 
The locusts have no king, yet go they forth all of them by bands; 
The spider taketh hold with her hands, and is in kings' palaces. 
There be three things which go well, yea, four are comely in going: 
A lion which is strongest among beasts, and turneth not away for any; 
A greyhound; an he goat a
604,n thee. 
After whom is the king of Israel come out? after whom dost thou pursue? after a dead dog, after a flea. 
The LORD therefore be judge, and judge between me and thee, and see, and plead my cause, and deliver me out of thine hand. 
And it came to pass, when David had made an end of speaking these words unto Saul, that Saul said, Is this thy voice, my son David? And Saul lifted up his voice, and wept. 
And he said to David, Thou art more righteous than I: for thou hast rewarded me good, whereas I have rewarded thee evil. 
And thou hast shewed this day how that thou hast dealt well with me: fo
762,nners also lend to sinners, to receive as much again. 
But love ye your enemies, and do good, and lend, hoping for nothing again; and your reward shall be great, and ye shall be the children of the Highest: for he is kind unto the unthankful and to the evil. 
Be ye therefore merciful, as your Father also is merciful. 
Judge not, and ye shall not be judged: condemn not, and ye shall not be condemned: forgive, and ye shall be forgiven: 
Give, and it shall be given unto you; good measure, pressed down, and shaken together, and running over, shall men give into your bosom. For with the same measure that ye mete withal it shall be measured to you again. 
And he spake a parable unto them, Can the blind lead the blind? shall they not both fall into the ditch?
636, stead. 
And when Husham was dead, Hadad the son of Bedad, which smote Midian in the field of Moab, reigned in his stead: and the name of his city was Avith. 
And when Hadad was dead, Samlah of Masrekah reigned in his stead. 
And when Samlah was dead, Shaul of Rehoboth by the river reigned in his stead. 
And when Shaul was dead, Baalhanan the son of Achbor reigned in his stead. 
And when Baalhanan was dead, Hadad reigned in his stead: and the name of his city was Pai; and his wife's name was Mehetabel, the daughter of Matred, the daughter of Mezahab. 
Hadad died also. And the dukes of Edom were; duke Timnah, duke Aliah, duke Jet
577,g. 
The fear of the LORD is the instruction of wisdom; and before honour is humility. 
The preparations of the heart in man, and the answer of the tongue, is from the LORD. 
All the ways of a man are clean in his own eyes; but the LORD weigheth the spirits. 
Commit thy works unto the LORD, and thy thoughts shall be established. 
The LORD hath made all things for himself: yea, even the wicked for the day of evil. 
Every one that is proud in heart is an abomination to the LORD: though hand join in hand, he shall not be unpunished. 
By mercy and truth iniquity is purged: an
620, creeping things that creep upon the earth, and all the men that are upon the face of the earth, shall shake at my presence, and the mountains shall be thrown down, and the steep places shall fall, and every wall shall fall to the ground. 
And I will call for a sword against him throughout all my mountains, saith the Lord GOD: every man's sword shall be against his brother. 
And I will plead against him with pestilence and with blood; and I will rain upon him, and upon his bands, and upon the many people that are with him, an overflowing rain, and great hailstones, fire, and brimstone. 
Thus will I magnify myself
739,e unto the LORD your God, saying, Pray for us unto the LORD our God; and according unto all that the LORD our God shall say, so declare unto us, and we will do it. 
And now I have this day declared it to you; but ye have not obeyed the voice of the LORD your God, nor any thing for the which he hath sent me unto you. 
Now therefore know certainly that ye shall die by the sword, by the famine, and by the pestilence, in the place whither ye desire to go and to sojourn. 
And it came to pass, that when Jeremiah had made an end of speaking unto all the people all the words of the LORD their God, for which the LORD their God had sent him to them, even all these words, 
Then spake Azariah the son of Hoshaiah, and Johanan the son of Karea
826,even unto this day, and have not obeyed the voice of the LORD our God. 
If thou wilt return, O Israel, saith the LORD, return unto me: and if thou wilt put away thine abominations out of my sight, then shalt thou not remove. 
And thou shalt swear, The LORD liveth, in truth, in judgment, and in righteousness; and the nations shall bless themselves in him, and in him shall they glory. 
For thus saith the LORD to the men of Judah and Jerusalem, Break up your fallow ground, and sow not among thorns. 
Circumcise yourselves to the LORD, and take away the foreskins of your heart, ye men of Judah and inhabitants of Jerusalem: lest my fury come forth like fire, and burn that none can quench it, because of the evil of your doings. 
Declare ye in Judah, and publish in Jerusalem; and say, Blow ye the trumpet in the land: cry, 
585,he locust eaten; and that which the locust hath left hath the cankerworm eaten; and that which the cankerworm hath left hath the caterpiller eaten. 
Awake, ye drunkards, and weep; and howl, all ye drinkers of wine, because of the new wine; for it is cut off from your mouth. 
For a nation is come up upon my land, strong, and without number, whose teeth are the teeth of a lion, and he hath the cheek teeth of a great lion. 
He hath laid my vine waste, and barked my fig tree: he hath made it clean bare, and cast it away; the branches thereof are made white. 
Lament like a virgin gir
654,e do it? let him alone, and let him curse; for the LORD hath bidden him. 
It may be that the LORD will look on mine affliction, and that the LORD will requite me good for his cursing this day. 
And as David and his men went by the way, Shimei went along on the hill's side over against him, and cursed as he went, and threw stones at him, and cast dust. 
And the king, and all the people that were with him, came weary, and refreshed themselves there. 
And Absalom, and all the people the men of Israel, came to Jerusalem, and Ahithophel with him. 
And it came to pass, when Hushai the Archite, David's friend, was come unto Absalom, that Hushai said unt
731,hall be stubble: and the day that cometh shall burn them up, saith the LORD of hosts, that it shall leave them neither root nor branch. 
But unto you that fear my name shall the Sun of righteousness arise with healing in his wings; and ye shall go forth, and grow up as calves of the stall. 
And ye shall tread down the wicked; for they shall be ashes under the soles of your feet in the day that I shall do this, saith the LORD of hosts. 
Remember ye the law of Moses my servant, which I commanded unto him in Horeb for all Israel, with the statutes and judgments. 
Behold, I will send you Elijah the prophet before the coming of the great and dreadful day of the LORD: 
And he shall turn the heart of the fathers to the children,
804,r leave thee, nor forsake thee. 
So that we may boldly say, The Lord is my helper, and I will not fear what man shall do unto me. 
Remember them which have the rule over you, who have spoken unto you the word of God: whose faith follow, considering the end of their conversation. 
Jesus Christ the same yesterday, and to day, and for ever. 
Be not carried about with divers and strange doctrines. For it is a good thing that the heart be established with grace; not with meats, which have not profited them that have been occupied therein. 
We have an altar, whereof they have no right to eat which serve the tabernacle. 
For the bodies of those beasts, whose blood is brought into the sanctuary by the high priest for sin, are burned without the camp. 
Wherefore Jesus also, that he might sanctify the p
797,ht man thou wilt shew thyself upright. 
With the pure thou wilt shew thyself pure; and with the froward thou wilt shew thyself unsavoury. 
And the afflicted people thou wilt save: but thine eyes are upon the haughty, that thou mayest bring them down. 
For thou art my lamp, O LORD: and the LORD will lighten my darkness. 
For by thee I have run through a troop: by my God have I leaped over a wall. 
As for God, his way is perfect; the word of the LORD is tried: he is a buckler to all them that trust in him. 
For who is God, save the LORD? and who is a rock, save our God? 
God is my strength and power: and he maketh my way perfect. 
He maketh my feet like hinds' feet: and setteth me upon my high places. 
He teacheth my hands to war; so that a bow of steel is broken by mine arms. 
Thou hast 
711,lled to her, and said, Bring me, I pray thee, a morsel of bread in thine hand. 
And she said, As the LORD thy God liveth, I have not a cake, but an handful of meal in a barrel, and a little oil in a cruse: and, behold, I am gathering two sticks, that I may go in and dress it for me and my son, that we may eat it, and die. 
And Elijah said unto her, Fear not; go and do as thou hast said: but make me thereof a little cake first, and bring it unto me, and after make for thee and for thy son. 
For thus saith the LORD God of Israel, The barrel of meal shall not waste, neither shall the cruse of oil fail, until the day that the LORD sendeth rain upon the earth. 
And she went and did according to the saying o
673,as with him, and the flocks, and herds, and the camels, into two bands; 
And said, If Esau come to the one company, and smite it, then the other company which is left shall escape. 
And Jacob said, O God of my father Abraham, and God of my father Isaac, the LORD which saidst unto me, Return unto thy country, and to thy kindred, and I will deal well with thee: 
I am not worthy of the least of all the mercies, and of all the truth, which thou hast shewed unto thy servant; for with my staff I passed over this Jordan; and now I am become two bands. 
Deliver me, I pray thee, from the hand of my brother, from the hand of Esau: for I fear him, lest he will come and smite 
683,nt ministry, by how much also he is the mediator of a better covenant, which was established upon better promises. 
For if that first covenant had been faultless, then should no place have been sought for the second. 
For finding fault with them, he saith, Behold, the days come, saith the Lord, when I will make a new covenant with the house of Israel and with the house of Judah: 
Not according to the covenant that I made with their fathers in the day when I took them by the hand to lead them out of the land of Egypt; because they continued not in my covenant, and I regarded them not, saith the Lord. 
For this is the covenant that I will make with the house of Israel after th
622, shall be unclean. 
And whosoever toucheth his bed shall wash his clothes, and bathe himself in water, and be unclean until the even. 
And he that sitteth on any thing whereon he sat that hath the issue shall wash his clothes, and bathe himself in water, and be unclean until the even. 
And he that toucheth the flesh of him that hath the issue shall wash his clothes, and bathe himself in water, and be unclean until the even. 
And if he that hath the issue spit upon him that is clean; then he shall wash his clothes, and bathe himself in water, and be unclean until the even. 
And what saddle soever he rideth upon that
796,h the men of their city, saying, 
These men are peaceable with us; therefore let them dwell in the land, and trade therein; for the land, behold, it is large enough for them; let us take their daughters to us for wives, and let us give them our daughters. 
Only herein will the men consent unto us for to dwell with us, to be one people, if every male among us be circumcised, as they are circumcised. 
Shall not their cattle and their substance and every beast of their's be our's? only let us consent unto them, and they will dwell with us. 
And unto Hamor and unto Shechem his son hearkened all that went out of the gate of his city; and every male was circumcised, all that went out of the gate of his city. 
And it came to pass on the third day, when they were sore, that two of the sons of 
654, with unclean spirits: and they were healed every one. 
Then the high priest rose up, and all they that were with him, (which is the sect of the Sadducees,) and were filled with indignation, 
And laid their hands on the apostles, and put them in the common prison. 
But the angel of the Lord by night opened the prison doors, and brought them forth, and said, 
Go, stand and speak in the temple to the people all the words of this life. 
And when they heard that, they entered into the temple early in the morning, and taught. But the high priest came, and they that were with him, and called the council together, and all the senate of the children of I
761,is corruptible must put on incorruption, and this mortal must put on immortality. 
So when this corruptible shall have put on incorruption, and this mortal shall have put on immortality, then shall be brought to pass the saying that is written, Death is swallowed up in victory. 
O death, where is thy sting? O grave, where is thy victory? 
The sting of death is sin; and the strength of sin is the law. 
But thanks be to God, which giveth us the victory through our Lord Jesus Christ. 
Therefore, my beloved brethren, be ye stedfast, unmoveable, always abounding in the work of the Lord, forasmuch as ye know that your labour is not in vain in the Lord. 
Now concerning the collection for the saints, as I have given order to the churches of Galatia, even so d
709,or thus saith the LORD God of Israel unto me; Take the wine cup of this fury at my hand, and cause all the nations, to whom I send thee, to drink it. 
And they shall drink, and be moved, and be mad, because of the sword that I will send among them. 
Then took I the cup at the LORD's hand, and made all the nations to drink, unto whom the LORD had sent me: 
To wit, Jerusalem, and the cities of Judah, and the kings thereof, and the princes thereof, to make them a desolation, an astonishment, an hissing, and a curse; as it is this day; 
Pharaoh king of Egypt, and his servants, and his princes, and all his people; 
And all the mingled people, and all the kings of the land of Uz, and all the kings of the l
628, in the rock, and be like the dove that maketh her nest in the sides of the hole's mouth. 
We have heard the pride of Moab, (he is exceeding proud) his loftiness, and his arrogancy, and his pride, and the haughtiness of his heart. 
I know his wrath, saith the LORD; but it shall not be so; his lies shall not so effect it. 
Therefore will I howl for Moab, and I will cry out for all Moab; mine heart shall mourn for the men of Kirheres. 
O vine of Sibmah, I will weep for thee with the weeping of Jazer: thy plants are gone over the sea, they reach even to the sea of Jazer: the spoiler is fallen upon thy summer fruits and upon
785, wilt thou that I should do unto thee? The blind man said unto him, Lord, that I might receive my sight. 
And Jesus said unto him, Go thy way; thy faith hath made thee whole. And immediately he received his sight, and followed Jesus in the way. 
And when they came nigh to Jerusalem, unto Bethphage and Bethany, at the mount of Olives, he sendeth forth two of his disciples, 
And saith unto them, Go your way into the village over against you: and as soon as ye be entered into it, ye shall find a colt tied, whereon never man sat; loose him, and bring him. 
And if any man say unto you, Why do ye this? say ye that the Lord hath need of him; and straightway he will send him hither. 
And they went their way, and found the colt tied by the door without in a place where two ways met; 
731, that he forced his sister Tamar. 
Now therefore let not my lord the king take the thing to his heart, to think that all the king's sons are dead: for Amnon only is dead. 
But Absalom fled. And the young man that kept the watch lifted up his eyes, and looked, and, behold, there came much people by the way of the hill side behind him. 
And Jonadab said unto the king, Behold, the king's sons come: as thy servant said, so it is. 
And it came to pass, as soon as he had made an end of speaking, that, behold, the king's sons came, and lifted up their voice and wept: and the king also and all his servants wept very sore. 
But Absalom fled, and went to Talmai, the son of Ammihud, king of Geshur. And David mourned for his son ever
583,orsaken the LORD, and have served Baalim and Ashtaroth: but now deliver us out of the hand of our enemies, and we will serve thee. 
And the LORD sent Jerubbaal, and Bedan, and Jephthah, and Samuel, and delivered you out of the hand of your enemies on every side, and ye dwelled safe. 
And when ye saw that Nahash the king of the children of Ammon came against you, ye said unto me, Nay; but a king shall reign over us: when the LORD your God was your king. 
Now therefore behold the king whom ye have chosen, and whom ye have desired! and, behold, the LORD hath set a king over you. 
698,nistered in the priest's office in his stead. 
From thence they journeyed unto Gudgodah; and from Gudgodah to Jotbath, a land of rivers of waters. 
At that time the LORD separated the tribe of Levi, to bear the ark of the covenant of the LORD, to stand before the LORD to minister unto him, and to bless in his name, unto this day. 
Wherefore Levi hath no part nor inheritance with his brethren; the LORD is his inheritance, according as the LORD thy God promised him. 
And I stayed in the mount, according to the first time, forty days and forty nights; and the LORD hearkened unto me at that time also, and the LORD would not destroy thee. 
And the LORD said unto me, Arise, take thy journey befo
664,ith him. 
And it came to pass on the morrow, that Balak took Balaam, and brought him up into the high places of Baal, that thence he might see the utmost part of the people. 
And Balaam said unto Balak, Build me here seven altars, and prepare me here seven oxen and seven rams. 
And Balak did as Balaam had spoken; and Balak and Balaam offered on every altar a bullock and a ram. 
And Balaam said unto Balak, Stand by thy burnt offering, and I will go: peradventure the LORD will come to meet me: and whatsoever he sheweth me I will tell thee. And he went to an high place. 
And God met Balaam: and he said unto him, I have prepared seven altars, and I have offere
775,se bones live? And I answered, O Lord GOD, thou knowest. 
Again he said unto me, Prophesy upon these bones, and say unto them, O ye dry bones, hear the word of the LORD. 
Thus saith the Lord GOD unto these bones; Behold, I will cause breath to enter into you, and ye shall live: 
And I will lay sinews upon you, and will bring up flesh upon you, and cover you with skin, and put breath in you, and ye shall live; and ye shall know that I am the LORD. 
So I prophesied as I was commanded: and as I prophesied, there was a noise, and behold a shaking, and the bones came together, bone to his bone. 
And when I beheld, lo, the sinews and the flesh came up upon them, and the skin covered them above: but there was no breath in them. 
Then said he unto me, Prophesy unto the win
702,: let the fields rejoice, and all that is therein. 
Then shall the trees of the wood sing out at the presence of the LORD, because he cometh to judge the earth. 
O give thanks unto the LORD; for he is good; for his mercy endureth for ever. 
And say ye, Save us, O God of our salvation, and gather us together, and deliver us from the heathen, that we may give thanks to thy holy name, and glory in thy praise. 
Blessed be the LORD God of Israel for ever and ever. And all the people said, Amen, and praised the LORD. 
So he left there before the ark of the covenant of the LORD Asaph and his brethren, to minister before the ark continually, as every day's work required: 
And Obededom with their breth
609,ord when he cometh shall find so doing. 
Verily I say unto you, That he shall make him ruler over all his goods. 
But and if that evil servant shall say in his heart, My lord delayeth his coming; 
And shall begin to smite his fellowservants, and to eat and drink with the drunken; 
The lord of that servant shall come in a day when he looketh not for him, and in an hour that he is not aware of, 
And shall cut him asunder, and appoint him his portion with the hypocrites: there shall be weeping and gnashing of teeth. 
Then shall the kingdom of heaven be likened unto ten virgins, which took their lamps, and
664,against the LORD, we will go up and fight, according to all that the LORD our God commanded us. And when ye had girded on every man his weapons of war, ye were ready to go up into the hill. 
And the LORD said unto me, Say unto them. Go not up, neither fight; for I am not among you; lest ye be smitten before your enemies. 
So I spake unto you; and ye would not hear, but rebelled against the commandment of the LORD, and went presumptuously up into the hill. 
And the Amorites, which dwelt in that mountain, came out against you, and chased you, as bees do, and destroyed you in Seir, even unto Hormah. 
And ye returned and wept before the LORD; but the LORD woul
665, and to the other the savour of life unto life. And who is sufficient for these things? 
For we are not as many, which corrupt the word of God: but as of sincerity, but as of God, in the sight of God speak we in Christ. 
Do we begin again to commend ourselves? or need we, as some others, epistles of commendation to you, or letters of commendation from you? 
Ye are our epistle written in our hearts, known and read of all men: 
Forasmuch as ye are manifestly declared to be the epistle of Christ ministered by us, written not with ink, but with the Spirit of the living God; not in tables of stone, but in fleshy tables of the heart. 
And such trust have we throu
584,eet, and I will speak unto thee. 
And the spirit entered into me when he spake unto me, and set me upon my feet, that I heard him that spake unto me. 
And he said unto me, Son of man, I send thee to the children of Israel, to a rebellious nation that hath rebelled against me: they and their fathers have transgressed against me, even unto this very day. 
For they are impudent children and stiffhearted. I do send thee unto them; and thou shalt say unto them, Thus saith the Lord GOD. 
And they, whether they will hear, or whether they will forbear, (for they are a rebellious house,
674,ians, and Medes, and Elamites, and the dwellers in Mesopotamia, and in Judaea, and Cappadocia, in Pontus, and Asia, 
Phrygia, and Pamphylia, in Egypt, and in the parts of Libya about Cyrene, and strangers of Rome, Jews and proselytes, 
Cretes and Arabians, we do hear them speak in our tongues the wonderful works of God. 
And they were all amazed, and were in doubt, saying one to another, What meaneth this? 
Others mocking said, These men are full of new wine. 
But Peter, standing up with the eleven, lifted up his voice, and said unto them, Ye men of Judaea, and all ye that dwell at Jerusalem, be this known unto you, and hearken to my words: 
For these are not drunke
776,ll even live in them. 
Moreover also I gave them my sabbaths, to be a sign between me and them, that they might know that I am the LORD that sanctify them. 
But the house of Israel rebelled against me in the wilderness: they walked not in my statutes, and they despised my judgments, which if a man do, he shall even live in them; and my sabbaths they greatly polluted: then I said, I would pour out my fury upon them in the wilderness, to consume them. 
But I wrought for my name's sake, that it should not be polluted before the heathen, in whose sight I brought them out. 
Yet also I lifted up my hand unto them in the wilderness, that I would not bring them into the land which I had given them, flowing with milk and honey, which is the glory of all lands; 
Because they 
755,my people Israel and Judah, saith the LORD: and I will cause them to return to the land that I gave to their fathers, and they shall possess it. 
And these are the words that the LORD spake concerning Israel and concerning Judah. 
For thus saith the LORD; We have heard a voice of trembling, of fear, and not of peace. 
Ask ye now, and see whether a man doth travail with child? wherefore do I see every man with his hands on his loins, as a woman in travail, and all faces are turned into paleness? 
Alas! for that day is great, so that none is like it: it is even the time of Jacob's trouble, but he shall be saved out of it. 
For it shall come to pass in that day, saith the LORD of hosts, that I will break his yoke from off thy neck, and will burst t
699, the coast shall be for the remnant of the house of Judah; they shall feed thereupon: in the houses of Ashkelon shall they lie down in the evening: for the LORD their God shall visit them, and turn away their captivity. 
I have heard the reproach of Moab, and the revilings of the children of Ammon, whereby they have reproached my people, and magnified themselves against their border. 
Therefore as I live, saith the LORD of hosts, the God of Israel, Surely Moab shall be as Sodom, and the children of Ammon as Gomorrah, even the breeding of nettles, and saltpits, and a perpetual desolation: the residue of my people shall spoil them, and the remnant of my people shall possess them. 
This shall 
656,ay, The blessing of the LORD be upon you: we bless you in the name of the LORD. 
Out of the depths have I cried unto thee, O LORD. 
Lord, hear my voice: let thine ears be attentive to the voice of my supplications. 
If thou, LORD, shouldest mark iniquities, O Lord, who shall stand? 
But there is forgiveness with thee, that thou mayest be feared. 
I wait for the LORD, my soul doth wait, and in his word do I hope. 
My soul waiteth for the Lord more than they that watch for the morning: I say, more than they that watch for the morning. 
Let Israel hope in the LORD: for with the LORD there is mercy, and with him is plenteous redemption. 
And he shall r
561, a wall being on this side, and a wall on that side. 
And when the ass saw the angel of the LORD, she thrust herself unto the wall, and crushed Balaam's foot against the wall: and he smote her again. 
And the angel of the LORD went further, and stood in a narrow place, where was no way to turn either to the right hand or to the left. 
And when the ass saw the angel of the LORD, she fell down under Balaam: and Balaam's anger was kindled, and he smote the ass with a staff. 
And the LORD opened the mouth of the ass, and she said unto Balaam, What have I done
577, And it came to pass in the month Chisleu, in the twentieth year, as I was in Shushan the palace, 
That Hanani, one of my brethren, came, he and certain men of Judah; and I asked them concerning the Jews that had escaped, which were left of the captivity, and concerning Jerusalem. 
And they said unto me, The remnant that are left of the captivity there in the province are in great affliction and reproach: the wall of Jerusalem also is broken down, and the gates thereof are burned with fire. 
And it came to pass, when I heard these words, that I sat down and wept, and mou
813,nto the LORD, and said, We beseech thee, O LORD, we beseech thee, let us not perish for this man's life, and lay not upon us innocent blood: for thou, O LORD, hast done as it pleased thee. 
So they look up Jonah, and cast him forth into the sea: and the sea ceased from her raging. 
Then the men feared the LORD exceedingly, and offered a sacrifice unto the LORD, and made vows. 
Now the LORD had prepared a great fish to swallow up Jonah. And Jonah was in the belly of the fish three days and three nights. 
Then Jonah prayed unto the LORD his God out of the fish's belly, 
And said, I cried by reason of mine affliction unto the LORD, and he heard me; out of the belly of hell cried I, and thou heardest my voice. 
For thou hadst cast me into the deep, in the midst of the seas; and the floods compassed me abou
586,tonement with him, and to let him go for a scapegoat into the wilderness. 
And Aaron shall bring the bullock of the sin offering, which is for himself, and shall make an atonement for himself, and for his house, and shall kill the bullock of the sin offering which is for himself: 
And he shall take a censer full of burning coals of fire from off the altar before the LORD, and his hands full of sweet incense beaten small, and bring it within the vail: 
And he shall put the incense upon the fire before the LORD, that the cloud of the incense may cover the mercy seat that is upon th
658,himself before them, and burned incense unto them. 
Wherefore the anger of the LORD was kindled against Amaziah, and he sent unto him a prophet, which said unto him, Why hast thou sought after the gods of the people, which could not deliver their own people out of thine hand? 
And it came to pass, as he talked with him, that the king said unto him, Art thou made of the king's counsel? forbear; why shouldest thou be smitten? Then the prophet forbare, and said, I know that God hath determined to destroy thee, because thou hast done this, and hast not hearkened unto my counsel. 
Then Amaziah king of Judah took advice, and sent to Joash, the son of Jehoa
819,l deal furiously with thee: they shall take away thy nose and thine ears; and thy remnant shall fall by the sword: they shall take thy sons and thy daughters; and thy residue shall be devoured by the fire. 
They shall also strip thee out of thy clothes, and take away thy fair jewels. 
Thus will I make thy lewdness to cease from thee, and thy whoredom brought from the land of Egypt: so that thou shalt not lift up thine eyes unto them, nor remember Egypt any more. 
For thus saith the Lord GOD; Behold, I will deliver thee into the hand of them whom thou hatest, into the hand of them from whom thy mind is alienated: 
And they shall deal with thee hatefully, and shall take away all thy labour, and shall leave thee naked and bare: and the nakedness of thy whoredoms shall be discovered, both thy lewdness and thy wh
729, I thought to promote thee unto great honour; but, lo, the LORD hath kept thee back from honour. 
And Balaam said unto Balak, Spake I not also to thy messengers which thou sentest unto me, saying, 
If Balak would give me his house full of silver and gold, I cannot go beyond the commandment of the LORD, to do either good or bad of mine own mind; but what the LORD saith, that will I speak? 
And now, behold, I go unto my people: come therefore, and I will advertise thee what this people shall do to thy people in the latter days. 
And he took up his parable, and said, Balaam the son of Beor hath said, and the man whose eyes are open hath said: 
He hath said, which heard the words of God, and knew the knowledge of the most H
616, among the children of Israel. 
But the field of the suburbs of their cities may not be sold; for it is their perpetual possession. 
And if thy brother be waxen poor, and fallen in decay with thee; then thou shalt relieve him: yea, though he be a stranger, or a sojourner; that he may live with thee. 
Take thou no usury of him, or increase: but fear thy God; that thy brother may live with thee. 
Thou shalt not give him thy money upon usury, nor lend him thy victuals for increase. 
I am the LORD your God, which brought you forth out of the land of Egypt, to give you the land of Canaan, and to be your God. 
And 
567,s scripture must needs have been fulfilled, which the Holy Ghost by the mouth of David spake before concerning Judas, which was guide to them that took Jesus. 
For he was numbered with us, and had obtained part of this ministry. 
Now this man purchased a field with the reward of iniquity; and falling headlong, he burst asunder in the midst, and all his bowels gushed out. 
And it was known unto all the dwellers at Jerusalem; insomuch as that field is called in their proper tongue, Aceldama, that is to say, The field of blood. 
For it is written in the book of Ps
683,ntinued praying before the LORD, that Eli marked her mouth. 
Now Hannah, she spake in her heart; only her lips moved, but her voice was not heard: therefore Eli thought she had been drunken. 
And Eli said unto her, How long wilt thou be drunken? put away thy wine from thee. 
And Hannah answered and said, No, my lord, I am a woman of a sorrowful spirit: I have drunk neither wine nor strong drink, but have poured out my soul before the LORD. 
Count not thine handmaid for a daughter of Belial: for out of the abundance of my complaint and grief have I spoken hitherto. 
Then Eli answered and said, Go in peace: and the God of Israel grant thee thy petition that thou hast asked of 
783,d the sons of Jokshan; Sheba, and Dedan. 
And the sons of Midian; Ephah, and Epher, and Henoch, and Abida, and Eldaah. All these are the sons of Keturah. 
And Abraham begat Isaac. The sons of Isaac; Esau and Israel. 
The sons of Esau; Eliphaz, Reuel, and Jeush, and Jaalam, and Korah. 
The sons of Eliphaz; Teman, and Omar, Zephi, and Gatam, Kenaz, and Timna, and Amalek. 
The sons of Reuel; Nahath, Zerah, Shammah, and Mizzah. 
And the sons of Seir; Lotan, and Shobal, and Zibeon, and Anah, and Dishon, and Ezar, and Dishan. 
And the sons of Lotan; Hori, and Homam: and Timna was Lotan's sister. 
The sons of Shobal; Alian, and Manahath, and Ebal, Shephi, and Onam. and the sons of Zibeon; Aiah, and Anah. 
The sons of Anah; Dishon. And the sons of Dishon; Amram, and Eshban, and It
675,to do this: why should damage grow to the hurt of the kings? 
Now when the copy of king Artaxerxes' letter was read before Rehum, and Shimshai the scribe, and their companions, they went up in haste to Jerusalem unto the Jews, and made them to cease by force and power. 
Then ceased the work of the house of God which is at Jerusalem. So it ceased unto the second year of the reign of Darius king of Persia. 
Then the prophets, Haggai the prophet, and Zechariah the son of Iddo, prophesied unto the Jews that were in Judah and Jerusalem in the name of the God of Israel, even unto them. 
Then rose up Zerubbabel the son of Shealtiel, and Jeshua the son of Jozadak, and began 
797,s be removed; but my kindness shall not depart from thee, neither shall the covenant of my peace be removed, saith the LORD that hath mercy on thee. 
O thou afflicted, tossed with tempest, and not comforted, behold, I will lay thy stones with fair colours, and lay thy foundations with sapphires. 
And I will make thy windows of agates, and thy gates of carbuncles, and all thy borders of pleasant stones. 
And all thy children shall be taught of the LORD; and great shall be the peace of thy children. 
In righteousness shalt thou be established: thou shalt be far from oppression; for thou shalt not fear: and from terror; for it shall not come near thee. 
Behold, they shall surely gather together, but not by me: whosoever shall gather together against thee shall fall for thy sake. 
Behold, I
644, Amen. 
I marvel that ye are so soon removed from him that called you into the grace of Christ unto another gospel: 
Which is not another; but there be some that trouble you, and would pervert the gospel of Christ. 
But though we, or an angel from heaven, preach any other gospel unto you than that which we have preached unto you, let him be accursed. 
As we said before, so say I now again, if any man preach any other gospel unto you than that ye have received, let him be accursed. 
For do I now persuade men, or God? or do I seek to please men? for if I yet pleased men, I should not be the servant of Christ. 
But I certify you, brethren,
659,ht of all the people, and also in the sight of Saul's servants. 
And it came to pass as they came, when David was returned from the slaughter of the Philistine, that the women came out of all cities of Israel, singing and dancing, to meet king Saul, with tabrets, with joy, and with instruments of musick. 
And the women answered one another as they played, and said, Saul hath slain his thousands, and David his ten thousands. 
And Saul was very wroth, and the saying displeased him; and he said, They have ascribed unto David ten thousands, and to me they have ascribed but thousands: and what can he have more but the kingdom? 
And Saul eyed David from tha
703, when they brought out those kings unto Joshua, that Joshua called for all the men of Israel, and said unto the captains of the men of war which went with him, Come near, put your feet upon the necks of these kings. And they came near, and put their feet upon the necks of them. 
And Joshua said unto them, Fear not, nor be dismayed, be strong and of good courage: for thus shall the LORD do to all your enemies against whom ye fight. 
And afterward Joshua smote them, and slew them, and hanged them on five trees: and they were hanging upon the trees until the evening. 
And it came to pass at the time of the going down of the sun, that Joshua commanded, and they took them down off the trees, and cas
692,rein I delighted not. 
Therefore thus saith the Lord GOD, Behold, my servants shall eat, but ye shall be hungry: behold, my servants shall drink, but ye shall be thirsty: behold, my servants shall rejoice, but ye shall be ashamed: 
Behold, my servants shall sing for joy of heart, but ye shall cry for sorrow of heart, and shall howl for vexation of spirit. 
And ye shall leave your name for a curse unto my chosen: for the Lord GOD shall slay thee, and call his servants by another name: 
That he who blesseth himself in the earth shall bless himself in the God of truth; and he that sweareth in the earth shall swear by the God of truth; because the former troubles are forgotten, and becau
651,alt lie down, and thy sleep shall be sweet. 
Be not afraid of sudden fear, neither of the desolation of the wicked, when it cometh. 
For the LORD shall be thy confidence, and shall keep thy foot from being taken. 
Withhold not good from them to whom it is due, when it is in the power of thine hand to do it. 
Say not unto thy neighbour, Go, and come again, and to morrow I will give; when thou hast it by thee. 
Devise not evil against thy neighbour, seeing he dwelleth securely by thee. 
Strive not with a man without cause, if he have done thee no harm. 
Envy thou not the oppressor, and choose none of his ways. 
For the froward is abomination to 
717,s saith the Holy Ghost, So shall the Jews at Jerusalem bind the man that owneth this girdle, and shall deliver him into the hands of the Gentiles. 
And when we heard these things, both we, and they of that place, besought him not to go up to Jerusalem. 
Then Paul answered, What mean ye to weep and to break mine heart? for I am ready not to be bound only, but also to die at Jerusalem for the name of the Lord Jesus. 
And when he would not be persuaded, we ceased, saying, The will of the Lord be done. 
And after those days we took up our carriages, and went up to Jerusalem. 
There went with us also certain of the disciples of Caesarea, and brought with them one Mnason of Cyprus, an old disciple, with whom we sh
705,
For before the child shall have knowledge to cry, My father, and my mother, the riches of Damascus and the spoil of Samaria shall be taken away before the king of Assyria. 
The LORD spake also unto me again, saying, 
Forasmuch as this people refuseth the waters of Shiloah that go softly, and rejoice in Rezin and Remaliah's son; 
Now therefore, behold, the Lord bringeth up upon them the waters of the river, strong and many, even the king of Assyria, and all his glory: and he shall come up over all his channels, and go over all his banks: 
And he shall pass through Judah; he shall overflow and go over, he shall reach even to the neck; and the stretching out of his wings shall fill the breadth of t
761,when his sons and his daughters were eating and drinking wine in their eldest brother's house: 
And there came a messenger unto Job, and said, The oxen were plowing, and the asses feeding beside them: 
And the Sabeans fell upon them, and took them away; yea, they have slain the servants with the edge of the sword; and I only am escaped alone to tell thee. 
While he was yet speaking, there came also another, and said, The fire of God is fallen from heaven, and hath burned up the sheep, and the servants, and consumed them; and I only am escaped alone to tell thee. 
While he was yet speaking, there came also another, and said, The Chaldeans made out three bands, and fell upon the camels, and have carried them away, yea, and slain the servants with the ed
617, sides of the pit, and her company is round about her grave: all of them slain, fallen by the sword, which caused terror in the land of the living. 
There is Elam and all her multitude round about her grave, all of them slain, fallen by the sword, which are gone down uncircumcised into the nether parts of the earth, which caused their terror in the land of the living; yet have they borne their shame with them that go down to the pit. 
They have set her a bed in the midst of the slain with all her multitude: her graves are round about him: all of them uncircumcised, slain by the sword: though their terror was c
677,t thou hast done this thing? 
And Abraham said, Because I thought, Surely the fear of God is not in this place; and they will slay me for my wife's sake. 
And yet indeed she is my sister; she is the daughter of my father, but not the daughter of my mother; and she became my wife. 
And it came to pass, when God caused me to wander from my father's house, that I said unto her, This is thy kindness which thou shalt shew unto me; at every place whither we shall come, say of me, He is my brother. 
And Abimelech took sheep, and oxen, and menservants, and womenservants, and gave them unto Abraham, and restored him Sarah his wife. 
And Abimelech said, Behold, my land is before
606,e time of the singing of birds is come, and the voice of the turtle is heard in our land; 
The fig tree putteth forth her green figs, and the vines with the tender grape give a good smell. Arise, my love, my fair one, and come away. 
O my dove, that art in the clefts of the rock, in the secret places of the stairs, let me see thy countenance, let me hear thy voice; for sweet is thy voice, and thy countenance is comely. 
Take us the foxes, the little foxes, that spoil the vines: for our vines have tender grapes. 
My beloved is mine, and I am his: he feedeth among the lilies. 
Until the day break, and
678,th laid upon it; 
And that the whole land thereof is brimstone, and salt, and burning, that it is not sown, nor beareth, nor any grass groweth therein, like the overthrow of Sodom, and Gomorrah, Admah, and Zeboim, which the LORD overthrew in his anger, and in his wrath: 
Even all nations shall say, Wherefore hath the LORD done thus unto this land? what meaneth the heat of this great anger? 
Then men shall say, Because they have forsaken the covenant of the LORD God of their fathers, which he made with them when he brought them forth out of the land of Egypt: 
For they went and served other gods, and worshipped them, gods whom they knew not, and whom he had not given unt
839,, and their brasen sockets twenty; the hooks of the pillars and their fillets were of silver. 
And for the north side the hangings were an hundred cubits, their pillars were twenty, and their sockets of brass twenty; the hooks of the pillars and their fillets of silver. 
And for the west side were hangings of fifty cubits, their pillars ten, and their sockets ten; the hooks of the pillars and their fillets of silver. 
And for the east side eastward fifty cubits. 
The hangings of the one side of the gate were fifteen cubits; their pillars three, and their sockets three. 
And for the other side of the court gate, on this hand and that hand, were hangings of fifteen cubits; their pillars three, and their sockets three. 
All the hangings of the court round about were of fine twined linen. 
And the sockets for the pillars were of br
650,tures shall be in all high places. 
They shall not hunger nor thirst; neither shall the heat nor sun smite them: for he that hath mercy on them shall lead them, even by the springs of water shall he guide them. 
And I will make all my mountains a way, and my highways shall be exalted. 
Behold, these shall come from far: and, lo, these from the north and from the west; and these from the land of Sinim. 
Sing, O heavens; and be joyful, O earth; and break forth into singing, O mountains: for the LORD hath comforted his people, and will have mercy upon his afflicted. 
But Zion said, The LORD hath forsaken me, and my Lord hath forgotten me. 
Can a
620,his thing be true, and the tokens of virginity be not found for the damsel: 
Then they shall bring out the damsel to the door of her father's house, and the men of her city shall stone her with stones that she die: because she hath wrought folly in Israel, to play the whore in her father's house: so shalt thou put evil away from among you. 
If a man be found lying with a woman married to an husband, then they shall both of them die, both the man that lay with the woman, and the woman: so shalt thou put away evil from Israel. 
If a damsel that is a virgin be betrothed unto an husband, and a man find her in the cit
667,, nor thy freewill offerings, or heave offering of thine hand: 
But thou must eat them before the LORD thy God in the place which the LORD thy God shall choose, thou, and thy son, and thy daughter, and thy manservant, and thy maidservant, and the Levite that is within thy gates: and thou shalt rejoice before the LORD thy God in all that thou puttest thine hands unto. 
Take heed to thyself that thou forsake not the Levite as long as thou livest upon the earth. 
When the LORD thy God shall enlarge thy border, as he hath promised thee, and thou shalt say, I will eat flesh, because thy soul longeth to eat flesh; thou mayest eat flesh, whatsoever thy soul lusteth 
825, their place: and our little ones shall dwell in the fenced cities because of the inhabitants of the land. 
We will not return unto our houses, until the children of Israel have inherited every man his inheritance. 
For we will not inherit with them on yonder side Jordan, or forward; because our inheritance is fallen to us on this side Jordan eastward. 
And Moses said unto them, If ye will do this thing, if ye will go armed before the LORD to war, 
And will go all of you armed over Jordan before the LORD, until he hath driven out his enemies from before him, 
And the land be subdued before the LORD: then afterward ye shall return, and be guiltless before the LORD, and before Israel; and this land shall be your possession before the LORD. 
But if ye will not do so, behold, ye have sinned against the LORD: and be su
691,r of our country, which slew many of us. 
And it came to pass, when their hearts were merry, that they said, Call for Samson, that he may make us sport. And they called for Samson out of the prison house; and he made them sport: and they set him between the pillars. 
And Samson said unto the lad that held him by the hand, Suffer me that I may feel the pillars whereupon the house standeth, that I may lean upon them. 
Now the house was full of men and women; and all the lords of the Philistines were there; and there were upon the roof about three thousand men and women, that beheld while Samson made sport. 
And Samson called unto the LORD, and said, O Lord God, remember me, I pray the
709,es, and avenge me of mine enemies: 
And I will turn my hand upon thee, and purely purge away thy dross, and take away all thy tin: 
And I will restore thy judges as at the first, and thy counsellors as at the beginning: afterward thou shalt be called, The city of righteousness, the faithful city. 
Zion shall be redeemed with judgment, and her converts with righteousness. 
And the destruction of the transgressors and of the sinners shall be together, and they that forsake the LORD shall be consumed. 
For they shall be ashamed of the oaks which ye have desired, and ye shall be confounded for the gardens that ye have chosen. 
For ye shall be as an oak whose leaf fadeth, and as a garden that hath no wate
690, menstruous woman among them. 
The LORD is righteous; for I have rebelled against his commandment: hear, I pray you, all people, and behold my sorrow: my virgins and my young men are gone into captivity. 
I called for my lovers, but they deceived me: my priests and mine elders gave up the ghost in the city, while they sought their meat to relieve their souls. 
Behold, O LORD; for I am in distress: my bowels are troubled; mine heart is turned within me; for I have grievously rebelled: abroad the sword bereaveth, at home there is as death. 
They have heard that I sigh: there is none to comfort me: all mine enemies have heard of my trouble; they are glad that thou hast done it: thou w
612,w it, he fell down at Jesus' knees, saying, Depart from me; for I am a sinful man, O Lord. 
For he was astonished, and all that were with him, at the draught of the fishes which they had taken: 
And so was also James, and John, the sons of Zebedee, which were partners with Simon. And Jesus said unto Simon, Fear not; from henceforth thou shalt catch men. 
And when they had brought their ships to land, they forsook all, and followed him. 
And it came to pass, when he was in a certain city, behold a man full of leprosy: who seeing Jesus fell on his face, and besought him, saying, Lord, if thou wilt, thou can
760,gs which were in their ears; and Jacob hid them under the oak which was by Shechem. 
And they journeyed: and the terror of God was upon the cities that were round about them, and they did not pursue after the sons of Jacob. 
So Jacob came to Luz, which is in the land of Canaan, that is, Bethel, he and all the people that were with him. 
And he built there an altar, and called the place Elbethel: because there God appeared unto him, when he fled from the face of his brother. 
But Deborah Rebekah's nurse died, and she was buried beneath Bethel under an oak: and the name of it was called Allonbachuth. 
And God appeared unto Jacob again, when he came out of Padanaram, and blessed him. 
And God said unto him, Thy name is Jacob: thy name shall not be calle
630,hey wrest my words: all their thoughts are against me for evil. 
They gather themselves together, they hide themselves, they mark my steps, when they wait for my soul. 
Shall they escape by iniquity? in thine anger cast down the people, O God. 
Thou tellest my wanderings: put thou my tears into thy bottle: are they not in thy book? 
When I cry unto thee, then shall mine enemies turn back: this I know; for God is for me. 
In God will I praise his word: in the LORD will I praise his word. 
In God have I put my trust: I will not be afraid what man can do unto me. 
Thy vows are upon me, O God: I will render praises unto thee. 
724,l the saints salute you. 
The grace of the Lord Jesus Christ, and the love of God, and the communion of the Holy Ghost, be with you all. Amen. 
Paul, an apostle, (not of men, neither by man, but by Jesus Christ, and God the Father, who raised him from the dead;) 
And all the brethren which are with me, unto the churches of Galatia: 
Grace be to you and peace from God the Father, and from our Lord Jesus Christ, 
Who gave himself for our sins, that he might deliver us from this present evil world, according to the will of God and our Father: 
To whom be glory for ever and ever. Amen. 
I marvel that ye are so soon removed from him that called you into the grace of Christ unto another gospel: 
Which is not another; but
611, that which thou spreadest forth to be thy sail; blue and purple from the isles of Elishah was that which covered thee. 
The inhabitants of Zidon and Arvad were thy mariners: thy wise men, O Tyrus, that were in thee, were thy pilots. 
The ancients of Gebal and the wise men thereof were in thee thy calkers: all the ships of the sea with their mariners were in thee to occupy thy merchandise. 
They of Persia and of Lud and of Phut were in thine army, thy men of war: they hanged the shield and helmet in thee; they set forth thy comeliness. 
The men of Arvad with thine army were upon thy walls round about, an
643,they shall not take of thee a stone for a corner, nor a stone for foundations; but thou shalt be desolate for ever, saith the LORD. 
Set ye up a standard in the land, blow the trumpet among the nations, prepare the nations against her, call together against her the kingdoms of Ararat, Minni, and Ashchenaz; appoint a captain against her; cause the horses to come up as the rough caterpillers. 
Prepare against her the nations with the kings of the Medes, the captains thereof, and all the rulers thereof, and all the land of his dominion. 
And the land shall tremble and sorrow: for every purpose of the LORD shall be performed against Babylo
807,em. And when he was now not far from the house, the centurion sent friends to him, saying unto him, Lord, trouble not thyself: for I am not worthy that thou shouldest enter under my roof: 
Wherefore neither thought I myself worthy to come unto thee: but say in a word, and my servant shall be healed. 
For I also am a man set under authority, having under me soldiers, and I say unto one, Go, and he goeth; and to another, Come, and he cometh; and to my servant, Do this, and he doeth it. 
When Jesus heard these things, he marvelled at him, and turned him about, and said unto the people that followed him, I say unto you, I have not found so great faith, no, not in Israel. 
And they that were sent, returning to the house, found the servant whole that had been sick. 
And it came to pass the day after, t
668, door were cherubims and palm trees made, and on the wall of the temple. 
The posts of the temple were squared, and the face of the sanctuary; the appearance of the one as the appearance of the other. 
The altar of wood was three cubits high, and the length thereof two cubits; and the corners thereof, and the length thereof, and the walls thereof, were of wood: and he said unto me, This is the table that is before the LORD. 
And the temple and the sanctuary had two doors. 
And the doors had two leaves apiece, two turning leaves; two leaves for the one door, and two leaves for the other door. 
And there were made on them, on the doors of the temple, cherubims a
786, field: all their service, wherein they made them serve, was with rigour. 
And the king of Egypt spake to the Hebrew midwives, of which the name of the one was Shiphrah, and the name of the other Puah: 
And he said, When ye do the office of a midwife to the Hebrew women, and see them upon the stools; if it be a son, then ye shall kill him: but if it be a daughter, then she shall live. 
But the midwives feared God, and did not as the king of Egypt commanded them, but saved the men children alive. 
And the king of Egypt called for the midwives, and said unto them, Why have ye done this thing, and have saved the men children alive? 
And the midwives said unto Pharaoh, Because the Hebrew women are not as the Egyptian women; for they are lively, and are delivered ere the midwives 
760,or they know not to do right, saith the LORD, who store up violence and robbery in their palaces. 
Therefore thus saith the Lord GOD; An adversary there shall be even round about the land; and he shall bring down thy strength from thee, and thy palaces shall be spoiled. 
Thus saith the LORD; As the shepherd taketh out of the mouth of the lion two legs, or a piece of an ear; so shall the children of Israel be taken out that dwell in Samaria in the corner of a bed, and in Damascus in a couch. 
Hear ye, and testify in the house of Jacob, saith the Lord GOD, the God of hosts, 
That in the day that I shall visit the transgressions of Israel upon him I will also visit the altars of Bethel: and the horns of the altar shall be cut off, and fall to the ground
647, shall be a statute for ever unto them throughout their generations. 
And thou shalt say unto them, Whatsoever man there be of the house of Israel, or of the strangers which sojourn among you, that offereth a burnt offering or sacrifice, 
And bringeth it not unto the door of the tabernacle of the congregation, to offer it unto the LORD; even that man shall be cut off from among his people. 
And whatsoever man there be of the house of Israel, or of the strangers that sojourn among you, that eateth any manner of blood; I will even set my face against that soul that eateth blood, and will cut him off from among his people. 
For the life of th
797,essed them into Pharaoh's cup, and I gave the cup into Pharaoh's hand. 
And Joseph said unto him, This is the interpretation of it: The three branches are three days: 
Yet within three days shall Pharaoh lift up thine head, and restore thee unto thy place: and thou shalt deliver Pharaoh's cup into his hand, after the former manner when thou wast his butler. 
But think on me when it shall be well with thee, and shew kindness, I pray thee, unto me, and make mention of me unto Pharaoh, and bring me out of this house: 
For indeed I was stolen away out of the land of the Hebrews: and here also have I done nothing that they should put me into the dungeon. 
When the chief baker saw that the interpretation was good, he said unto Joseph, I also was in my dream, and, behold, I had three white bas
635, said, Behold, I am at the point to die: and what profit shall this birthright do to me? 
And Jacob said, Swear to me this day; and he sware unto him: and he sold his birthright unto Jacob. 
Then Jacob gave Esau bread and pottage of lentiles; and he did eat and drink, and rose up, and went his way: thus Esau despised his birthright. 
And there was a famine in the land, beside the first famine that was in the days of Abraham. And Isaac went unto Abimelech king of the Philistines unto Gerar. 
And the LORD appeared unto him, and said, Go not down into Egypt; dwell in the land which I shall tell thee of: 
Sojourn in this land, and 
602,e death of all the persons of thy father's house. 
Abide thou with me, fear not: for he that seeketh my life seeketh thy life: but with me thou shalt be in safeguard. 
Then they told David, saying, Behold, the Philistines fight against Keilah, and they rob the threshingfloors. 
Therefore David enquired of the LORD, saying, Shall I go and smite these Philistines? And the LORD said unto David, Go, and smite the Philistines, and save Keilah. 
And David's men said unto him, Behold, we be afraid here in Judah: how much more then if we come to Keilah against the armies of the Philistines? 
Then David 
754,e spread abroad the tent over the tabernacle, and put the covering of the tent above upon it; as the LORD commanded Moses. 
And he took and put the testimony into the ark, and set the staves on the ark, and put the mercy seat above upon the ark: 
And he brought the ark into the tabernacle, and set up the vail of the covering, and covered the ark of the testimony; as the LORD commanded Moses. 
And he put the table in the tent of the congregation, upon the side of the tabernacle northward, without the vail. 
And he set the bread in order upon it before the LORD; as the LORD had commanded Moses. 
And he put the candlestick in the tent of the congregation, over against the table, on the side of the tabernacle southward. 
And he lighted the lamps be
744,Then the king called to Ziba, Saul's servant, and said unto him, I have given unto thy master's son all that pertained to Saul and to all his house. 
Thou therefore, and thy sons, and thy servants, shall till the land for him, and thou shalt bring in the fruits, that thy master's son may have food to eat: but Mephibosheth thy master's son shall eat bread alway at my table. Now Ziba had fifteen sons and twenty servants. 
Then said Ziba unto the king, According to all that my lord the king hath commanded his servant, so shall thy servant do. As for Mephibosheth, said the king, he shall eat at my table, as one of the king's sons. 
And Mephibosheth had a young son, whose name was Micha. And all that dwelt in the house of Ziba were servant
827,, and after that let her be received in again. 
And Miriam was shut out from the camp seven days: and the people journeyed not till Miriam was brought in again. 
And afterward the people removed from Hazeroth, and pitched in the wilderness of Paran. 
And the LORD spake unto Moses, saying, 
Send thou men, that they may search the land of Canaan, which I give unto the children of Israel: of every tribe of their fathers shall ye send a man, every one a ruler among them. 
And Moses by the commandment of the LORD sent them from the wilderness of Paran: all those men were heads of the children of Israel. 
And these were their names: of the tribe of Reuben, Shammua the son of Zaccur. 
Of the tribe of Simeon, Shaphat the son of Hori. 
Of the tribe of Judah, Caleb the son of Jephunneh. 
Of the tribe of Issachar, Igal the son
723,rtheless, whereto we have already attained, let us walk by the same rule, let us mind the same thing. 
Brethren, be followers together of me, and mark them which walk so as ye have us for an ensample. 
(For many walk, of whom I have told you often, and now tell you even weeping, that they are the enemies of the cross of Christ: 
Whose end is destruction, whose God is their belly, and whose glory is in their shame, who mind earthly things.) 
For our conversation is in heaven; from whence also we look for the Saviour, the Lord Jesus Christ: 
Who shall change our vile body, that it may be fashioned like unto his glorious body, according to the working whereby he is able even to subdue all things unto himself. 
Theref
625,sehold stuff to Tobiah out of the chamber. 
Then I commanded, and they cleansed the chambers: and thither brought I again the vessels of the house of God, with the meat offering and the frankincense. 
And I perceived that the portions of the Levites had not been given them: for the Levites and the singers, that did the work, were fled every one to his field. 
Then contended I with the rulers, and said, Why is the house of God forsaken? And I gathered them together, and set them in their place. 
Then brought all Judah the tithe of the corn and the new wine and the oil unto the treasuries. 
And I made treasurers over th
586, 
If mine heart have been deceived by a woman, or if I have laid wait at my neighbour's door; 
Then let my wife grind unto another, and let others bow down upon her. 
For this is an heinous crime; yea, it is an iniquity to be punished by the judges. 
For it is a fire that consumeth to destruction, and would root out all mine increase. 
If I did despise the cause of my manservant or of my maidservant, when they contended with me; 
What then shall I do when God riseth up? and when he visiteth, what shall I answer him? 
Did not he that made me in the womb make him? and did not one f
729,ever shall offend one of these little ones that believe in me, it is better for him that a millstone were hanged about his neck, and he were cast into the sea. 
And if thy hand offend thee, cut it off: it is better for thee to enter into life maimed, than having two hands to go into hell, into the fire that never shall be quenched: 
Where their worm dieth not, and the fire is not quenched. 
And if thy foot offend thee, cut it off: it is better for thee to enter halt into life, than having two feet to be cast into hell, into the fire that never shall be quenched: 
Where their worm dieth not, and the fire is not quenched. 
And if thine eye offend thee, pluck it out: it is better for thee to enter into the kingdom of God w
615,ve left shall fall by the sword. 
And ye shall do as I have done: ye shall not cover your lips, nor eat the bread of men. 
And your tires shall be upon your heads, and your shoes upon your feet: ye shall not mourn nor weep; but ye shall pine away for your iniquities, and mourn one toward another. 
Thus Ezekiel is unto you a sign: according to all that he hath done shall ye do: and when this cometh, ye shall know that I am the Lord GOD. 
Also, thou son of man, shall it not be in the day when I take from them their strength, the joy of their glory, the desire of their eyes, and that whereupon they set their mi
836,he king, she fell on her face to the ground, and did obeisance, and said, Help, O king. 
And the king said unto her, What aileth thee? And she answered, I am indeed a widow woman, and mine husband is dead. 
And thy handmaid had two sons, and they two strove together in the field, and there was none to part them, but the one smote the other, and slew him. 
And, behold, the whole family is risen against thine handmaid, and they said, Deliver him that smote his brother, that we may kill him, for the life of his brother whom he slew; and we will destroy the heir also: and so they shall quench my coal which is left, and shall not leave to my husband neither name nor remainder upon the earth. 
And the king said unto the woman, Go to thine house, and I will give charge concerning thee. 
And the woman of Tekoah said unto the king, M
783,; because the work that is wrought under the sun is grievous unto me: for all is vanity and vexation of spirit. 
Yea, I hated all my labour which I had taken under the sun: because I should leave it unto the man that shall be after me. 
And who knoweth whether he shall be a wise man or a fool? yet shall he have rule over all my labour wherein I have laboured, and wherein I have shewed myself wise under the sun. This is also vanity. 
Therefore I went about to cause my heart to despair of all the labour which I took under the sun. 
For there is a man whose labour is in wisdom, and in knowledge, and in equity; yet to a man that hath not laboured therein shall he leave it for his portion. This also is vanity and a great evil. 
For what hath man of all his labour, and of the ve
763,nded his thirty and two captains that had rule over his chariots, saying, Fight neither with small nor great, save only with the king of Israel. 
And it came to pass, when the captains of the chariots saw Jehoshaphat, that they said, Surely it is the king of Israel. And they turned aside to fight against him: and Jehoshaphat cried out. 
And it came to pass, when the captains of the chariots perceived that it was not the king of Israel, that they turned back from pursuing him. 
And a certain man drew a bow at a venture, and smote the king of Israel between the joints of the harness: wherefore he said unto the driver of his chariot, Turn thine hand, and carry me out of the host; for I am wounded. 
And the battle increased that day: and the king was stayed
629,t of the LORD of all the earth passeth over before you into Jordan. 
Now therefore take you twelve men out of the tribes of Israel, out of every tribe a man. 
And it shall come to pass, as soon as the soles of the feet of the priests that bear the ark of the LORD, the LORD of all the earth, shall rest in the waters of Jordan, that the waters of Jordan shall be cut off from the waters that come down from above; and they shall stand upon an heap. 
And it came to pass, when the people removed from their tents, to pass over Jordan, and the priests bearing the ark of the covenant before the people; 
And as they that bare the a
571,adversary reproach? shall the enemy blaspheme thy name for ever? 
Why withdrawest thou thy hand, even thy right hand? pluck it out of thy bosom. 
For God is my King of old, working salvation in the midst of the earth. 
Thou didst divide the sea by thy strength: thou brakest the heads of the dragons in the waters. 
Thou brakest the heads of leviathan in pieces, and gavest him to be meat to the people inhabiting the wilderness. 
Thou didst cleave the fountain and the flood: thou driedst up mighty rivers. 
The day is thine, the night also is thine: thou hast prepared 
765,he ark of thy strength: let thy priests, O LORD God, be clothed with salvation, and let thy saints rejoice in goodness. 
O LORD God, turn not away the face of thine anointed: remember the mercies of David thy servant. 
Now when Solomon had made an end of praying, the fire came down from heaven, and consumed the burnt offering and the sacrifices; and the glory of the LORD filled the house. 
And the priests could not enter into the house of the LORD, because the glory of the LORD had filled the LORD's house. 
And when all the children of Israel saw how the fire came down, and the glory of the LORD upon the house, they bowed themselves with their faces to the ground upon the pavement, and worshipped, and praised the LORD, saying, For he is good; for his merc
796,g refuge. 
Let my mouth be filled with thy praise and with thy honour all the day. 
Cast me not off in the time of old age; forsake me not when my strength faileth. 
For mine enemies speak against me; and they that lay wait for my soul take counsel together, 
Saying, God hath forsaken him: persecute and take him; for there is none to deliver him. 
O God, be not far from me: O my God, make haste for my help. 
Let them be confounded and consumed that are adversaries to my soul; let them be covered with reproach and dishonour that seek my hurt. 
But I will hope continually, and will yet praise thee more and more. 
My mouth shall shew forth thy righteousness and thy salvation all the day; for I know not the numbers thereof. 
I will go in the strength of the Lord GOD: I will make mention of
713,to me, This is the curse that goeth forth over the face of the whole earth: for every one that stealeth shall be cut off as on this side according to it; and every one that sweareth shall be cut off as on that side according to it. 
I will bring it forth, saith the LORD of hosts, and it shall enter into the house of the thief, and into the house of him that sweareth falsely by my name: and it shall remain in the midst of his house, and shall consume it with the timber thereof and the stones thereof. 
Then the angel that talked with me went forth, and said unto me, Lift up now thine eyes, and see what is this that goeth forth. 
And I said, What is it? And he said, This is an ephah that goeth forth. He sai
786,this that thou hast done unto us? And he said unto them, As they did unto me, so have I done unto them. 
And they said unto him, We are come down to bind thee, that we may deliver thee into the hand of the Philistines. And Samson said unto them, Swear unto me, that ye will not fall upon me yourselves. 
And they spake unto him, saying, No; but we will bind thee fast, and deliver thee into their hand: but surely we will not kill thee. And they bound him with two new cords, and brought him up from the rock. 
And when he came unto Lehi, the Philistines shouted against him: and the Spirit of the LORD came mightily upon him, and the cords that were upon his arms became as flax that was burnt with fire, and his bands loosed from off his hands. 
And he found a new jawbone of an ass, 
675,all their instruments, and with all their service: and by name ye shall reckon the instruments of the charge of their burden. 
This is the service of the families of the sons of Merari, according to all their service, in the tabernacle of the congregation, under the hand of Ithamar the son of Aaron the priest. 
And Moses and Aaron and the chief of the congregation numbered the sons of the Kohathites after their families, and after the house of their fathers, 
From thirty years old and upward even unto fifty years old, every one that entereth into the service, for the work in the tabernacle of the congregation: 
And those that were numbered of them by their families w
684,r your sakes, O house of Israel, but for mine holy name's sake, which ye have profaned among the heathen, whither ye went. 
And I will sanctify my great name, which was profaned among the heathen, which ye have profaned in the midst of them; and the heathen shall know that I am the LORD, saith the Lord GOD, when I shall be sanctified in you before their eyes. 
For I will take you from among the heathen, and gather you out of all countries, and will bring you into your own land. 
Then will I sprinkle clean water upon you, and ye shall be clean: from all your filthiness, and from all your idols, will I cleanse you. 
A new heart also will I give you, and a new spirit will I put 
829,ndred threescore and six talents of gold, 
Beside that he had of the merchantmen, and of the traffick of the spice merchants, and of all the kings of Arabia, and of the governors of the country. 
And king Solomon made two hundred targets of beaten gold: six hundred shekels of gold went to one target. 
And he made three hundred shields of beaten gold; three pound of gold went to one shield: and the king put them in the house of the forest of Lebanon. 
Moreover the king made a great throne of ivory, and overlaid it with the best gold. 
The throne had six steps, and the top of the throne was round behind: and there were stays on either side on the place of the seat, and two lions stood beside the stays. 
And twelve lions stood there on the one side and on the other upon the six steps: there was not the like made in any k
569,ey trembled, and all the hills moved lightly. 
I beheld, and, lo, there was no man, and all the birds of the heavens were fled. 
I beheld, and, lo, the fruitful place was a wilderness, and all the cities thereof were broken down at the presence of the LORD, and by his fierce anger. 
For thus hath the LORD said, The whole land shall be desolate; yet will I not make a full end. 
For this shall the earth mourn, and the heavens above be black; because I have spoken it, I have purposed it, and will not repent, neither will I turn back from it. 
The whole city shall fl
830,ment, and taught him knowledge, and shewed to him the way of understanding? 
Behold, the nations are as a drop of a bucket, and are counted as the small dust of the balance: behold, he taketh up the isles as a very little thing. 
And Lebanon is not sufficient to burn, nor the beasts thereof sufficient for a burnt offering. 
All nations before him are as nothing; and they are counted to him less than nothing, and vanity. 
To whom then will ye liken God? or what likeness will ye compare unto him? 
The workman melteth a graven image, and the goldsmith spreadeth it over with gold, and casteth silver chains. 
He that is so impoverished that he hath no oblation chooseth a tree that will not rot; he seeketh unto him a cunning workman to prepare a graven image, that shall not be moved. 
Have ye not known? have ye not heard? ha
649,angel of the Lord came upon him, and a light shined in the prison: and he smote Peter on the side, and raised him up, saying, Arise up quickly. And his chains fell off from his hands. 
And the angel said unto him, Gird thyself, and bind on thy sandals. And so he did. And he saith unto him, Cast thy garment about thee, and follow me. 
And he went out, and followed him; and wist not that it was true which was done by the angel; but thought he saw a vision. 
When they were past the first and the second ward, they came unto the iron gate that leadeth unto the city; which opened to them of his own accord: and they went out, and passed on through 
839, daughter ye shall save alive. 
And there went a man of the house of Levi, and took to wife a daughter of Levi. 
And the woman conceived, and bare a son: and when she saw him that he was a goodly child, she hid him three months. 
And when she could not longer hide him, she took for him an ark of bulrushes, and daubed it with slime and with pitch, and put the child therein; and she laid it in the flags by the river's brink. 
And his sister stood afar off, to wit what would be done to him. 
And the daughter of Pharaoh came down to wash herself at the river; and her maidens walked along by the river's side; and when she saw the ark among the flags, she sent her maid to fetch it. 
And when she had opened it, she saw the child: and, behold, the babe wept. And she had compassion on him, and said, This is one of the Hebrews' children.
609,led from him. 
Now therefore that I am come to speak of this thing unto my lord the king, it is because the people have made me afraid: and thy handmaid said, I will now speak unto the king; it may be that the king will perform the request of his handmaid. 
For the king will hear, to deliver his handmaid out of the hand of the man that would destroy me and my son together out of the inheritance of God. 
Then thine handmaid said, The word of my lord the king shall now be comfortable: for as an angel of God, so is my lord the king to discern good and bad: therefore the LORD thy God will be with thee. 
Th
707,nding the children of Korah died not. 
The sons of Simeon after their families: of Nemuel, the family of the Nemuelites: of Jamin, the family of the Jaminites: of Jachin, the family of the Jachinites: 
Of Zerah, the family of the Zarhites: of Shaul, the family of the Shaulites. 
These are the families of the Simeonites, twenty and two thousand and two hundred. 
The children of Gad after their families: of Zephon, the family of the Zephonites: of Haggi, the family of the Haggites: of Shuni, the family of the Shunites: 
Of Ozni, the family of the Oznites: of Eri, the family of the Erites: 
Of Arod, the family of the Arodites: of Areli, the family of the Arelites. 
These are the families of the childr
767,le: are they not in thy book? 
When I cry unto thee, then shall mine enemies turn back: this I know; for God is for me. 
In God will I praise his word: in the LORD will I praise his word. 
In God have I put my trust: I will not be afraid what man can do unto me. 
Thy vows are upon me, O God: I will render praises unto thee. 
For thou hast delivered my soul from death: wilt not thou deliver my feet from falling, that I may walk before God in the light of the living? 
Be merciful unto me, O God, be merciful unto me: for my soul trusteth in thee: yea, in the shadow of thy wings will I make my refuge, until these calamities be overpast. 
I will cry unto God most high; unto God that performeth all things for me. 
He shall send from heaven, and save me from the r
664,t by himself. 
And if the servant shall plainly say, I love my master, my wife, and my children; I will not go out free: 
Then his master shall bring him unto the judges; he shall also bring him to the door, or unto the door post; and his master shall bore his ear through with an aul; and he shall serve him for ever. 
And if a man sell his daughter to be a maidservant, she shall not go out as the menservants do. 
If she please not her master, who hath betrothed her to himself, then shall he let her be redeemed: to sell her unto a strange nation he shall have no power, seeing he hath dealt deceitfully with her. 
And if he have betrothed her unto his son, he
767, the wilderness, and rivers in the desert, to give drink to my people, my chosen. 
This people have I formed for myself; they shall shew forth my praise. 
But thou hast not called upon me, O Jacob; but thou hast been weary of me, O Israel. 
Thou hast not brought me the small cattle of thy burnt offerings; neither hast thou honoured me with thy sacrifices. I have not caused thee to serve with an offering, nor wearied thee with incense. 
Thou hast bought me no sweet cane with money, neither hast thou filled me with the fat of thy sacrifices: but thou hast made me to serve with thy sins, thou hast wearied me with thine iniquities. 
I, even I, am he that blotteth out thy transgressions for mine own sake, and will not remember thy sins. 
Put me in remembrance: l
830,his prisoners. 
Let the heaven and earth praise him, the seas, and every thing that moveth therein. 
For God will save Zion, and will build the cities of Judah: that they may dwell there, and have it in possession. 
The seed also of his servants shall inherit it: and they that love his name shall dwell therein. 
MAKE HASTE, O GOD, TO DELIVER ME; MAKE HASTE TO HELP ME, O LORD. 
Let them be ashamed and confounded that seek after my soul: let them be turned backward, and put to confusion, that desire my hurt. 
Let them be turned back for a reward of their shame that say, Aha, aha. 
Let all those that seek thee rejoice and be glad in thee: and let such as love thy salvation say continually, Let God be magnified. 
But I am poor and needy: make haste unto me, O God: thou art my help and my deliverer; O LORD, make no tarrying
642,re will I deliver up the city with all that is therein. 
And it shall come to pass, if there remain ten men in one house, that they shall die. 
And a man's uncle shall take him up, and he that burneth him, to bring out the bones out of the house, and shall say unto him that is by the sides of the house, Is there yet any with thee? and he shall say, No. Then shall he say, Hold thy tongue: for we may not make mention of the name of the LORD. 
For, behold, the LORD commandeth, and he will smite the great house with breaches, and the little house with clefts. 
Shall horses run upon the rock? will one plow there with oxen? for ye have turn
714, pass before Samuel. And he said, Neither hath the LORD chosen this. 
Then Jesse made Shammah to pass by. And he said, Neither hath the LORD chosen this. 
Again, Jesse made seven of his sons to pass before Samuel. And Samuel said unto Jesse, The LORD hath not chosen these. 
And Samuel said unto Jesse, Are here all thy children? And he said, There remaineth yet the youngest, and, behold, he keepeth the sheep. And Samuel said unto Jesse, Send and fetch him: for we will not sit down till he come hither. 
And he sent, and brought him in. Now he was ruddy, and withal of a beautiful countenance, and goodly to look to. And the LORD said, Arise, anoint him: for this is he. 
Then Samuel took the horn of oil, and a
723,fore the enemy; I will shew them the back, and not the face, in the day of their calamity. 
Then said they, Come and let us devise devices against Jeremiah; for the law shall not perish from the priest, nor counsel from the wise, nor the word from the prophet. Come, and let us smite him with the tongue, and let us not give heed to any of his words. 
Give heed to me, O LORD, and hearken to the voice of them that contend with me. 
Shall evil be recompensed for good? for they have digged a pit for my soul. Remember that I stood before thee to speak good for them, and to turn away thy wrath from them. 
Therefore deliver up their children to the famine, and pour out their blood by the force of the sword; and let their 
801,e, saith the Lord GOD, I have no pleasure in the death of the wicked; but that the wicked turn from his way and live: turn ye, turn ye from your evil ways; for why will ye die, O house of Israel? 
Therefore, thou son of man, say unto the children of thy people, The righteousness of the righteous shall not deliver him in the day of his transgression: as for the wickedness of the wicked, he shall not fall thereby in the day that he turneth from his wickedness; neither shall the righteous be able to live for his righteousness in the day that he sinneth. 
When I shall say to the righteous, that he shall surely live; if he trust to his own righteousness, and commit iniquity, all his righteousnesses shall not be remembered; but for his iniquity that he hath committed, he shall die for it. 
Again,
791,lest any man deceive you: 
For many shall come in my name, saying, I am Christ; and shall deceive many. 
And when ye shall hear of wars and rumours of wars, be ye not troubled: for such things must needs be; but the end shall not be yet. 
For nation shall rise against nation, and kingdom against kingdom: and there shall be earthquakes in divers places, and there shall be famines and troubles: these are the beginnings of sorrows. 
But take heed to yourselves: for they shall deliver you up to councils; and in the synagogues ye shall be beaten: and ye shall be brought before rulers and kings for my sake, for a testimony against them. 
And the gospel must first be published among all nations. 
But when they shall lead you, and deliver you up, take no thought beforehand what ye shall s
597,ee from the land of the north, saith the LORD: for I have spread you abroad as the four winds of the heaven, saith the LORD. 
Deliver thyself, O Zion, that dwellest with the daughter of Babylon. 
For thus saith the LORD of hosts; After the glory hath he sent me unto the nations which spoiled you: for he that toucheth you toucheth the apple of his eye. 
For, behold, I will shake mine hand upon them, and they shall be a spoil to their servants: and ye shall know that the LORD of hosts hath sent me. 
Sing and rejoice, O daughter of Zion: for, lo, I come, and I will dwell in the midst of thee, 
769,LORD your God. 
Thou shalt rise up before the hoary head, and honour the face of the old man, and fear thy God: I am the LORD. 
And if a stranger sojourn with thee in your land, ye shall not vex him. 
But the stranger that dwelleth with you shall be unto you as one born among you, and thou shalt love him as thyself; for ye were strangers in the land of Egypt: I am the LORD your God. 
Ye shall do no unrighteousness in judgment, in meteyard, in weight, or in measure. 
Just balances, just weights, a just ephah, and a just hin, shall ye have: I am the LORD your God, which brought you out of the land of Egypt. 
Therefore shall ye observe all my statutes, and all my judgments, and do them: I am the LORD. 
And the LORD spake unto Moses, saying, 
Again, thou shalt sa
663, congregation before Aaron, and before his sons: as the LORD had commanded Moses concerning the Levites, so did they unto them. 
And the LORD spake unto Moses, saying, 
This is it that belongeth unto the Levites: from twenty and five years old and upward they shall go in to wait upon the service of the tabernacle of the congregation: 
And from the age of fifty years they shall cease waiting upon the service thereof, and shall serve no more: 
But shall minister with their brethren in the tabernacle of the congregation, to keep the charge, and shall do no service. Thus shalt thou do unto the Levites touching their charge. 
And the LORD spake unto Moses in t
753, the collection for the saints, as I have given order to the churches of Galatia, even so do ye. 
Upon the first day of the week let every one of you lay by him in store, as God hath prospered him, that there be no gatherings when I come. 
And when I come, whomsoever ye shall approve by your letters, them will I send to bring your liberality unto Jerusalem. 
And if it be meet that I go also, they shall go with me. 
Now I will come unto you, when I shall pass through Macedonia: for I do pass through Macedonia. 
And it may be that I will abide, yea, and winter with you, that ye may bring me on my journey whithersoever I go. 
For I will not see you now by the way; but I trust to tarry a while with you, if the Lord permit. 
But I will tarry at Eph
626, he chose twelve, whom also he named apostles; 
Simon, (whom he also named Peter,) and Andrew his brother, James and John, Philip and Bartholomew, 
Matthew and Thomas, James the son of Alphaeus, and Simon called Zelotes, 
And Judas the brother of James, and Judas Iscariot, which also was the traitor. 
And he came down with them, and stood in the plain, and the company of his disciples, and a great multitude of people out of all Judaea and Jerusalem, and from the sea coast of Tyre and Sidon, which came to hear him, and to be healed of their diseases; 
And they that were vexed with unclean spirits: and they were healed. 
725, cry alarm against you. O children of Israel, fight ye not against the LORD God of your fathers; for ye shall not prosper. 
But Jeroboam caused an ambushment to come about behind them: so they were before Judah, and the ambushment was behind them. 
And when Judah looked back, behold, the battle was before and behind: and they cried unto the LORD, and the priests sounded with the trumpets. 
Then the men of Judah gave a shout: and as the men of Judah shouted, it came to pass, that God smote Jeroboam and all Israel before Abijah and Judah. 
And the children of Israel fled before Judah: and God delivered them into their hand. 
And Abijah and his people slew them with a great slaughter: so there fell down slain of Israel
738, 
Nicodemus answered and said unto him, How can these things be? 
Jesus answered and said unto him, Art thou a master of Israel, and knowest not these things? 
Verily, verily, I say unto thee, We speak that we do know, and testify that we have seen; and ye receive not our witness. 
If I have told you earthly things, and ye believe not, how shall ye believe, if I tell you of heavenly things? 
And no man hath ascended up to heaven, but he that came down from heaven, even the Son of man which is in heaven. 
And as Moses lifted up the serpent in the wilderness, even so must the Son of man be lifted up: 
That whosoever believeth in him should not perish, but have eternal life. 
For God so loved the world, that he gave his only begott
674, said, As the LORD liveth, that hath redeemed my soul out of all distress, 
Even as I sware unto thee by the LORD God of Israel, saying, Assuredly Solomon thy son shall reign after me, and he shall sit upon my throne in my stead; even so will I certainly do this day. 
Then Bathsheba bowed with her face to the earth, and did reverence to the king, and said, Let my lord king David live for ever. 
And king David said, Call me Zadok the priest, and Nathan the prophet, and Benaiah the son of Jehoiada. And they came before the king. 
The king also said unto them, Take with you the servants of your lord, and cause Solomon my son to ride upon mine own mule, and bring him do
835, the child Jesus, to do for him after the custom of the law, 
Then took he him up in his arms, and blessed God, and said, 
Lord, now lettest thou thy servant depart in peace, according to thy word: 
For mine eyes have seen thy salvation, 
Which thou hast prepared before the face of all people; 
A light to lighten the Gentiles, and the glory of thy people Israel. 
And Joseph and his mother marvelled at those things which were spoken of him. 
And Simeon blessed them, and said unto Mary his mother, Behold, this child is set for the fall and rising again of many in Israel; and for a sign which shall be spoken against; 
(Yea, a sword shall pierce through thy own soul also,) that the thoughts of many hearts may be revealed. 
And there was one Anna, a prophetess, the daughter of Phanuel, of the tribe of Aser: she was of a great ag
678,ver your lips, nor eat the bread of men. 
And your tires shall be upon your heads, and your shoes upon your feet: ye shall not mourn nor weep; but ye shall pine away for your iniquities, and mourn one toward another. 
Thus Ezekiel is unto you a sign: according to all that he hath done shall ye do: and when this cometh, ye shall know that I am the Lord GOD. 
Also, thou son of man, shall it not be in the day when I take from them their strength, the joy of their glory, the desire of their eyes, and that whereupon they set their minds, their sons and their daughters, 
That he that escapeth in that day shall come unto thee, to cause thee to hear it with thine ears? 
In that
727,t them. 
Then he remembered the days of old, Moses, and his people, saying, Where is he that brought them up out of the sea with the shepherd of his flock? where is he that put his holy Spirit within him? 
That led them by the right hand of Moses with his glorious arm, dividing the water before them, to make himself an everlasting name? 
That led them through the deep, as an horse in the wilderness, that they should not stumble? 
As a beast goeth down into the valley, the Spirit of the LORD caused him to rest: so didst thou lead thy people, to make thyself a glorious name. 
Look down from heaven, and behold from the habitation of thy holiness and of thy glory: where is thy zeal and thy strength, the sounding of thy bo
808, pass, that when they shall be hungry, they shall fret themselves, and curse their king and their God, and look upward. 
And they shall look unto the earth; and behold trouble and darkness, dimness of anguish; and they shall be driven to darkness. 
Nevertheless the dimness shall not be such as was in her vexation, when at the first he lightly afflicted the land of Zebulun and the land of Naphtali, and afterward did more grievously afflict her by the way of the sea, beyond Jordan, in Galilee of the nations. 
The people that walked in darkness have seen a great light: they that dwell in the land of the shadow of death, upon them hath the light shined. 
Thou hast multiplied the nation, and not increased the joy: they joy before thee according to the joy in harvest, and as men rejoice when they divide
789, Pharaoh's horses, his chariots, and his horsemen. 
And it came to pass, that in the morning watch the LORD looked unto the host of the Egyptians through the pillar of fire and of the cloud, and troubled the host of the Egyptians, 
And took off their chariot wheels, that they drave them heavily: so that the Egyptians said, Let us flee from the face of Israel; for the LORD fighteth for them against the Egyptians. 
And the LORD said unto Moses, Stretch out thine hand over the sea, that the waters may come again upon the Egyptians, upon their chariots, and upon their horsemen. 
And Moses stretched forth his hand over the sea, and the sea returned to his strength when the morning appeared; and the Egyptians fled against it; and the LORD overthrew the Egyptians in the midst of the se
834, refused to receive correction: they have made their faces harder than a rock; they have refused to return. 
Therefore I said, Surely these are poor; they are foolish: for they know not the way of the LORD, nor the judgment of their God. 
I will get me unto the great men, and will speak unto them; for they have known the way of the LORD, and the judgment of their God: but these have altogether broken the yoke, and burst the bonds. 
Wherefore a lion out of the forest shall slay them, and a wolf of the evenings shall spoil them, a leopard shall watch over their cities: every one that goeth out thence shall be torn in pieces: because their transgressions are many, and their backslidings are increased. 
How shall I pardon thee for this? thy children have forsaken me, and sworn by them that are no gods: when I had fed them to t
819, year for a sacrifice of peace offerings. 
And the priest shall wave them with the bread of the firstfruits for a wave offering before the LORD, with the two lambs: they shall be holy to the LORD for the priest. 
And ye shall proclaim on the selfsame day, that it may be an holy convocation unto you: ye shall do no servile work therein: it shall be a statute for ever in all your dwellings throughout your generations. 
And when ye reap the harvest of your land, thou shalt not make clean riddance of the corners of thy field when thou reapest, neither shalt thou gather any gleaning of thy harvest: thou shalt leave them unto the poor, and to the stranger: I am the LORD your God. 
And the LORD spake unto Moses, saying, 
Speak unto the children of Israel, saying, In the seventh month, in the first day of the month,
785,ople. 
Six days may work be done; but in the seventh is the sabbath of rest, holy to the LORD: whosoever doeth any work in the sabbath day, he shall surely be put to death. 
Wherefore the children of Israel shall keep the sabbath, to observe the sabbath throughout their generations, for a perpetual covenant. 
It is a sign between me and the children of Israel for ever: for in six days the LORD made heaven and earth, and on the seventh day he rested, and was refreshed. 
And he gave unto Moses, when he had made an end of communing with him upon mount Sinai, two tables of testimony, tables of stone, written with the finger of God. 
And when the people saw that Moses delayed to come down out of the mount, the people gathered themselves together unto Aaron, and said unto him, Up,
709,ing, there came also another, and said, Thy sons and thy daughters were eating and drinking wine in their eldest brother's house: 
And, behold, there came a great wind from the wilderness, and smote the four corners of the house, and it fell upon the young men, and they are dead; and I only am escaped alone to tell thee. 
Then Job arose, and rent his mantle, and shaved his head, and fell down upon the ground, and worshipped, 
And said, Naked came I out of my mother's womb, and naked shall I return thither: the LORD gave, and the LORD hath taken away; blessed be the name of the LORD. 
In all this Job sinned not, nor charged God foolishly. 
Again there was a day when the sons of God came to present the
724,corner, and the simple will beware: and reprove one that hath understanding, and he will understand knowledge. 
He that wasteth his father, and chaseth away his mother, is a son that causeth shame, and bringeth reproach. 
Cease, my son, to hear the instruction that causeth to err from the words of knowledge. 
An ungodly witness scorneth judgment: and the mouth of the wicked devoureth iniquity. 
Judgments are prepared for scorners, and stripes for the back of fools. 
Wine is a mocker, strong drink is raging: and whosoever is deceived thereby is not wise. 
The fear of a king is as the roaring of a lion: whoso provoketh him to anger sinneth against his own soul. 
It is an honour for a man to cease from strife: but eve
695,are silver and gold, the work of men's hands. 
They have mouths, but they speak not: eyes have they, but they see not: 
They have ears, but they hear not: noses have they, but they smell not: 
They have hands, but they handle not: feet have they, but they walk not: neither speak they through their throat. 
They that make them are like unto them; so is every one that trusteth in them. 
O Israel, trust thou in the LORD: he is their help and their shield. 
O house of Aaron, trust in the LORD: he is their help and their shield. 
Ye that fear the LORD, trust in the LORD: he is their help and their shield. 
The LORD hath been mindful of us: he will bless us; he will bless the house of Israel;
756,m again unto the LORD; and they testified against them: but they would not give ear. 
And the Spirit of God came upon Zechariah the son of Jehoiada the priest, which stood above the people, and said unto them, Thus saith God, Why transgress ye the commandments of the LORD, that ye cannot prosper? because ye have forsaken the LORD, he hath also forsaken you. 
And they conspired against him, and stoned him with stones at the commandment of the king in the court of the house of the LORD. 
Thus Joash the king remembered not the kindness which Jehoiada his father had done to him, but slew his son. And when he died, he said, The LORD look upon it, and require it. 
And it came to pass at the end of the year, that the host of Syria came up against him: a
685,is hand from the altar, saying, Lay hold on him. And his hand, which he put forth against him, dried up, so that he could not pull it in again to him. 
The altar also was rent, and the ashes poured out from the altar, according to the sign which the man of God had given by the word of the LORD. 
And the king answered and said unto the man of God, Intreat now the face of the LORD thy God, and pray for me, that my hand may be restored me again. And the man of God besought the LORD, and the king's hand was restored him again, and became as it was before. 
And the king said unto the man of God, Come home with me, and refresh thyself, and I will give thee a reward. 
And the man of 
659,damnation, because they have cast off their first faith. 
And withal they learn to be idle, wandering about from house to house; and not only idle, but tattlers also and busybodies, speaking things which they ought not. 
I will therefore that the younger women marry, bear children, guide the house, give none occasion to the adversary to speak reproachfully. 
For some are already turned aside after Satan. 
If any man or woman that believeth have widows, let them relieve them, and let not the church be charged; that it may relieve them that are widows indeed. 
Let the elders that rule well be counted worthy of double honour, especially they who labour i
697, Judah. 
And they arose, and went to Ziph before Saul: but David and his men were in the wilderness of Maon, in the plain on the south of Jeshimon. 
Saul also and his men went to seek him. And they told David; wherefore he came down into a rock, and abode in the wilderness of Maon. And when Saul heard that, he pursued after David in the wilderness of Maon. 
And Saul went on this side of the mountain, and David and his men on that side of the mountain: and David made haste to get away for fear of Saul; for Saul and his men compassed David and his men round about to take them. 
But there came a messenger unto Saul, saying, Haste thee, and come; for the Philistines have invaded the land. 
Wh
830,atutes and commandments: 
And madest known unto them thy holy sabbath, and commandedst them precepts, statutes, and laws, by the hand of Moses thy servant: 
And gavest them bread from heaven for their hunger, and broughtest forth water for them out of the rock for their thirst, and promisedst them that they should go in to possess the land which thou hadst sworn to give them. 
But they and our fathers dealt proudly, and hardened their necks, and hearkened not to thy commandments, 
And refused to obey, neither were mindful of thy wonders that thou didst among them; but hardened their necks, and in their rebellion appointed a captain to return to their bondage: but thou art a God ready to pardon, gracious and merciful, slow to anger, and of great kindness, and forsookest them not. 
Yea, when they had made them a molten c
655,ll I know this? for I am an old man, and my wife well stricken in years. 
And the angel answering said unto him, I am Gabriel, that stand in the presence of God; and am sent to speak unto thee, and to shew thee these glad tidings. 
And, behold, thou shalt be dumb, and not able to speak, until the day that these things shall be performed, because thou believest not my words, which shall be fulfilled in their season. 
And the people waited for Zacharias, and marvelled that he tarried so long in the temple. 
And when he came out, he could not speak unto them: and they perceived that he had seen a vision in the temple: for he beckoned unto them, and r
797,ers: the children of Asaph, an hundred twenty and eight. 
The children of the porters: the children of Shallum, the children of Ater, the children of Talmon, the children of Akkub, the children of Hatita, the children of Shobai, in all an hundred thirty and nine. 
The Nethinims: the children of Ziha, the children of Hasupha, the children of Tabbaoth, 
The children of Keros, the children of Siaha, the children of Padon, 
The children of Lebanah, the children of Hagabah, the children of Akkub, 
The children of Hagab, the children of Shalmai, the children of Hanan, 
The children of Giddel, the children of Gahar, the children of Reaiah, 
The children of Rezin, the children of Nekoda, the children of Gazzam, 
The children of Uzza, the children of Paseah, the children of Besai, 
The children 
588,y son, and thy daughter, and thy manservant, and thy maidservant, and the Levite that is within thy gates: and thou shalt rejoice before the LORD thy God in all that thou puttest thine hands unto. 
Take heed to thyself that thou forsake not the Levite as long as thou livest upon the earth. 
When the LORD thy God shall enlarge thy border, as he hath promised thee, and thou shalt say, I will eat flesh, because thy soul longeth to eat flesh; thou mayest eat flesh, whatsoever thy soul lusteth after. 
If the place which the LORD thy God hath chosen to put his name there be too far from 
705,to bring forth in one day? or shall a nation be born at once? for as soon as Zion travailed, she brought forth her children. 
Shall I bring to the birth, and not cause to bring forth? saith the LORD: shall I cause to bring forth, and shut the womb? saith thy God. 
Rejoice ye with Jerusalem, and be glad with her, all ye that love her: rejoice for joy with her, all ye that mourn for her: 
That ye may suck, and be satisfied with the breasts of her consolations; that ye may milk out, and be delighted with the abundance of her glory. 
For thus saith the LORD, Behold, I will extend peace to her like a river, and the glory of the Gentiles like a flowing stream: then shall ye suck, ye shall be borne upon
736,all the heart, O daughter of Jerusalem. 
The LORD hath taken away thy judgments, he hath cast out thine enemy: the king of Israel, even the LORD, is in the midst of thee: thou shalt not see evil any more. 
In that day it shall be said to Jerusalem, Fear thou not: and to Zion, Let not thine hands be slack. 
The LORD thy God in the midst of thee is mighty; he will save, he will rejoice over thee with joy; he will rest in his love, he will joy over thee with singing. 
I will gather them that are sorrowful for the solemn assembly, who are of thee, to whom the reproach of it was a burden. 
Behold, at that time I will undo all that afflict thee: and I will save her that halteth, and gather her that was driven out; and I will get the
813,t eat at thy table: for so they came to me when I fled because of Absalom thy brother. 
And, behold, thou hast with thee Shimei the son of Gera, a Benjamite of Bahurim, which cursed me with a grievous curse in the day when I went to Mahanaim: but he came down to meet me at Jordan, and I sware to him by the LORD, saying, I will not put thee to death with the sword. 
Now therefore hold him not guiltless: for thou art a wise man, and knowest what thou oughtest to do unto him; but his hoar head bring thou down to the grave with blood. 
So David slept with his fathers, and was buried in the city of David. 
And the days that David reigned over Israel were forty years: seven years reigned he in Hebron, and thirty and three years reigned he in Jerusalem. 
Then sat Solomon upon the throne of David his father; a
607,eople that fled to the wilderness turned back upon the pursuers. 
And when Joshua and all Israel saw that the ambush had taken the city, and that the smoke of the city ascended, then they turned again, and slew the men of Ai. 
And the other issued out of the city against them; so they were in the midst of Israel, some on this side, and some on that side: and they smote them, so that they let none of them remain or escape. 
And the king of Ai they took alive, and brought him to Joshua. 
And it came to pass, when Israel had made an end of slaying all the inhabitants of Ai in the field, in the wildernes
571, was a goodly child, she hid him three months. 
And when she could not longer hide him, she took for him an ark of bulrushes, and daubed it with slime and with pitch, and put the child therein; and she laid it in the flags by the river's brink. 
And his sister stood afar off, to wit what would be done to him. 
And the daughter of Pharaoh came down to wash herself at the river; and her maidens walked along by the river's side; and when she saw the ark among the flags, she sent her maid to fetch it. 
And when she had opened it, she saw the child: and, behold, the bab
595, the tender herb, and as the showers upon the grass: 
Because I will publish the name of the LORD: ascribe ye greatness unto our God. 
He is the Rock, his work is perfect: for all his ways are judgment: a God of truth and without iniquity, just and right is he. 
They have corrupted themselves, their spot is not the spot of his children: they are a perverse and crooked generation. 
Do ye thus requite the LORD, O foolish people and unwise? is not he thy father that hath bought thee? hath he not made thee, and established thee? 
Remember the days of old, consider the years of many generation
570,aid this, he fell asleep. 
And Saul was consenting unto his death. And at that time there was a great persecution against the church which was at Jerusalem; and they were all scattered abroad throughout the regions of Judaea and Samaria, except the apostles. 
And devout men carried Stephen to his burial, and made great lamentation over him. 
As for Saul, he made havock of the church, entering into every house, and haling men and women committed them to prison. 
Therefore they that were scattered abroad went every where preaching the word. 
Then Philip went down to
618,f the LORD, that they offered seven bullocks and seven rams. 
And David was clothed with a robe of fine linen, and all the Levites that bare the ark, and the singers, and Chenaniah the master of the song with the singers: David also had upon him an ephod of linen. 
Thus all Israel brought up the ark of the covenant of the LORD with shouting, and with sound of the cornet, and with trumpets, and with cymbals, making a noise with psalteries and harps. 
And it came to pass, as the ark of the covenant of the LORD came to the city of David, that Michal, the daughter of Saul looking out at a window saw king David danc
616,reat waters were stayed: and I caused Lebanon to mourn for him, and all the trees of the field fainted for him. 
I made the nations to shake at the sound of his fall, when I cast him down to hell with them that descend into the pit: and all the trees of Eden, the choice and best of Lebanon, all that drink water, shall be comforted in the nether parts of the earth. 
They also went down into hell with him unto them that be slain with the sword; and they that were his arm, that dwelt under his shadow in the midst of the heathen. 
To whom art thou thus like in glory and in greatness among the trees of Eden? yet s
654,he Archite was the king's companion: 
And after Ahithophel was Jehoiada the son of Benaiah, and Abiathar: and the general of the king's army was Joab. 
And David assembled all the princes of Israel, the princes of the tribes, and the captains of the companies that ministered to the king by course, and the captains over the thousands, and captains over the hundreds, and the stewards over all the substance and possession of the king, and of his sons, with the officers, and with the mighty men, and with all the valiant men, unto Jerusalem. 
Then David the king stood up upon his feet, and said, Hear me, my brethren, and my people: As for me, I had in
607,urage, fear not, nor be afraid of them: for the LORD thy God, he it is that doth go with thee; he will not fail thee, nor forsake thee. 
And Moses called unto Joshua, and said unto him in the sight of all Israel, Be strong and of a good courage: for thou must go with this people unto the land which the LORD hath sworn unto their fathers to give them; and thou shalt cause them to inherit it. 
And the LORD, he it is that doth go before thee; he will be with thee, he will not fail thee, neither forsake thee: fear not, neither be dismayed. 
And Moses wrote this law, and delivered it unto the priests the 
770,f Zion. 
For thus saith the LORD, Ye have sold yourselves for nought; and ye shall be redeemed without money. 
For thus saith the Lord GOD, My people went down aforetime into Egypt to sojourn there; and the Assyrian oppressed them without cause. 
Now therefore, what have I here, saith the LORD, that my people is taken away for nought? they that rule over them make them to howl, saith the LORD; and my name continually every day is blasphemed. 
Therefore my people shall know my name: therefore they shall know in that day that I am he that doth speak: behold, it is I. 
How beautiful upon the mountains are the feet of him that bringeth good tidings, that publisheth peace; that bringeth good tidings of good, that publisheth salvation; that saith unto Zion, Thy God 
764,ffering before the LORD. 
And thou shalt receive them of their hands, and burn them upon the altar for a burnt offering, for a sweet savour before the LORD: it is an offering made by fire unto the LORD. 
And thou shalt take the breast of the ram of Aaron's consecration, and wave it for a wave offering before the LORD: and it shall be thy part. 
And thou shalt sanctify the breast of the wave offering, and the shoulder of the heave offering, which is waved, and which is heaved up, of the ram of the consecration, even of that which is for Aaron, and of that which is for his sons: 
And it shall be Aaron's and his sons' by a statute for ever from the children of Israel: for it is an heave offering: and it shall be an heave offering from the children of Israel
705,ro, Moses' father in law, took Zipporah, Moses' wife, after he had sent her back, 
And her two sons; of which the name of the one was Gershom; for he said, I have been an alien in a strange land: 
And the name of the other was Eliezer; for the God of my father, said he, was mine help, and delivered me from the sword of Pharaoh: 
And Jethro, Moses' father in law, came with his sons and his wife unto Moses into the wilderness, where he encamped at the mount of God: 
And he said unto Moses, I thy father in law Jethro am come unto thee, and thy wife, and her two sons with her. 
And Moses went out to meet his father in law, and did obeisance, and kissed him; and they asked each other of their welfare;
688,y shall swell, and her thigh shall rot: and the woman shall be a curse among her people. 
And if the woman be not defiled, but be clean; then she shall be free, and shall conceive seed. 
This is the law of jealousies, when a wife goeth aside to another instead of her husband, and is defiled; 
Or when the spirit of jealousy cometh upon him, and he be jealous over his wife, and shall set the woman before the LORD, and the priest shall execute upon her all this law. 
Then shall the man be guiltless from iniquity, and this woman shall bear her iniquity. 
And the LORD spake unto Moses, saying, 
Speak unto the children of Israel, and say unto them, When either man or woman shall separa
608,se, twenty cubits, and the height was an hundred and twenty: and he overlaid it within with pure gold. 
And the greater house he cieled with fir tree, which he overlaid with fine gold, and set thereon palm trees and chains. 
And he garnished the house with precious stones for beauty: and the gold was gold of Parvaim. 
He overlaid also the house, the beams, the posts, and the walls thereof, and the doors thereof, with gold; and graved cherubims on the walls. 
And he made the most holy house, the length whereof was according to the breadth of the house, twenty cubits, and the breadth thereof twenty cubi
674,one Simon a Cyrenian, who passed by, coming out of the country, the father of Alexander and Rufus, to bear his cross. 
And they bring him unto the place Golgotha, which is, being interpreted, The place of a skull. 
And they gave him to drink wine mingled with myrrh: but he received it not. 
And when they had crucified him, they parted his garments, casting lots upon them, what every man should take. 
And it was the third hour, and they crucified him. 
And the superscription of his accusation was written over, THE KING OF THE JEWS. 
And with him they crucify two thieves; the one on his right hand, and the other on his left. 
And the scripture was fulfilled, which sai
656,l cried unto the LORD: for he had nine hundred chariots of iron; and twenty years he mightily oppressed the children of Israel. 
And Deborah, a prophetess, the wife of Lapidoth, she judged Israel at that time. 
And she dwelt under the palm tree of Deborah between Ramah and Bethel in mount Ephraim: and the children of Israel came up to her for judgment. 
And she sent and called Barak the son of Abinoam out of Kedeshnaphtali, and said unto him, Hath not the LORD God of Israel commanded, saying, Go and draw toward mount Tabor, and take with thee ten thousand men of the children of Naphtali and of the children of Zebulun? 
And I will draw unto thee to 
622, of the land, as at the first, saith the LORD. 
Thus saith the LORD of hosts; Again in this place, which is desolate without man and without beast, and in all the cities thereof, shall be an habitation of shepherds causing their flocks to lie down. 
In the cities of the mountains, in the cities of the vale, and in the cities of the south, and in the land of Benjamin, and in the places about Jerusalem, and in the cities of Judah, shall the flocks pass again under the hands of him that telleth them, saith the LORD. 
Behold, the days come, saith the LORD, that I will perform that good thing which I have promised unto 
685, Israel, and for the stranger that sojourneth among them. 
But the soul that doeth ought presumptuously, whether he be born in the land, or a stranger, the same reproacheth the LORD; and that soul shall be cut off from among his people. 
Because he hath despised the word of the LORD, and hath broken his commandment, that soul shall utterly be cut off; his iniquity shall be upon him. 
And while the children of Israel were in the wilderness, they found a man that gathered sticks upon the sabbath day. 
And they that found him gathering sticks brought him unto Moses and Aaron, and unto all the congregation. 
And they put him in ward, because it was not declared what should be done
742, the great King. 
Neither shalt thou swear by thy head, because thou canst not make one hair white or black. 
But let your communication be, Yea, yea; Nay, nay: for whatsoever is more than these cometh of evil. 
Ye have heard that it hath been said, An eye for an eye, and a tooth for a tooth: 
But I say unto you, That ye resist not evil: but whosoever shall smite thee on thy right cheek, turn to him the other also. 
And if any man will sue thee at the law, and take away thy coat, let him have thy cloak also. 
And whosoever shall compel thee to go a mile, go with him twain. 
Give to him that asketh thee, and from him that would borrow of thee turn not thou away. 
Ye have heard that it hath been said, Thou shalt love thy neighbour, an
773, hope: but we will walk after our own devices, and we will every one do the imagination of his evil heart. 
Therefore thus saith the LORD; Ask ye now among the heathen, who hath heard such things: the virgin of Israel hath done a very horrible thing. 
Will a man leave the snow of Lebanon which cometh from the rock of the field? or shall the cold flowing waters that come from another place be forsaken? 
Because my people hath forgotten me, they have burned incense to vanity, and they have caused them to stumble in their ways from the ancient paths, to walk in paths, in a way not cast up; 
To make their land desolate, and a perpetual hissing; every one that passeth thereby shall be astonished, and wag his head. 
I will scatter them as with an east wind before the e
575, even to the greater settle shall be four cubits, and the breadth one cubit. 
So the altar shall be four cubits; and from the altar and upward shall be four horns. 
And the altar shall be twelve cubits long, twelve broad, square in the four squares thereof. 
And the settle shall be fourteen cubits long and fourteen broad in the four squares thereof; and the border about it shall be half a cubit; and the bottom thereof shall be a cubit about; and his stairs shall look toward the east. 
And he said unto me, Son of man, thus saith the Lord GOD; These are the ordinances of
643,the children of Ammon; and when I called you, ye delivered me not out of their hands. 
And when I saw that ye delivered me not, I put my life in my hands, and passed over against the children of Ammon, and the LORD delivered them into my hand: wherefore then are ye come up unto me this day, to fight against me? 
Then Jephthah gathered together all the men of Gilead, and fought with Ephraim: and the men of Gilead smote Ephraim, because they said, Ye Gileadites are fugitives of Ephraim among the Ephraimites, and among the Manassites. 
And the Gileadites took the passages of Jordan before the Ephraimites: and it was so, that when those Ep
575,
Now therefore hold him not guiltless: for thou art a wise man, and knowest what thou oughtest to do unto him; but his hoar head bring thou down to the grave with blood. 
So David slept with his fathers, and was buried in the city of David. 
And the days that David reigned over Israel were forty years: seven years reigned he in Hebron, and thirty and three years reigned he in Jerusalem. 
Then sat Solomon upon the throne of David his father; and his kingdom was established greatly. 
And Adonijah the son of Haggith came to Bathsheba the mother of Solomon. And she said, C
786,cometh to the thousand three hundred and five and thirty days. 
But go thou thy way till the end be: for thou shalt rest, and stand in thy lot at the end of the days. 
The word of the LORD that came unto Hosea, the son of Beeri, in the days of Uzziah, Jotham, Ahaz, and Hezekiah, kings of Judah, and in the days of Jeroboam the son of Joash, king of Israel. 
The beginning of the word of the LORD by Hosea. And the LORD said to Hosea, Go, take unto thee a wife of whoredoms and children of whoredoms: for the land hath committed great whoredom, departing from the LORD. 
So he went and took Gomer the daughter of Diblaim; which conceived, and bare him a son. 
And the LORD said unto him, Call his name Jezreel; for yet a little while, and I will avenge the blood of Jezreel upon the hou
687,e box together, to beautify the place of my sanctuary; and I will make the place of my feet glorious. 
The sons also of them that afflicted thee shall come bending unto thee; and all they that despised thee shall bow themselves down at the soles of thy feet; and they shall call thee; The city of the LORD, The Zion of the Holy One of Israel. 
Whereas thou has been forsaken and hated, so that no man went through thee, I will make thee an eternal excellency, a joy of many generations. 
Thou shalt also suck the milk of the Gentiles, and shalt suck the breast of kings: and thou shalt know that I the LORD am thy Saviour and thy Redeemer, the mighty One of Jacob. 
For brass I will brin
782,red. 
He shall cut off the spirit of princes: he is terrible to the kings of the earth. 
I cried unto God with my voice, even unto God with my voice; and he gave ear unto me. 
In the day of my trouble I sought the Lord: my sore ran in the night, and ceased not: my soul refused to be comforted. 
I remembered God, and was troubled: I complained, and my spirit was overwhelmed. Selah. 
Thou holdest mine eyes waking: I am so troubled that I cannot speak. 
I have considered the days of old, the years of ancient times. 
I call to remembrance my song in the night: I commune with mine own heart: and my spirit made diligent search. 
Will the Lord cast off for ever? and will he be favourable no more? 
Is his mercy clean gone for ever? doth his promise fail for evermore? 
Hath God fo
581, went into the palace of the king's house, and burnt the king's house over him with fire, and died. 
For his sins which he sinned in doing evil in the sight of the LORD, in walking in the way of Jeroboam, and in his sin which he did, to make Israel to sin. 
Now the rest of the acts of Zimri, and his treason that he wrought, are they not written in the book of the chronicles of the kings of Israel? 
Then were the people of Israel divided into two parts: half of the people followed Tibni the son of Ginath, to make him king; and half followed Omri. 
But the people that followed
577,all that are in the waters: whatsoever hath fins and scales in the waters, in the seas, and in the rivers, them shall ye eat. 
And all that have not fins and scales in the seas, and in the rivers, of all that move in the waters, and of any living thing which is in the waters, they shall be an abomination unto you: 
They shall be even an abomination unto you; ye shall not eat of their flesh, but ye shall have their carcases in abomination. 
Whatsoever hath no fins nor scales in the waters, that shall be an abomination unto you. 
And these are they which ye shall have in a
784,n ox: and they brought them before the tabernacle. 
And the LORD spake unto Moses, saying, 
Take it of them, that they may be to do the service of the tabernacle of the congregation; and thou shalt give them unto the Levites, to every man according to his service. 
And Moses took the wagons and the oxen, and gave them unto the Levites. 
Two wagons and four oxen he gave unto the sons of Gershon, according to their service: 
And four wagons and eight oxen he gave unto the sons of Merari, according unto their service, under the hand of Ithamar the son of Aaron the priest. 
But unto the sons of Kohath he gave none: because the service of the sanctuary belonging unto them was that they should bear upon their shoulders. 
And the princes offered for dedicating of the altar in the 
667,e that goeth in to his neighbour's wife; whosoever toucheth her shall not be innocent. 
Men do not despise a thief, if he steal to satisfy his soul when he is hungry; 
But if he be found, he shall restore sevenfold; he shall give all the substance of his house. 
But whoso committeth adultery with a woman lacketh understanding: he that doeth it destroyeth his own soul. 
A wound and dishonour shall he get; and his reproach shall not be wiped away. 
For jealousy is the rage of a man: therefore he will not spare in the day of vengeance. 
He will not regard any ransom; neither will he rest content, though thou givest many gifts. 
My son, keep my words, and lay up 
814, silver: that will I give to the man of God, to tell us our way. 
(Beforetime in Israel, when a man went to enquire of God, thus he spake, Come, and let us go to the seer: for he that is now called a Prophet was beforetime called a Seer.) 
Then said Saul to his servant, Well said; come, let us go. So they went unto the city where the man of God was. 
And as they went up the hill to the city, they found young maidens going out to draw water, and said unto them, Is the seer here? 
And they answered them, and said, He is; behold, he is before you: make haste now, for he came to day to the city; for there is a sacrifice of the people to day in the high place: 
As soon as ye be come into the city, ye shall straightway find him, before he go up to the high place to eat: for the people will not eat until he co
668,charge of mine holy things: but ye have set keepers of my charge in my sanctuary for yourselves. 
Thus saith the Lord GOD; No stranger, uncircumcised in heart, nor uncircumcised in flesh, shall enter into my sanctuary, of any stranger that is among the children of Israel. 
And the Levites that are gone away far from me, when Israel went astray, which went astray away from me after their idols; they shall even bear their iniquity. 
Yet they shall be ministers in my sanctuary, having charge at the gates of the house, and ministering to the house: they shall slay the burnt offering and the sacrifice for the people, and they shall stand before them to minister unt
748,sness, and of judgment: 
Of sin, because they believe not on me; 
Of righteousness, because I go to my Father, and ye see me no more; 
Of judgment, because the prince of this world is judged. 
I have yet many things to say unto you, but ye cannot bear them now. 
Howbeit when he, the Spirit of truth, is come, he will guide you into all truth: for he shall not speak of himself; but whatsoever he shall hear, that shall he speak: and he will shew you things to come. 
He shall glorify me: for he shall receive of mine, and shall shew it unto you. 
All things that the Father hath are mine: therefore said I, that he shall take of mine, and shall shew it unto you. 
A little while, and ye shall not see me: and again, a little while, and ye shall se
791,mples: and they are written for our admonition, upon whom the ends of the world are come. 
Wherefore let him that thinketh he standeth take heed lest he fall. 
There hath no temptation taken you but such as is common to man: but God is faithful, who will not suffer you to be tempted above that ye are able; but will with the temptation also make a way to escape, that ye may be able to bear it. 
Wherefore, my dearly beloved, flee from idolatry. 
I speak as to wise men; judge ye what I say. 
The cup of blessing which we bless, is it not the communion of the blood of Christ? The bread which we break, is it not the communion of the body of Christ? 
For we being many are one bread, and one body: for we are all partakers of that one bread. 
Behold Israel after the flesh: are not they whi
796,How can these things be? 
Jesus answered and said unto him, Art thou a master of Israel, and knowest not these things? 
Verily, verily, I say unto thee, We speak that we do know, and testify that we have seen; and ye receive not our witness. 
If I have told you earthly things, and ye believe not, how shall ye believe, if I tell you of heavenly things? 
And no man hath ascended up to heaven, but he that came down from heaven, even the Son of man which is in heaven. 
And as Moses lifted up the serpent in the wilderness, even so must the Son of man be lifted up: 
That whosoever believeth in him should not perish, but have eternal life. 
For God so loved the world, that he gave his only begotten Son, that whosoever believeth in him should not perish, but have everlasting life. 
For God sen
685,d us to the glory of God. 
Now I say that Jesus Christ was a minister of the circumcision for the truth of God, to confirm the promises made unto the fathers: 
And that the Gentiles might glorify God for his mercy; as it is written, For this cause I will confess to thee among the Gentiles, and sing unto thy name. 
And again he saith, Rejoice, ye Gentiles, with his people. 
And again, Praise the Lord, all ye Gentiles; and laud him, all ye people. 
And again, Esaias saith, There shall be a root of Jesse, and he that shall rise to reign over the Gentiles; in him shall the Gentiles trust. 
Now the God of hope fill you with all joy and peace in believing, that ye may abound in hope
713,he rod from before the LORD, as he commanded him. 
And Moses and Aaron gathered the congregation together before the rock, and he said unto them, Hear now, ye rebels; must we fetch you water out of this rock? 
And Moses lifted up his hand, and with his rod he smote the rock twice: and the water came out abundantly, and the congregation drank, and their beasts also. 
And the LORD spake unto Moses and Aaron, Because ye believed me not, to sanctify me in the eyes of the children of Israel, therefore ye shall not bring this congregation into the land which I have given them. 
This is the water of Meribah; because the children of Israel strove with the LORD, and he was sanctified in them. 
And Moses sent mess
724, the LORD is with me as a mighty terrible one: therefore my persecutors shall stumble, and they shall not prevail: they shall be greatly ashamed; for they shall not prosper: their everlasting confusion shall never be forgotten. 
But, O LORD of hosts, that triest the righteous, and seest the reins and the heart, let me see thy vengeance on them: for unto thee have I opened my cause. 
Sing unto the LORD, praise ye the LORD: for he hath delivered the soul of the poor from the hand of evildoers. 
Cursed be the day wherein I was born: let not the day wherein my mother bare me be blessed. 
Cursed be the man who brought tidings to my father, saying, A man child is born unto thee; making him very glad. 
And let that man be
788, neither lie one to another. 
And ye shall not swear by my name falsely, neither shalt thou profane the name of thy God: I am the LORD. 
Thou shalt not defraud thy neighbour, neither rob him: the wages of him that is hired shall not abide with thee all night until the morning. 
Thou shalt not curse the deaf, nor put a stumblingblock before the blind, but shalt fear thy God: I am the LORD. 
Ye shall do no unrighteousness in judgment: thou shalt not respect the person of the poor, nor honor the person of the mighty: but in righteousness shalt thou judge thy neighbour. 
Thou shalt not go up and down as a talebearer among thy people: neither shalt thou stand against the blood of thy neighbour; I am the LORD. 
Thou shalt not hate thy brother in thine heart: thou shalt in any wise re
756,he hath settled on his lees, and hath not been emptied from vessel to vessel, neither hath he gone into captivity: therefore his taste remained in him, and his scent is not changed. 
Therefore, behold, the days come, saith the LORD, that I will send unto him wanderers, that shall cause him to wander, and shall empty his vessels, and break their bottles. 
And Moab shall be ashamed of Chemosh, as the house of Israel was ashamed of Bethel their confidence. 
How say ye, We are mighty and strong men for the war? 
Moab is spoiled, and gone up out of her cities, and his chosen young men are gone down to the slaughter, saith the King, whose name is the LORD of hosts. 
The calamity of Moab is near to come, and his affliction hasteth fast. 
All ye that are
666,d Samuel said, As the sword hath made women childless, so shall thy mother be childless among women. And Samuel hewed Agag in pieces before the LORD in Gilgal. 
Then Samuel went to Ramah; and Saul went up to his house to Gibeah of Saul. 
And Samuel came no more to see Saul until the day of his death: nevertheless Samuel mourned for Saul: and the LORD repented that he had made Saul king over Israel. 
And the LORD said unto Samuel, How long wilt thou mourn for Saul, seeing I have rejected him from reigning over Israel? fill thine horn with oil, and go, I will send thee to Jesse the Bethlehemite: for I have provided me a king among his sons. 
And Samuel said, H
650,om away from the house of David, and gave it thee: and yet thou hast not been as my servant David, who kept my commandments, and who followed me with all his heart, to do that only which was right in mine eyes; 
But hast done evil above all that were before thee: for thou hast gone and made thee other gods, and molten images, to provoke me to anger, and hast cast me behind thy back: 
Therefore, behold, I will bring evil upon the house of Jeroboam, and will cut off from Jeroboam him that pisseth against the wall, and him that is shut up and left in Israel, and will take away the remnant of the house of Jeroboam, as a man taketh away dung, till
749,ghty one in the earth. 
He was a mighty hunter before the LORD: wherefore it is said, Even as Nimrod the mighty hunter before the LORD. 
And the beginning of his kingdom was Babel, and Erech, and Accad, and Calneh, in the land of Shinar. 
Out of that land went forth Asshur, and builded Nineveh, and the city Rehoboth, and Calah, 
And Resen between Nineveh and Calah: the same is a great city. 
And Mizraim begat Ludim, and Anamim, and Lehabim, and Naphtuhim, 
And Pathrusim, and Casluhim, (out of whom came Philistim,) and Caphtorim. 
And Canaan begat Sidon his first born, and Heth, 
And the Jebusite, and the Amorite, and the Girgasite, 
And the Hivite, and the Arkite, and the Sinite, 
And the Arvadite, and the Zemarite, and the Hamathite: and 
802,, according to the good hand of my God upon me. 
Then I came to the governors beyond the river, and gave them the king's letters. Now the king had sent captains of the army and horsemen with me. 
When Sanballat the Horonite, and Tobiah the servant, the Ammonite, heard of it, it grieved them exceedingly that there was come a man to seek the welfare of the children of Israel. 
So I came to Jerusalem, and was there three days. 
And I arose in the night, I and some few men with me; neither told I any man what my God had put in my heart to do at Jerusalem: neither was there any beast with me, save the beast that I rode upon. 
And I went out by night by the gate of the valley, even before the dragon well, and to the dung port, and viewed the walls of Jerusalem, which were broken down, and the gate
575, abode with him three days: so they did eat and drink, and lodged there. 
And it came to pass on the fourth day, when they arose early in the morning, that he rose up to depart: and the damsel's father said unto his son in law, Comfort thine heart with a morsel of bread, and afterward go your way. 
And they sat down, and did eat and drink both of them together: for the damsel's father had said unto the man, Be content, I pray thee, and tarry all night, and let thine heart be merry. 
And when the man rose up to depart, his father in law urged him: therefore he lodged th
592,the border thereof by the edge thereof round about shall be a span: and this shall be the higher place of the altar. 
And from the bottom upon the ground even to the lower settle shall be two cubits, and the breadth one cubit; and from the lesser settle even to the greater settle shall be four cubits, and the breadth one cubit. 
So the altar shall be four cubits; and from the altar and upward shall be four horns. 
And the altar shall be twelve cubits long, twelve broad, square in the four squares thereof. 
And the settle shall be fourteen cubits long and fourteen broad in the four squa
796, whatsoever God hath said unto thee, do. 
Then Jacob rose up, and set his sons and his wives upon camels; 
And he carried away all his cattle, and all his goods which he had gotten, the cattle of his getting, which he had gotten in Padanaram, for to go to Isaac his father in the land of Canaan. 
And Laban went to shear his sheep: and Rachel had stolen the images that were her father's. 
And Jacob stole away unawares to Laban the Syrian, in that he told him not that he fled. 
So he fled with all that he had; and he rose up, and passed over the river, and set his face toward the mount Gilead. 
And it was told Laban on the third day that Jacob was fled. 
And he took his brethren with him, and pursued after him seven days' journey; and they overtook him in the mount Gilead. 
And God came t
584, with Israel, to wit, with all the children of Ephraim. 
But if thou wilt go, do it; be strong for the battle: God shall make thee fall before the enemy: for God hath power to help, and to cast down. 
And Amaziah said to the man of God, But what shall we do for the hundred talents which I have given to the army of Israel? And the man of God answered, The LORD is able to give thee much more than this. 
Then Amaziah separated them, to wit, the army that was come to him out of Ephraim, to go home again: wherefore their anger was greatly kindled against Judah, and they returned hom
776,ame unto me, saying, 
Before I formed thee in the belly I knew thee; and before thou camest forth out of the womb I sanctified thee, and I ordained thee a prophet unto the nations. 
Then said I, Ah, Lord GOD! behold, I cannot speak: for I am a child. 
But the LORD said unto me, Say not, I am a child: for thou shalt go to all that I shall send thee, and whatsoever I command thee thou shalt speak. 
Be not afraid of their faces: for I am with thee to deliver thee, saith the LORD. 
Then the LORD put forth his hand, and touched my mouth. And the LORD said unto me, Behold, I have put my words in thy mouth. 
See, I have this day set thee over the nations and over the kingdoms, to root out, and to pull down, and to destroy, and to throw down, to build, and to plant. 
Moreov
635,y mouth. 
My soul shall make her boast in the LORD: the humble shall hear thereof, and be glad. 
O magnify the LORD with me, and let us exalt his name together. 
I sought the LORD, and he heard me, and delivered me from all my fears. 
They looked unto him, and were lightened: and their faces were not ashamed. 
This poor man cried, and the LORD heard him, and saved him out of all his troubles. 
The angel of the LORD encampeth round about them that fear him, and delivereth them. 
O taste and see that the LORD is good: blessed is the man that trusteth in him. 
O fear the LORD, ye his saints: for there is no want to them that fear 
821,lth and riches shall be in his house: and his righteousness endureth for ever. 
Unto the upright there ariseth light in the darkness: he is gracious, and full of compassion, and righteous. 
A good man sheweth favour, and lendeth: he will guide his affairs with discretion. 
Surely he shall not be moved for ever: the righteous shall be in everlasting remembrance. 
He shall not be afraid of evil tidings: his heart is fixed, trusting in the LORD. 
His heart is established, he shall not be afraid, until he see his desire upon his enemies. 
He hath dispersed, he hath given to the poor; his righteousness endureth for ever; his horn shall be exalted with honour. 
The wicked shall see it, and be grieved; he shall gnash with his teeth, and melt away: the desire of the wicked shall perish. 
Praise ye the LORD. Praise, O 
825,against the Philistines, before that Pharaoh smote Gaza. 
Thus saith the LORD; Behold, waters rise up out of the north, and shall be an overflowing flood, and shall overflow the land, and all that is therein; the city, and them that dwell therein: then the men shall cry, and all the inhabitants of the land shall howl. 
At the noise of the stamping of the hoofs of his strong horses, at the rushing of his chariots, and at the rumbling of his wheels, the fathers shall not look back to their children for feebleness of hands; 
Because of the day that cometh to spoil all the Philistines, and to cut off from Tyrus and Zidon every helper that remaineth: for the LORD will spoil the Philistines, the remnant of the country of Caphtor. 
Baldness is come upon Gaza; Ashkelon is cut off with the remnant of their valley: how long
811, preached to them the next sabbath. 
Now when the congregation was broken up, many of the Jews and religious proselytes followed Paul and Barnabas: who, speaking to them, persuaded them to continue in the grace of God. 
And the next sabbath day came almost the whole city together to hear the word of God. 
But when the Jews saw the multitudes, they were filled with envy, and spake against those things which were spoken by Paul, contradicting and blaspheming. 
Then Paul and Barnabas waxed bold, and said, It was necessary that the word of God should first have been spoken to you: but seeing ye put it from you, and judge yourselves unworthy of everlasting life, lo, we turn to the Gentiles. 
For so hath the Lord commanded us, saying, I have set thee to be a light of the Gentiles, that thou shouldest be fo
827,air, and a leathern girdle about his loins; and his meat was locusts and wild honey. 
Then went out to him Jerusalem, and all Judaea, and all the region round about Jordan, 
And were baptized of him in Jordan, confessing their sins. 
But when he saw many of the Pharisees and Sadducees come to his baptism, he said unto them, O generation of vipers, who hath warned you to flee from the wrath to come? 
Bring forth therefore fruits meet for repentance: 
And think not to say within yourselves, We have Abraham to our father: for I say unto you, that God is able of these stones to raise up children unto Abraham. 
And now also the axe is laid unto the root of the trees: therefore every tree which bringeth not forth good fruit is hewn down, and cast into the fire. 
I indeed baptize you with water unto repentance. but he that
660,am for righteousness. 
How was it then reckoned? when he was in circumcision, or in uncircumcision? Not in circumcision, but in uncircumcision. 
And he received the sign of circumcision, a seal of the righteousness of the faith which he had yet being uncircumcised: that he might be the father of all them that believe, though they be not circumcised; that righteousness might be imputed unto them also: 
And the father of circumcision to them who are not of the circumcision only, but who also walk in the steps of that faith of our father Abraham, which he had being yet uncircumcised. 
For the promise, that he should be the heir of the world, was not to Ab
674, taken counsel against you, and hath conceived a purpose against you. 
Arise, get you up unto the wealthy nation, that dwelleth without care, saith the LORD, which have neither gates nor bars, which dwell alone. 
And their camels shall be a booty, and the multitude of their cattle a spoil: and I will scatter into all winds them that are in the utmost corners; and I will bring their calamity from all sides thereof, saith the LORD. 
And Hazor shall be a dwelling for dragons, and a desolation for ever: there shall no man abide there, nor any son of man dwell in it. 
The word of the LORD that came to Jeremiah the prophet against Elam in the beginning of the reign of Zed
721,y unto you, He that believeth on me hath everlasting life. 
I am that bread of life. 
Your fathers did eat manna in the wilderness, and are dead. 
This is the bread which cometh down from heaven, that a man may eat thereof, and not die. 
I am the living bread which came down from heaven: if any man eat of this bread, he shall live for ever: and the bread that I will give is my flesh, which I will give for the life of the world. 
The Jews therefore strove among themselves, saying, How can this man give us his flesh to eat? 
Then Jesus said unto them, Verily, verily, I say unto you, Except ye eat the flesh of the Son of man, and drink his blood, ye have no life in you. 
Whoso eateth my flesh, and drinketh my blood
578,d naked shall I return thither: the LORD gave, and the LORD hath taken away; blessed be the name of the LORD. 
In all this Job sinned not, nor charged God foolishly. 
Again there was a day when the sons of God came to present themselves before the LORD, and Satan came also among them to present himself before the LORD. 
And the LORD said unto Satan, From whence comest thou? And Satan answered the LORD, and said, From going to and fro in the earth, and from walking up and down in it. 
And the LORD said unto Satan, Hast thou considered my servant Job, that there is none lik
714, fowls were prepared for me, and once in ten days store of all sorts of wine: yet for all this required not I the bread of the governor, because the bondage was heavy upon this people. 
Think upon me, my God, for good, according to all that I have done for this people. 
Now it came to pass when Sanballat, and Tobiah, and Geshem the Arabian, and the rest of our enemies, heard that I had builded the wall, and that there was no breach left therein; (though at that time I had not set up the doors upon the gates;) 
That Sanballat and Geshem sent unto me, saying, Come, let us meet together in some one of the villages in the plain of Ono. But they thought to do me mischief. 
And I sent messengers unto them, sayi
604,y; and they that spoil thee shall be a spoil, and all that prey upon thee will I give for a prey. 
For I will restore health unto thee, and I will heal thee of thy wounds, saith the LORD; because they called thee an Outcast, saying, This is Zion, whom no man seeketh after. 
Thus saith the LORD; Behold, I will bring again the captivity of Jacob's tents, and have mercy on his dwellingplaces; and the city shall be builded upon her own heap, and the palace shall remain after the manner thereof. 
And out of them shall proceed thanksgiving and the voice of them that make merry: and I will multiply them,
730,r may he redeem it. 
And if it be not redeemed within the space of a full year, then the house that is in the walled city shall be established for ever to him that bought it throughout his generations: it shall not go out in the jubile. 
But the houses of the villages which have no wall round about them shall be counted as the fields of the country: they may be redeemed, and they shall go out in the jubile. 
Notwithstanding the cities of the Levites, and the houses of the cities of their possession, may the Levites redeem at any time. 
And if a man purchase of the Levites, then the house that was sold, and the city of his possession, shall go out in the year of jubile: for the houses of the cities of the Levites are thei
840,ot hearken unto the voice of the LORD thy God, to observe to do all his commandments and his statutes which I command thee this day; that all these curses shall come upon thee, and overtake thee: 
Cursed shalt thou be in the city, and cursed shalt thou be in the field. 
Cursed shall be thy basket and thy store. 
Cursed shall be the fruit of thy body, and the fruit of thy land, the increase of thy kine, and the flocks of thy sheep. 
Cursed shalt thou be when thou comest in, and cursed shalt thou be when thou goest out. 
The LORD shall send upon thee cursing, vexation, and rebuke, in all that thou settest thine hand unto for to do, until thou be destroyed, and until thou perish quickly; because of the wickedness of thy doings, whereby thou hast forsaken me. 
The LORD shall make the pestilence cleave unto thee, until he have consum
618,ood, and sprinkled it on the people, and said, Behold the blood of the covenant, which the LORD hath made with you concerning all these words. 
Then went up Moses, and Aaron, Nadab, and Abihu, and seventy of the elders of Israel: 
And they saw the God of Israel: and there was under his feet as it were a paved work of a sapphire stone, and as it were the body of heaven in his clearness. 
And upon the nobles of the children of Israel he laid not his hand: also they saw God, and did eat and drink. 
And the LORD said unto Moses, Come up to me into the mount, and be there: and I will give thee tables of stone, and a
671,ss of God is greater: for this is the witness of God which he hath testified of his Son. 
He that believeth on the Son of God hath the witness in himself: he that believeth not God hath made him a liar; because he believeth not the record that God gave of his Son. 
And this is the record, that God hath given to us eternal life, and this life is in his Son. 
He that hath the Son hath life; and he that hath not the Son of God hath not life. 
These things have I written unto you that believe on the name of the Son of God; that ye may know that ye have eternal life, and that ye may believe on the name of the Son of God. 
And this is the confidence that we have in him
804,u mayest. And he answered and said, I believe that Jesus Christ is the Son of God. 
And he commanded the chariot to stand still: and they went down both into the water, both Philip and the eunuch; and he baptized him. 
And when they were come up out of the water, the Spirit of the Lord caught away Philip, that the eunuch saw him no more: and he went on his way rejoicing. 
But Philip was found at Azotus: and passing through he preached in all the cities, till he came to Caesarea. 
And Saul, yet breathing out threatenings and slaughter against the disciples of the Lord, went unto the high priest, 
And desired of him letters to Damascus to the synagogues, that if he found any of this way, whether they were men or women, he might bring them bound unto Jerusalem. 
And as he journeyed, he came near 
691,cle, and five bars for the boards of the side of the tabernacle, for the two sides westward. 
And the middle bar in the midst of the boards shall reach from end to end. 
And thou shalt overlay the boards with gold, and make their rings of gold for places for the bars: and thou shalt overlay the bars with gold. 
And thou shalt rear up the tabernacle according to the fashion thereof which was shewed thee in the mount. 
And thou shalt make a vail of blue, and purple, and scarlet, and fine twined linen of cunning work: with cherubims shall it be made: 
And thou shalt hang it upon four pillars of shittim wood overlaid with gold: their hooks shall be of gold, upon the four sockets of silv
789, from my Father; for which of those works do ye stone me? 
The Jews answered him, saying, For a good work we stone thee not; but for blasphemy; and because that thou, being a man, makest thyself God. 
Jesus answered them, Is it not written in your law, I said, Ye are gods? 
If he called them gods, unto whom the word of God came, and the scripture cannot be broken; 
Say ye of him, whom the Father hath sanctified, and sent into the world, Thou blasphemest; because I said, I am the Son of God? 
If I do not the works of my Father, believe me not. 
But if I do, though ye believe not me, believe the works: that ye may know, and believe, that the Father is in me, and I in him. 
Therefore they sought again to take him: but he escaped out of their hand, 
And went away again beyond Jordan
601,. 
Now as I beheld the living creatures, behold one wheel upon the earth by the living creatures, with his four faces. 
The appearance of the wheels and their work was like unto the colour of a beryl: and they four had one likeness: and their appearance and their work was as it were a wheel in the middle of a wheel. 
When they went, they went upon their four sides: and they turned not when they went. 
As for their rings, they were so high that they were dreadful; and their rings were full of eyes round about them four. 
And when the living creatures went, the wheels went by them: and when the l
666,er, and the sprinkling of blood, lest he that destroyed the firstborn should touch them. 
By faith they passed through the Red sea as by dry land: which the Egyptians assaying to do were drowned. 
By faith the walls of Jericho fell down, after they were compassed about seven days. 
By faith the harlot Rahab perished not with them that believed not, when she had received the spies with peace. 
And what shall I more say? for the time would fail me to tell of Gedeon, and of Barak, and of Samson, and of Jephthae; of David also, and Samuel, and of the prophets: 
Who through faith subdued kingdoms, wrought righteousness, obtained promises, stopped the mouths of li
799, the fatherless and the widow. 
Thou hast despised mine holy things, and hast profaned my sabbaths. 
In thee are men that carry tales to shed blood: and in thee they eat upon the mountains: in the midst of thee they commit lewdness. 
In thee have they discovered their fathers' nakedness: in thee have they humbled her that was set apart for pollution. 
And one hath committed abomination with his neighbour's wife; and another hath lewdly defiled his daughter in law; and another in thee hath humbled his sister, his father's daughter. 
In thee have they taken gifts to shed blood; thou hast taken usury and increase, and thou hast greedily gained of thy neighbours by extortion, and hast forgotten me, saith the Lord GOD. 
Behold, therefore I have smitten mine hand at thy dishonest gain which tho
611, have said, I will surely do it unto all this evil congregation, that are gathered together against me: in this wilderness they shall be consumed, and there they shall die. 
And the men, which Moses sent to search the land, who returned, and made all the congregation to murmur against him, by bringing up a slander upon the land, 
Even those men that did bring up the evil report upon the land, died by the plague before the LORD. 
But Joshua the son of Nun, and Caleb the son of Jephunneh, which were of the men that went to search the land, lived still. 
And Moses told these sayings unto all the children of
658,ealeth secrets maketh known to thee what shall come to pass. 
But as for me, this secret is not revealed to me for any wisdom that I have more than any living, but for their sakes that shall make known the interpretation to the king, and that thou mightest know the thoughts of thy heart. 
Thou, O king, sawest, and behold a great image. This great image, whose brightness was excellent, stood before thee; and the form thereof was terrible. 
This image's head was of fine gold, his breast and his arms of silver, his belly and his thighs of brass, 
His legs of iron, his feet part of iron and part of clay. 
Thou sawest till that a stone was cut out without
802,tle in Gob with the Philistines, where Elhanan the son of Jaareoregim, a Bethlehemite, slew the brother of Goliath the Gittite, the staff of whose spear was like a weaver's beam. 
And there was yet a battle in Gath, where was a man of great stature, that had on every hand six fingers, and on every foot six toes, four and twenty in number; and he also was born to the giant. 
And when he defied Israel, Jonathan the son of Shimeah the brother of David slew him. 
These four were born to the giant in Gath, and fell by the hand of David, and by the hand of his servants. 
And David spake unto the LORD the words of this song in the day that the LORD had delivered him out of the hand of all his enemies, and out of the hand of Saul: 
And he said, The LORD is my rock, and my fortress, and my deliverer;
684,ifices, and your tithes, and heave offerings of your hand, and your vows, and your freewill offerings, and the firstlings of your herds and of your flocks: 
And there ye shall eat before the LORD your God, and ye shall rejoice in all that ye put your hand unto, ye and your households, wherein the LORD thy God hath blessed thee. 
Ye shall not do after all the things that we do here this day, every man whatsoever is right in his own eyes. 
For ye are not as yet come to the rest and to the inheritance, which the LORD your God giveth you. 
But when ye go over Jordan, and dwell in the land which the LORD your God giveth you to inherit, and when he giveth you rest from all your ene
656, a sword upon you, saith the Lord GOD. 
And I will bring you out of the midst thereof, and deliver you into the hands of strangers, and will execute judgments among you. 
Ye shall fall by the sword; I will judge you in the border of Israel; and ye shall know that I am the LORD. 
This city shall not be your caldron, neither shall ye be the flesh in the midst thereof; but I will judge you in the border of Israel: 
And ye shall know that I am the LORD: for ye have not walked in my statutes, neither executed my judgments, but have done after the manners of the heathen that are round about you. 
And it came to pass, when I prophesied, that Pelatiah the 
809,all a month devour them with their portions. 
Blow ye the cornet in Gibeah, and the trumpet in Ramah: cry aloud at Bethaven, after thee, O Benjamin. 
Ephraim shall be desolate in the day of rebuke: among the tribes of Israel have I made known that which shall surely be. 
The princes of Judah were like them that remove the bound: therefore I will pour out my wrath upon them like water. 
Ephraim is oppressed and broken in judgment, because he willingly walked after the commandment. 
Therefore will I be unto Ephraim as a moth, and to the house of Judah as rottenness. 
When Ephraim saw his sickness, and Judah saw his wound, then went Ephraim to the Assyrian, and sent to king Jareb: yet could he not heal you, nor cure you of your wound. 
For I will be unto Ephraim as a lion, and as a young lion to the h
646, with gladness; 
To the end that my glory may sing praise to thee, and not be silent. O LORD my God, I will give thanks unto thee for ever. 
In thee, O LORD, do I put my trust; let me never be ashamed: deliver me in thy righteousness. 
Bow down thine ear to me; deliver me speedily: be thou my strong rock, for an house of defence to save me. 
For thou art my rock and my fortress; therefore for thy name's sake lead me, and guide me. 
Pull me out of the net that they have laid privily for me: for thou art my strength. 
Into thine hand I commit my spirit: thou hast redeemed me, O LORD God of truth. 
I have hated them that regard lying vanitie
636,of the anointing. 
He is come to Aiath, he is passed to Migron; at Michmash he hath laid up his carriages: 
They are gone over the passage: they have taken up their lodging at Geba; Ramah is afraid; Gibeah of Saul is fled. 
Lift up thy voice, O daughter of Gallim: cause it to be heard unto Laish, O poor Anathoth. 
Madmenah is removed; the inhabitants of Gebim gather themselves to flee. 
As yet shall he remain at Nob that day: he shall shake his hand against the mount of the daughter of Zion, the hill of Jerusalem. 
Behold, the Lord, the LORD of hosts, shall lop the bough with terror: and the high ones of stature shall be hewn do
639,is cleansing, on the seventh day shall he shave it. 
And on the eighth day he shall bring two turtles, or two young pigeons, to the priest, to the door of the tabernacle of the congregation: 
And the priest shall offer the one for a sin offering, and the other for a burnt offering, and make an atonement for him, for that he sinned by the dead, and shall hallow his head that same day. 
And he shall consecrate unto the LORD the days of his separation, and shall bring a lamb of the first year for a trespass offering: but the days that were before shall be lost, because his separation was defiled. 
And this is the law of the Nazarite, 
822,is people. 
And Moses came and spake all the words of this song in the ears of the people, he, and Hoshea the son of Nun. 
And Moses made an end of speaking all these words to all Israel: 
And he said unto them, Set your hearts unto all the words which I testify among you this day, which ye shall command your children to observe to do, all the words of this law. 
For it is not a vain thing for you; because it is your life: and through this thing ye shall prolong your days in the land, whither ye go over Jordan to possess it. 
And the LORD spake unto Moses that selfsame day, saying, 
Get thee up into this mountain Abarim, unto mount Nebo, which is in the land of Moab, that is over against Jericho; and behold the land of Canaan, which I give unto the children of Israel for a possession: 
And die in the mount whit
775,d and four hundred chariots, and twelve thousand horsemen, whom he bestowed in the cities for chariots, and with the king at Jerusalem. 
And the king made silver to be in Jerusalem as stones, and cedars made he to be as the sycomore trees that are in the vale, for abundance. 
And Solomon had horses brought out of Egypt, and linen yarn: the king's merchants received the linen yarn at a price. 
And a chariot came up and went out of Egypt for six hundred shekels of silver, and an horse for an hundred and fifty: and so for all the kings of the Hittites, and for the kings of Syria, did they bring them out by their means. 
But king Solomon loved many strange women, together with the daughter of Pharaoh, women of the Moabites, Ammonites, Edomites, Zidonians, and Hittites:
791, found. 
Then shall stand up in his estate a raiser of taxes in the glory of the kingdom: but within few days he shall be destroyed, neither in anger, nor in battle. 
And in his estate shall stand up a vile person, to whom they shall not give the honour of the kingdom: but he shall come in peaceably, and obtain the kingdom by flatteries. 
And with the arms of a flood shall they be overflown from before him, and shall be broken; yea, also the prince of the covenant. 
And after the league made with him he shall work deceitfully: for he shall come up, and shall become strong with a small people. 
He shall enter peaceably even upon the fattest places of the province; and he shall do that which his fathers have not done, nor his fathers' fathers; he shall scatter among them the prey, a
629,ve on the name of his Son Jesus Christ, and love one another, as he gave us commandment. 
And he that keepeth his commandments dwelleth in him, and he in him. And hereby we know that he abideth in us, by the Spirit which he hath given us. 
Beloved, believe not every spirit, but try the spirits whether they are of God: because many false prophets are gone out into the world. 
Hereby know ye the Spirit of God: Every spirit that confesseth that Jesus Christ is come in the flesh is of God: 
And every spirit that confesseth not that Jesus Christ is come in the flesh is not of God: and this is that spirit of antichrist, whereof
606,han for a man to hear the song of fools. 
For as the crackling of thorns under a pot, so is the laughter of the fool: this also is vanity. 
Surely oppression maketh a wise man mad; and a gift destroyeth the heart. 
Better is the end of a thing than the beginning thereof: and the patient in spirit is better than the proud in spirit. 
Be not hasty in thy spirit to be angry: for anger resteth in the bosom of fools. 
Say not thou, What is the cause that the former days were better than these? for thou dost not enquire wisely concerning this. 
Wisdom is good with an inheritance: and by it there is profit
702,est, and the priest shall value him; according to his ability that vowed shall the priest value him. 
And if it be a beast, whereof men bring an offering unto the LORD, all that any man giveth of such unto the LORD shall be holy. 
He shall not alter it, nor change it, a good for a bad, or a bad for a good: and if he shall at all change beast for beast, then it and the exchange thereof shall be holy. 
And if it be any unclean beast, of which they do not offer a sacrifice unto the LORD, then he shall present the beast before the priest: 
And the priest shall value it, whether it be good or bad: as thou valuest it, who art the priest, so shall it be. 
But if he will at all redeem it, then he shal
627,g, and morning, and at noon, will I pray, and cry aloud: and he shall hear my voice. 
He hath delivered my soul in peace from the battle that was against me: for there were many with me. 
God shall hear, and afflict them, even he that abideth of old. Selah. Because they have no changes, therefore they fear not God. 
He hath put forth his hands against such as be at peace with him: he hath broken his covenant. 
The words of his mouth were smoother than butter, but war was in his heart: his words were softer than oil, yet were they drawn swords. 
Cast thy burden upon the LORD, and he shall sustain thee: he shall never suf
725,eth rise up and walk. 
And he took him by the right hand, and lifted him up: and immediately his feet and ankle bones received strength. 
And he leaping up stood, and walked, and entered with them into the temple, walking, and leaping, and praising God. 
And all the people saw him walking and praising God: 
And they knew that it was he which sat for alms at the Beautiful gate of the temple: and they were filled with wonder and amazement at that which had happened unto him. 
And as the lame man which was healed held Peter and John, all the people ran together unto them in the porch that is called Solomon's, greatly wondering. 
And when Peter saw it, he answered unto the people, Ye men of Israel, why marvel ye at this
808,hence an infant of days, nor an old man that hath not filled his days: for the child shall die an hundred years old; but the sinner being an hundred years old shall be accursed. 
And they shall build houses, and inhabit them; and they shall plant vineyards, and eat the fruit of them. 
They shall not build, and another inhabit; they shall not plant, and another eat: for as the days of a tree are the days of my people, and mine elect shall long enjoy the work of their hands. 
They shall not labour in vain, nor bring forth for trouble; for they are the seed of the blessed of the LORD, and their offspring with them. 
And it shall come to pass, that before they call, I will answer; and while they are yet speaking, I will hear. 
The wolf and the lamb shall feed together, and the lion shall eat straw lik
683,with twelve yoke of oxen before him, and he with the twelfth: and Elijah passed by him, and cast his mantle upon him. 
And he left the oxen, and ran after Elijah, and said, Let me, I pray thee, kiss my father and my mother, and then I will follow thee. And he said unto him, Go back again: for what have I done to thee? 
And he returned back from him, and took a yoke of oxen, and slew them, and boiled their flesh with the instruments of the oxen, and gave unto the people, and they did eat. Then he arose, and went after Elijah, and ministered unto him. 
And Benhadad the king of Syria gathered all his host together: and there were thirty and two kings with him, and horses, and c
643, 
And they gave Hebron unto Caleb, as Moses said: and he expelled thence the three sons of Anak. 
And the children of Benjamin did not drive out the Jebusites that inhabited Jerusalem; but the Jebusites dwell with the children of Benjamin in Jerusalem unto this day. 
And the house of Joseph, they also went up against Bethel: and the LORD was with them. 
And the house of Joseph sent to descry Bethel. (Now the name of the city before was Luz.) 
And the spies saw a man come forth out of the city, and they said unto him, Shew us, we pray thee, the entrance into the city, and we will shew thee mercy. 
And when he shewed them the entrance in
662, that hear me this day, were both almost, and altogether such as I am, except these bonds. 
And when he had thus spoken, the king rose up, and the governor, and Bernice, and they that sat with them: 
And when they were gone aside, they talked between themselves, saying, This man doeth nothing worthy of death or of bonds. 
Then said Agrippa unto Festus, This man might have been set at liberty, if he had not appealed unto Caesar. 
And when it was determined that we should sail into Italy, they delivered Paul and certain other prisoners unto one named Julius, a centurion of Augustus' band. 
And entering into a ship of Adramyttium, we launched, meaning to sa
730,rvile work therein: it shall be a statute for ever in all your dwellings throughout your generations. 
And when ye reap the harvest of your land, thou shalt not make clean riddance of the corners of thy field when thou reapest, neither shalt thou gather any gleaning of thy harvest: thou shalt leave them unto the poor, and to the stranger: I am the LORD your God. 
And the LORD spake unto Moses, saying, 
Speak unto the children of Israel, saying, In the seventh month, in the first day of the month, shall ye have a sabbath, a memorial of blowing of trumpets, an holy convocation. 
Ye shall do no servile work therein: but ye shall offer an offering made by fire unto the LORD. 
And the LORD spake unto Moses, saying, 
Also on t
824,f thou shalt forbear to vow, it shall be no sin in thee. 
That which is gone out of thy lips thou shalt keep and perform; even a freewill offering, according as thou hast vowed unto the LORD thy God, which thou hast promised with thy mouth. 
When thou comest into thy neighbour's vineyard, then thou mayest eat grapes thy fill at thine own pleasure; but thou shalt not put any in thy vessel. 
When thou comest into the standing corn of thy neighbour, then thou mayest pluck the ears with thine hand; but thou shalt not move a sickle unto thy neighbour's standing corn. 
When a man hath taken a wife, and married her, and it come to pass that she find no favour in his eyes, because he hath found some uncleanness in her: then let him write her a bill of divorcement, and give it in her hand, and send her out of his house. 

736, there none to answer? Is my hand shortened at all, that it cannot redeem? or have I no power to deliver? behold, at my rebuke I dry up the sea, I make the rivers a wilderness: their fish stinketh, because there is no water, and dieth for thirst. 
I clothe the heavens with blackness, and I make sackcloth their covering. 
The Lord GOD hath given me the tongue of the learned, that I should know how to speak a word in season to him that is weary: he wakeneth morning by morning, he wakeneth mine ear to hear as the learned. 
The Lord GOD hath opened mine ear, and I was not rebellious, neither turned away back. 
I gave my back to the smiters, and my cheeks to them that plucked off the hair: I hid not my face from shame and spitting.
835, of the earth are burned, and few men left. 
The new wine mourneth, the vine languisheth, all the merryhearted do sigh. 
The mirth of tabrets ceaseth, the noise of them that rejoice endeth, the joy of the harp ceaseth. 
They shall not drink wine with a song; strong drink shall be bitter to them that drink it. 
The city of confusion is broken down: every house is shut up, that no man may come in. 
There is a crying for wine in the streets; all joy is darkened, the mirth of the land is gone. 
In the city is left desolation, and the gate is smitten with destruction. 
When thus it shall be in the midst of the land among the people, there shall be as the shaking of an olive tree, and as the gleaning grapes when the vintage is done. 
They shall lift up their voice, they shall sing for the majesty of the LORD, they shall cry aloud
629, liberty for a cloke of maliciousness, but as the servants of God. 
Honour all men. Love the brotherhood. Fear God. Honour the king. 
Servants, be subject to your masters with all fear; not only to the good and gentle, but also to the froward. 
For this is thankworthy, if a man for conscience toward God endure grief, suffering wrongfully. 
For what glory is it, if, when ye be buffeted for your faults, ye shall take it patiently? but if, when ye do well, and suffer for it, ye take it patiently, this is acceptable with God. 
For even hereunto were ye called: because Christ also suffered for us, leaving us an example, that y
794,ore thee there upon the rock in Horeb; and thou shalt smite the rock, and there shall come water out of it, that the people may drink. And Moses did so in the sight of the elders of Israel. 
And he called the name of the place Massah, and Meribah, because of the chiding of the children of Israel, and because they tempted the LORD, saying, Is the LORD among us, or not? 
Then came Amalek, and fought with Israel in Rephidim. 
And Moses said unto Joshua, Choose us out men, and go out, fight with Amalek: to morrow I will stand on the top of the hill with the rod of God in mine hand. 
So Joshua did as Moses had said to him, and fought with Amalek: and Moses, Aaron, and Hur went up to the top of the hill. 
And it came to pass, when Moses held up his hand, that Israel prevailed: and when he 
617,rate place, and which was before the building toward the north. 
Before the length of an hundred cubits was the north door, and the breadth was fifty cubits. 
Over against the twenty cubits which were for the inner court, and over against the pavement which was for the utter court, was gallery against gallery in three stories. 
And before the chambers was a walk to ten cubits breadth inward, a way of one cubit; and their doors toward the north. 
Now the upper chambers were shorter: for the galleries were higher than these, than the lower, and than the middlemost of the building. 
For they were in three stories
694,ll the vessels that were found in the house of God with Obededom, and the treasures of the king's house, the hostages also, and returned to Samaria. 
And Amaziah the son of Joash king of Judah lived after the death of Joash son of Jehoahaz king of Israel fifteen years. 
Now the rest of the acts of Amaziah, first and last, behold, are they not written in the book of the kings of Judah and Israel? 
Now after the time that Amaziah did turn away from following the LORD they made a conspiracy against him in Jerusalem; and he fled to Lachish: but they sent to Lachish after him, and slew him there. 
And they brought him upon horses, and buried him with his fathers in the city of Judah. 
Then 
723, though now for a season, if need be, ye are in heaviness through manifold temptations: 
That the trial of your faith, being much more precious than of gold that perisheth, though it be tried with fire, might be found unto praise and honour and glory at the appearing of Jesus Christ: 
Whom having not seen, ye love; in whom, though now ye see him not, yet believing, ye rejoice with joy unspeakable and full of glory: 
Receiving the end of your faith, even the salvation of your souls. 
Of which salvation the prophets have enquired and searched diligently, who prophesied of the grace that should come unto you: 
Searching what, or what manner of time the Spirit of Christ which was in them did signify, when it testified
756,esus. 
And Jesus answered and said unto him, What wilt thou that I should do unto thee? The blind man said unto him, Lord, that I might receive my sight. 
And Jesus said unto him, Go thy way; thy faith hath made thee whole. And immediately he received his sight, and followed Jesus in the way. 
And when they came nigh to Jerusalem, unto Bethphage and Bethany, at the mount of Olives, he sendeth forth two of his disciples, 
And saith unto them, Go your way into the village over against you: and as soon as ye be entered into it, ye shall find a colt tied, whereon never man sat; loose him, and bring him. 
And if any man say unto you, Why do ye this? say ye that the Lord hath need of him; and straightway he will send him hither. 
And they went their wa
590,ried away, whom Nebuchadnezzar the king of Babylon had carried away, and came again to Jerusalem and to Judah, every one unto his city; 
Who came with Zerubbabel, Jeshua, Nehemiah, Azariah, Raamiah, Nahamani, Mordecai, Bilshan, Mispereth, Bigvai, Nehum, Baanah. The number, I say, of the men of the people of Israel was this; 
The children of Parosh, two thousand an hundred seventy and two. 
The children of Shephatiah, three hundred seventy and two. 
The children of Arah, six hundred fifty and two. 
The children of Pahathmoab, of the children of Jeshua and Joab, two thousand and eight 
639,owed himself before the king with his face to the ground. 
And Nathan said, My lord, O king, hast thou said, Adonijah shall reign after me, and he shall sit upon my throne? 
For he is gone down this day, and hath slain oxen and fat cattle and sheep in abundance, and hath called all the king's sons, and the captains of the host, and Abiathar the priest; and, behold, they eat and drink before him, and say, God save king Adonijah. 
But me, even me thy servant, and Zadok the priest, and Benaiah the son of Jehoiada, and thy servant Solomon, hath he not called. 
Is this thing done by my lord the king, and thou hast not shewed it unto thy
608,mmanded thee to walk in. So shalt thou put the evil away from the midst of thee. 
If thy brother, the son of thy mother, or thy son, or thy daughter, or the wife of thy bosom, or thy friend, which is as thine own soul, entice thee secretly, saying, Let us go and serve other gods, which thou hast not known, thou, nor thy fathers; 
Namely, of the gods of the people which are round about you, nigh unto thee, or far off from thee, from the one end of the earth even unto the other end of the earth; 
Thou shalt not consent unto him, nor hearken unto him; neither shall thine eye pity him, neither shalt thou 
615,, and the scall be not in sight deeper than the skin; 
He shall be shaven, but the scall shall he not shave; and the priest shall shut up him that hath the scall seven days more: 
And in the seventh day the priest shall look on the scall: and, behold, if the scall be not spread in the skin, nor be in sight deeper than the skin; then the priest shall pronounce him clean: and he shall wash his clothes, and be clean. 
But if the scall spread much in the skin after his cleansing; 
Then the priest shall look on him: and, behold, if the scall be spread in the skin, the priest shall not seek for yellow hair; he is 
666,of his heads as it were wounded to death; and his deadly wound was healed: and all the world wondered after the beast. 
And they worshipped the dragon which gave power unto the beast: and they worshipped the beast, saying, Who is like unto the beast? who is able to make war with him? 
And there was given unto him a mouth speaking great things and blasphemies; and power was given unto him to continue forty and two months. 
And he opened his mouth in blasphemy against God, to blaspheme his name, and his tabernacle, and them that dwell in heaven. 
And it was given unto him to make war with the saints, and to overcome them: and power was given him over all kindr
707, lord the king, are they not all my lord's servants? why then doth my lord require this thing? why will he be a cause of trespass to Israel? 
Nevertheless the king's word prevailed against Joab. Wherefore Joab departed, and went throughout all Israel, and came to Jerusalem. 
And Joab gave the sum of the number of the people unto David. And all they of Israel were a thousand thousand and an hundred thousand men that drew sword: and Judah was four hundred threescore and ten thousand men that drew sword. 
But Levi and Benjamin counted he not among them: for the king's word was abominable to Joab. 
And God was displeased with this thing; therefore he smote Israel. 
And David said unto God, I have sinne
748,hem. 
And Israel beheld Joseph's sons, and said, Who are these? 
And Joseph said unto his father, They are my sons, whom God hath given me in this place. And he said, Bring them, I pray thee, unto me, and I will bless them. 
Now the eyes of Israel were dim for age, so that he could not see. And he brought them near unto him; and he kissed them, and embraced them. 
And Israel said unto Joseph, I had not thought to see thy face: and, lo, God hath shewed me also thy seed. 
And Joseph brought them out from between his knees, and he bowed himself with his face to the earth. 
And Joseph took them both, Ephraim in his right hand toward Israel's left hand, and Manasseh in his left hand toward Israel's right hand, and brought them near unto him. 

643,nd the priest shall sprinkle with his right finger some of the oil that is in his left hand seven times before the LORD: 
And the priest shall put of the oil that is in his hand upon the tip of the right ear of him that is to be cleansed, and upon the thumb of his right hand, and upon the great toe of his right foot, upon the place of the blood of the trespass offering: 
And the rest of the oil that is in the priest's hand he shall put upon the head of him that is to be cleansed, to make an atonement for him before the LORD. 
And he shall offer the one of the turtledoves, or of the young pigeons, such as he can get; 
Even such as he is
718,d they besought him that he would not command them to go out into the deep. 
And there was there an herd of many swine feeding on the mountain: and they besought him that he would suffer them to enter into them. And he suffered them. 
Then went the devils out of the man, and entered into the swine: and the herd ran violently down a steep place into the lake, and were choked. 
When they that fed them saw what was done, they fled, and went and told it in the city and in the country. 
Then they went out to see what was done; and came to Jesus, and found the man, out of whom the devils were departed, sitting at the feet of Jesus, clothed, and in his right mind: and they were afraid. 
They also which saw it told t
642, 
Therefore the LORD, the God of hosts, the LORD, saith thus; Wailing shall be in all streets; and they shall say in all the highways, Alas! alas! and they shall call the husbandman to mourning, and such as are skilful of lamentation to wailing. 
And in all vineyards shall be wailing: for I will pass through thee, saith the LORD. 
Woe unto you that desire the day of the LORD! to what end is it for you? the day of the LORD is darkness, and not light. 
As if a man did flee from a lion, and a bear met him; or went into the house, and leaned his hand on the wall, and a serpent bit him. 
Shall not the day of the LORD be darkness, and not l
812,hich thou hast promised with thy mouth. 
When thou comest into thy neighbour's vineyard, then thou mayest eat grapes thy fill at thine own pleasure; but thou shalt not put any in thy vessel. 
When thou comest into the standing corn of thy neighbour, then thou mayest pluck the ears with thine hand; but thou shalt not move a sickle unto thy neighbour's standing corn. 
When a man hath taken a wife, and married her, and it come to pass that she find no favour in his eyes, because he hath found some uncleanness in her: then let him write her a bill of divorcement, and give it in her hand, and send her out of his house. 
And when she is departed out of his house, she may go and be another man's wife. 
And if the latter husband hate her, and write her a bill of divorcement, and giveth it in her hand, and sen
649,d they understood not the saying which he spake unto them. 
And he went down with them, and came to Nazareth, and was subject unto them: but his mother kept all these sayings in her heart. 
And Jesus increased in wisdom and stature, and in favour with God and man. 
Now in the fifteenth year of the reign of Tiberius Caesar, Pontius Pilate being governor of Judaea, and Herod being tetrarch of Galilee, and his brother Philip tetrarch of Ituraea and of the region of Trachonitis, and Lysanias the tetrarch of Abilene, 
Annas and Caiaphas being the high priests, the word of God came unto John the son of Zacharias in the wilderness. 
And he came int
741,ength will I wait upon thee: for God is my defence. 
The God of my mercy shall prevent me: God shall let me see my desire upon mine enemies. 
Slay them not, lest my people forget: scatter them by thy power; and bring them down, O Lord our shield. 
For the sin of their mouth and the words of their lips let them even be taken in their pride: and for cursing and lying which they speak. 
Consume them in wrath, consume them, that they may not be: and let them know that God ruleth in Jacob unto the ends of the earth. Selah. 
And at evening let them return; and let them make a noise like a dog, and go round about the city. 
Let them wander up and down for meat, and grudge if they be not satisfied. 
But I will sing of thy power; yea, I wil
779,d the LORD, and said, 
I know that thou canst do every thing, and that no thought can be withholden from thee. 
Who is he that hideth counsel without knowledge? therefore have I uttered that I understood not; things too wonderful for me, which I knew not. 
Hear, I beseech thee, and I will speak: I will demand of thee, and declare thou unto me. 
I have heard of thee by the hearing of the ear: but now mine eye seeth thee. 
Wherefore I abhor myself, and repent in dust and ashes. 
And it was so, that after the LORD had spoken these words unto Job, the LORD said to Eliphaz the Temanite, My wrath is kindled against thee, and against thy two friends: for ye have not spoken of me the thing that is right, as my servant Job hath. 
Therefore take unto you now seven bullocks and s
743, towns thereof, and Ephraim with the towns thereof. 
Neither did Jeroboam recover strength again in the days of Abijah: and the LORD struck him, and he died. 
But Abijah waxed mighty, and married fourteen wives, and begat twenty and two sons, and sixteen daughters. 
And the rest of the acts of Abijah, and his ways, and his sayings, are written in the story of the prophet Iddo. 
So Abijah slept with his fathers, and they buried him in the city of David: and Asa his son reigned in his stead. In his days the land was quiet ten years. 
And Asa did that which was good and right in the eyes of the LORD his God: 
For he took away the altars of the strange gods, and the high places, and brake down the images, and cut down the groves: 
And co
819,ilion, Ephrathites of Bethlehemjudah. And they came into the country of Moab, and continued there. 
And Elimelech Naomi's husband died; and she was left, and her two sons. 
And they took them wives of the women of Moab; the name of the one was Orpah, and the name of the other Ruth: and they dwelled there about ten years. 
And Mahlon and Chilion died also both of them; and the woman was left of her two sons and her husband. 
Then she arose with her daughters in law, that she might return from the country of Moab: for she had heard in the country of Moab how that the LORD had visited his people in giving them bread. 
Wherefore she went forth out of the place where she was, and her two daughters in law with her; and they went on the way to return unto the land of Judah. 
And Naomi said unto her two daughters in
616,give glory unto the God of Israel: peradventure he will lighten his hand from off you, and from off your gods, and from off your land. 
Wherefore then do ye harden your hearts, as the Egyptians and Pharaoh hardened their hearts? when he had wrought wonderfully among them, did they not let the people go, and they departed? 
Now therefore make a new cart, and take two milch kine, on which there hath come no yoke, and tie the kine to the cart, and bring their calves home from them: 
And take the ark of the LORD, and lay it upon the cart; and put the jewels of gold, which ye return him for a trespass offering, in
578,le while, and the wicked shall not be: yea, thou shalt diligently consider his place, and it shall not be. 
But the meek shall inherit the earth; and shall delight themselves in the abundance of peace. 
The wicked plotteth against the just, and gnasheth upon him with his teeth. 
The LORD shall laugh at him: for he seeth that his day is coming. 
The wicked have drawn out the sword, and have bent their bow, to cast down the poor and needy, and to slay such as be of upright conversation. 
Their sword shall enter into their own heart, and their bows shall be broken. 
A little
785,ken man staggereth in his vomit. 
Neither shall there be any work for Egypt, which the head or tail, branch or rush, may do. 
In that day shall Egypt be like unto women: and it shall be afraid and fear because of the shaking of the hand of the LORD of hosts, which he shaketh over it. 
And the land of Judah shall be a terror unto Egypt, every one that maketh mention thereof shall be afraid in himself, because of the counsel of the LORD of hosts, which he hath determined against it. 
In that day shall five cities in the land of Egypt speak the language of Canaan, and swear to the LORD of hosts; one shall be called, The city of destruction. 
In that day shall there be an altar to the LORD in the midst of the land of Egypt, and a pillar at the border thereof to the LORD. 
And it
637,at? 
Jesus saith unto them, My meat is to do the will of him that sent me, and to finish his work. 
Say not ye, There are yet four months, and then cometh harvest? behold, I say unto you, Lift up your eyes, and look on the fields; for they are white already to harvest. 
And he that reapeth receiveth wages, and gathereth fruit unto life eternal: that both he that soweth and he that reapeth may rejoice together. 
And herein is that saying true, One soweth, and another reapeth. 
I sent you to reap that whereon ye bestowed no labour: other men laboured, and ye are entered into their labours. 
And many of the Samaritans of that city b
756,If ye send away the ark of the God of Israel, send it not empty; but in any wise return him a trespass offering: then ye shall be healed, and it shall be known to you why his hand is not removed from you. 
Then said they, What shall be the trespass offering which we shall return to him? They answered, Five golden emerods, and five golden mice, according to the number of the lords of the Philistines: for one plague was on you all, and on your lords. 
Wherefore ye shall make images of your emerods, and images of your mice that mar the land; and ye shall give glory unto the God of Israel: peradventure he will lighten his hand from off you, and from off your gods, and from off your land. 
Wherefore then do ye harden your hearts, as the Egyptians and 
729,ough the knowledge of the Lord and Saviour Jesus Christ, they are again entangled therein, and overcome, the latter end is worse with them than the beginning. 
For it had been better for them not to have known the way of righteousness, than, after they have known it, to turn from the holy commandment delivered unto them. 
But it is happened unto them according to the true proverb, The dog is turned to his own vomit again; and the sow that was washed to her wallowing in the mire. 
This second epistle, beloved, I now write unto you; in both which I stir up your pure minds by way of remembrance: 
That ye may be mindful of the words which were spoken before by the holy prophets, and of the commandment of us the apostles of 
757, and caused it not to rain upon another city: one piece was rained upon, and the piece whereupon it rained not withered. 
So two or three cities wandered unto one city, to drink water; but they were not satisfied: yet have ye not returned unto me, saith the LORD. 
I have smitten you with blasting and mildew: when your gardens and your vineyards and your fig trees and your olive trees increased, the palmerworm devoured them: yet have ye not returned unto me, saith the LORD. 
I have sent among you the pestilence after the manner of Egypt: your young men have I slain with the sword, and have taken away your horses; and I have made the stink of your camps to come up unto your nostrils: yet have ye not returned unto me, saith the LORD. 
I have overthro
589,ah went not up; for she said unto her husband, I will not go up until the child be weaned, and then I will bring him, that he may appear before the LORD, and there abide for ever. 
And Elkanah her husband said unto her, Do what seemeth thee good; tarry until thou have weaned him; only the LORD establish his word. So the woman abode, and gave her son suck until she weaned him. 
And when she had weaned him, she took him up with her, with three bullocks, and one ephah of flour, and a bottle of wine, and brought him unto the house of the LORD in Shiloh: and the child was young. 
And the
574,reshah. 
Then Asa went out against him, and they set the battle in array in the valley of Zephathah at Mareshah. 
And Asa cried unto the LORD his God, and said, LORD, it is nothing with thee to help, whether with many, or with them that have no power: help us, O LORD our God; for we rest on thee, and in thy name we go against this multitude. O LORD, thou art our God; let no man prevail against thee. 
So the LORD smote the Ethiopians before Asa, and before Judah; and the Ethiopians fled. 
And Asa and the people that were with him pursued them unto Gerar: and the Ethiop
826,es shall be upon their bones, though they were the terror of the mighty in the land of the living. 
Yea, thou shalt be broken in the midst of the uncircumcised, and shalt lie with them that are slain with the sword. 
There is Edom, her kings, and all her princes, which with their might are laid by them that were slain by the sword: they shall lie with the uncircumcised, and with them that go down to the pit. 
There be the princes of the north, all of them, and all the Zidonians, which are gone down with the slain; with their terror they are ashamed of their might; and they lie uncircumcised with them that be slain by the sword, and bear their shame with them that go down to the pit. 
Pharaoh shall see them, and shall be comforted over all his multitude, even Pharaoh and all his army slain by the sword, saith the Lo
830,red not the miracle of the loaves: for their heart was hardened. 
And when they had passed over, they came into the land of Gennesaret, and drew to the shore. 
And when they were come out of the ship, straightway they knew him, 
And ran through that whole region round about, and began to carry about in beds those that were sick, where they heard he was. 
And whithersoever he entered, into villages, or cities, or country, they laid the sick in the streets, and besought him that they might touch if it were but the border of his garment: and as many as touched him were made whole. 
Then came together unto him the Pharisees, and certain of the scribes, which came from Jerusalem. 
And when they saw some of his disciples eat bread with defiled, that is to say, with unwashen, hands, they found fault. 
For the Pharisees, and a
819,HIS IS JESUS THE KING OF THE JEWS. 
Then were there two thieves crucified with him, one on the right hand, and another on the left. 
And they that passed by reviled him, wagging their heads, 
And saying, Thou that destroyest the temple, and buildest it in three days, save thyself. If thou be the Son of God, come down from the cross. 
Likewise also the chief priests mocking him, with the scribes and elders, said, 
He saved others; himself he cannot save. If he be the King of Israel, let him now come down from the cross, and we will believe him. 
He trusted in God; let him deliver him now, if he will have him: for he said, I am the Son of God. 
The thieves also, which were crucified with him, cast the same in his teeth. 
Now from the sixth hour there was darkness over all the land unto the ninth hour. 
And abo
822,nd of Egypt, both man and beast; and against all the gods of Egypt I will execute judgment: I am the LORD. 
And the blood shall be to you for a token upon the houses where ye are: and when I see the blood, I will pass over you, and the plague shall not be upon you to destroy you, when I smite the land of Egypt. 
And this day shall be unto you for a memorial; and ye shall keep it a feast to the LORD throughout your generations; ye shall keep it a feast by an ordinance for ever. 
Seven days shall ye eat unleavened bread; even the first day ye shall put away leaven out of your houses: for whosoever eateth leavened bread from the first day until the seventh day, that soul shall be cut off from Israel. 
And in the first day there shall be an holy convocation, and in the seventh day there shall be an holy convocation
635,By the life of Pharaoh ye shall not go forth hence, except your youngest brother come hither. 
Send one of you, and let him fetch your brother, and ye shall be kept in prison, that your words may be proved, whether there be any truth in you: or else by the life of Pharaoh surely ye are spies. 
And he put them all together into ward three days. 
And Joseph said unto them the third day, This do, and live; for I fear God: 
If ye be true men, let one of your brethren be bound in the house of your prison: go ye, carry corn for the famine of your houses: 
But bring your youngest brother unto me; so shall your words be verified, and y
734,ee, thou shalt not depart thence, till thou hast paid the very last mite. 
There were present at that season some that told him of the Galilaeans, whose blood Pilate had mingled with their sacrifices. 
And Jesus answering said unto them, Suppose ye that these Galilaeans were sinners above all the Galilaeans, because they suffered such things? 
I tell you, Nay: but, except ye repent, ye shall all likewise perish. 
Or those eighteen, upon whom the tower in Siloam fell, and slew them, think ye that they were sinners above all men that dwelt in Jerusalem? 
I tell you, Nay: but, except ye repent, ye shall all likewise perish. 
He spake also this parable; A certain man had a fig tree planted in his vineyard; and he came and sought
622,apostles' feet. 
But a certain man named Ananias, with Sapphira his wife, sold a possession, 
And kept back part of the price, his wife also being privy to it, and brought a certain part, and laid it at the apostles' feet. 
But Peter said, Ananias, why hath Satan filled thine heart to lie to the Holy Ghost, and to keep back part of the price of the land? 
Whiles it remained, was it not thine own? and after it was sold, was it not in thine own power? why hast thou conceived this thing in thine heart? thou hast not lied unto men, but unto God. 
And Ananias hearing these words fell down, and gave up the ghost: and gre
759,e without a cause: but I will meditate in thy precepts. 
Let those that fear thee turn unto me, and those that have known thy testimonies. 
Let my heart be sound in thy statutes; that I be not ashamed. 
My soul fainteth for thy salvation: but I hope in thy word. 
Mine eyes fail for thy word, saying, When wilt thou comfort me? 
For I am become like a bottle in the smoke; yet do I not forget thy statutes. 
How many are the days of thy servant? when wilt thou execute judgment on them that persecute me? 
The proud have digged pits for me, which are not after thy law. 
All thy commandments are faithful: they persecute me wrongfully; help thou me. 
They had almost consumed me upon earth; but I forsook not thy precepts. 
Quicken me after thy lovingkindness
614,
If this man were not of God, he could do nothing. 
They answered and said unto him, Thou wast altogether born in sins, and dost thou teach us? And they cast him out. 
Jesus heard that they had cast him out; and when he had found him, he said unto him, Dost thou believe on the Son of God? 
He answered and said, Who is he, Lord, that I might believe on him? 
And Jesus said unto him, Thou hast both seen him, and it is he that talketh with thee. 
And he said, Lord, I believe. And he worshipped him. 
And Jesus said, For judgment I am come into this world, that they which see not might see; and that they which s
837, know not; 
And come and stand before me in this house, which is called by my name, and say, We are delivered to do all these abominations? 
Is this house, which is called by my name, become a den of robbers in your eyes? Behold, even I have seen it, saith the LORD. 
But go ye now unto my place which was in Shiloh, where I set my name at the first, and see what I did to it for the wickedness of my people Israel. 
And now, because ye have done all these works, saith the LORD, and I spake unto you, rising up early and speaking, but ye heard not; and I called you, but ye answered not; 
Therefore will I do unto this house, which is called by my name, wherein ye trust, and unto the place which I gave to you and to your fathers, as I have done to Shiloh. 
And I will cast you out of my sight, as I have cast out all your brethren, ev
596,no king in Israel, that there was a certain Levite sojourning on the side of mount Ephraim, who took to him a concubine out of Bethlehemjudah. 
And his concubine played the whore against him, and went away from him unto her father's house to Bethlehemjudah, and was there four whole months. 
And her husband arose, and went after her, to speak friendly unto her, and to bring her again, having his servant with him, and a couple of asses: and she brought him into her father's house: and when the father of the damsel saw him, he rejoiced to meet him. 
And his father in law, the damsel's father,
758,lt be called, Sought out, A city not forsaken. 
Who is this that cometh from Edom, with dyed garments from Bozrah? this that is glorious in his apparel, travelling in the greatness of his strength? I that speak in righteousness, mighty to save. 
Wherefore art thou red in thine apparel, and thy garments like him that treadeth in the winefat? 
I have trodden the winepress alone; and of the people there was none with me: for I will tread them in mine anger, and trample them in my fury; and their blood shall be sprinkled upon my garments, and I will stain all my raiment. 
For the day of vengeance is in mine heart, and the year of my redeemed is come. 
And I looked, and there was none to help; and I wondered that there was none to uphold: therefore mine
574,, to compass the land of Edom: and the soul of the people was much discouraged because of the way. 
And the people spake against God, and against Moses, Wherefore have ye brought us up out of Egypt to die in the wilderness? for there is no bread, neither is there any water; and our soul loatheth this light bread. 
And the LORD sent fiery serpents among the people, and they bit the people; and much people of Israel died. 
Therefore the people came to Moses, and said, We have sinned, for we have spoken against the LORD, and against thee; pray unto the LORD, that he take
703, hand of the Chaldeans, that they might put us to death, and carry us away captives into Babylon. 
So Johanan the son of Kareah, and all the captains of the forces, and all the people, obeyed not the voice of the LORD, to dwell in the land of Judah. 
But Johanan the son of Kareah, and all the captains of the forces, took all the remnant of Judah, that were returned from all nations, whither they had been driven, to dwell in the land of Judah; 
Even men, and women, and children, and the king's daughters, and every person that Nebuzaradan the captain of the guard had left with Gedaliah the son of Ahikam the son of Shaphan, and Jeremiah the prophet, and Baruch the son of Neriah. 
So they came into
590,alt not make merchandise of her, because thou hast humbled her. 
If a man have two wives, one beloved, and another hated, and they have born him children, both the beloved and the hated; and if the firstborn son be hers that was hated: 
Then it shall be, when he maketh his sons to inherit that which he hath, that he may not make the son of the beloved firstborn before the son of the hated, which is indeed the firstborn: 
But he shall acknowledge the son of the hated for the firstborn, by giving him a double portion of all that he hath: for he is the beginning of his strength; the rig
838,g again the captivity of my people of Israel, and they shall build the waste cities, and inhabit them; and they shall plant vineyards, and drink the wine thereof; they shall also make gardens, and eat the fruit of them. 
And I will plant them upon their land, and they shall no more be pulled up out of their land which I have given them, saith the LORD thy God. 
The vision of Obadiah. Thus saith the Lord GOD concerning Edom; We have heard a rumour from the LORD, and an ambassador is sent among the heathen, Arise ye, and let us rise up against her in battle. 
Behold, I have made thee small among the heathen: thou art greatly despised. 
The pride of thine heart hath deceived thee, thou that dwellest in the clefts of the rock, whose habitation is high; that saith in his heart, Who shall bring me down to the ground? 
Though thou ex
668,LORD had shut up her womb. 
And as he did so year by year, when she went up to the house of the LORD, so she provoked her; therefore she wept, and did not eat. 
Then said Elkanah her husband to her, Hannah, why weepest thou? and why eatest thou not? and why is thy heart grieved? am not I better to thee than ten sons? 
So Hannah rose up after they had eaten in Shiloh, and after they had drunk. Now Eli the priest sat upon a seat by a post of the temple of the LORD. 
And she was in bitterness of soul, and prayed unto the LORD, and wept sore. 
And she vowed a vow, and said, O LORD of hosts, if thou wilt indeed look on the affliction of thine handmaid, and remember
615,st the chief of the bakers. 
And he put them in ward in the house of the captain of the guard, into the prison, the place where Joseph was bound. 
And the captain of the guard charged Joseph with them, and he served them: and they continued a season in ward. 
And they dreamed a dream both of them, each man his dream in one night, each man according to the interpretation of his dream, the butler and the baker of the king of Egypt, which were bound in the prison. 
And Joseph came in unto them in the morning, and looked upon them, and, behold, they were sad. 
And he asked Pharaoh's officers that were with him i
716, it so to be done: and the decree was given at Shushan; and they hanged Haman's ten sons. 
For the Jews that were in Shushan gathered themselves together on the fourteenth day also of the month Adar, and slew three hundred men at Shushan; but on the prey they laid not their hand. 
But the other Jews that were in the king's provinces gathered themselves together, and stood for their lives, and had rest from their enemies, and slew of their foes seventy and five thousand, but they laid not their hands on the prey, 
On the thirteenth day of the month Adar; and on the fourteenth day of the same rested they, and made it a day of feasting and gladness. 
But the Jews that were at Shushan assembled together on the 
809,rden? I will even forsake you, saith the LORD. 
And as for the prophet, and the priest, and the people, that shall say, The burden of the LORD, I will even punish that man and his house. 
Thus shall ye say every one to his neighbour, and every one to his brother, What hath the LORD answered? and, What hath the LORD spoken? 
And the burden of the LORD shall ye mention no more: for every man's word shall be his burden; for ye have perverted the words of the living God, of the LORD of hosts our God. 
Thus shalt thou say to the prophet, What hath the LORD answered thee? and, What hath the LORD spoken? 
But since ye say, The burden of the LORD; therefore thus saith the LORD; Because ye say this word, The burden of the LORD, and I have sent unto you, saying, Ye shall not say, The burden of the LORD; 
The
603,is clothes, and bathe himself in water, and shall be clean at even. 
But the man that shall be unclean, and shall not purify himself, that soul shall be cut off from among the congregation, because he hath defiled the sanctuary of the LORD: the water of separation hath not been sprinkled upon him; he is unclean. 
And it shall be a perpetual statute unto them, that he that sprinkleth the water of separation shall wash his clothes; and he that toucheth the water of separation shall be unclean until even. 
And whatsoever the unclean person toucheth shall be unclean; and the soul that toucheth it sha
652,st the wall, that thou mayest be their king, according to these words. 
And thou hast also appointed prophets to preach of thee at Jerusalem, saying, There is a king in Judah: and now shall it be reported to the king according to these words. Come now therefore, and let us take counsel together. 
Then I sent unto him, saying, There are no such things done as thou sayest, but thou feignest them out of thine own heart. 
For they all made us afraid, saying, Their hands shall be weakened from the work, that it be not done. Now therefore, O God, strengthen my hands. 
Afterward I came unto the house of Shemaiah the son of Delaiah the son of Mehetabee
776,to the priest the shoulder, and the two cheeks, and the maw. 
The firstfruit also of thy corn, of thy wine, and of thine oil, and the first of the fleece of thy sheep, shalt thou give him. 
For the LORD thy God hath chosen him out of all thy tribes, to stand to minister in the name of the LORD, him and his sons for ever. 
And if a Levite come from any of thy gates out of all Israel, where he sojourned, and come with all the desire of his mind unto the place which the LORD shall choose; 
Then he shall minister in the name of the LORD his God, as all his brethren the Levites do, which stand there before the LORD. 
They shall have like portions to eat, beside that which cometh of the sale of his patrimony. 
When thou art come into the land which the LORD thy God giveth
746,, Let us go and sacrifice to our God. 
Let there more work be laid upon the men, that they may labour therein; and let them not regard vain words. 
And the taskmasters of the people went out, and their officers, and they spake to the people, saying, Thus saith Pharaoh, I will not give you straw. 
Go ye, get you straw where ye can find it: yet not ought of your work shall be diminished. 
So the people were scattered abroad throughout all the land of Egypt to gather stubble instead of straw. 
And the taskmasters hasted them, saying, Fulfil your works, your daily tasks, as when there was straw. 
And the officers of the children of Israel, which Pharaoh's taskmasters had set over them, were beaten, and demanded, Wherefore have ye not fulfil
713,all the captains of the forces that were with him, heard of all the evil that Ishmael the son of Nethaniah had done, 
Then they took all the men, and went to fight with Ishmael the son of Nethaniah, and found him by the great waters that are in Gibeon. 
Now it came to pass, that when all the people which were with Ishmael saw Johanan the son of Kareah, and all the captains of the forces that were with him, then they were glad. 
So all the people that Ishmael had carried away captive from Mizpah cast about and returned, and went unto Johanan the son of Kareah. 
But Ishmael the son of Nethaniah escaped from Johanan with eight men, and went to the Ammonites. 
Then took Johanan the son of Kareah, and all the
646, calf, and the dancing: and Moses' anger waxed hot, and he cast the tables out of his hands, and brake them beneath the mount. 
And he took the calf which they had made, and burnt it in the fire, and ground it to powder, and strawed it upon the water, and made the children of Israel drink of it. 
And Moses said unto Aaron, What did this people unto thee, that thou hast brought so great a sin upon them? 
And Aaron said, Let not the anger of my lord wax hot: thou knowest the people, that they are set on mischief. 
For they said unto me, Make us gods, which shall go before us: for as for this Moses, the man that brought us up out of the land
776,e no fountains abounding with water. 
Before the mountains were settled, before the hills was I brought forth: 
While as yet he had not made the earth, nor the fields, nor the highest part of the dust of the world. 
When he prepared the heavens, I was there: when he set a compass upon the face of the depth: 
When he established the clouds above: when he strengthened the fountains of the deep: 
When he gave to the sea his decree, that the waters should not pass his commandment: when he appointed the foundations of the earth: 
Then I was by him, as one brought up with him: and I was daily his delight, rejoicing always before him; 
Rejoicing in the habitable part of his earth; and my delights were with the sons of men. 
Now therefore hearken unto me, O ye children: for
798,is days are determined, the number of his months are with thee, thou hast appointed his bounds that he cannot pass; 
Turn from him, that he may rest, till he shall accomplish, as an hireling, his day. 
For there is hope of a tree, if it be cut down, that it will sprout again, and that the tender branch thereof will not cease. 
Though the root thereof wax old in the earth, and the stock thereof die in the ground; 
Yet through the scent of water it will bud, and bring forth boughs like a plant. 
But man dieth, and wasteth away: yea, man giveth up the ghost, and where is he? 
As the waters fail from the sea, and the flood decayeth and drieth up: 
So man lieth down, and riseth not: till the heavens be no more, they shall not awake, nor be raised out of their sleep. 
O that thou wouldest hide
801,ing coals of fire, and like the appearance of lamps: it went up and down among the living creatures; and the fire was bright, and out of the fire went forth lightning. 
And the living creatures ran and returned as the appearance of a flash of lightning. 
Now as I beheld the living creatures, behold one wheel upon the earth by the living creatures, with his four faces. 
The appearance of the wheels and their work was like unto the colour of a beryl: and they four had one likeness: and their appearance and their work was as it were a wheel in the middle of a wheel. 
When they went, they went upon their four sides: and they turned not when they went. 
As for their rings, they were so high that they were dreadful; and their rings were full of eyes round about them four. 
And when the living cre
676,rkness, the LORD shall be a light unto me. 
I will bear the indignation of the LORD, because I have sinned against him, until he plead my cause, and execute judgment for me: he will bring me forth to the light, and I shall behold his righteousness. 
Then she that is mine enemy shall see it, and shame shall cover her which said unto me, Where is the LORD thy God? mine eyes shall behold her: now shall she be trodden down as the mire of the streets. 
In the day that thy walls are to be built, in that day shall the decree be far removed. 
In that day also he shall come even to thee from Assyria, and from the fortified cities, and from the fortress even to the river, and f
659,dan, confessing their sins. 
But when he saw many of the Pharisees and Sadducees come to his baptism, he said unto them, O generation of vipers, who hath warned you to flee from the wrath to come? 
Bring forth therefore fruits meet for repentance: 
And think not to say within yourselves, We have Abraham to our father: for I say unto you, that God is able of these stones to raise up children unto Abraham. 
And now also the axe is laid unto the root of the trees: therefore every tree which bringeth not forth good fruit is hewn down, and cast into the fire. 
I indeed baptize you with water unto repentance. but he that cometh after me is mightier than I, 
813, in the king's palace, and whom they might teach the learning and the tongue of the Chaldeans. 
And the king appointed them a daily provision of the king's meat, and of the wine which he drank: so nourishing them three years, that at the end thereof they might stand before the king. 
Now among these were of the children of Judah, Daniel, Hananiah, Mishael, and Azariah: 
Unto whom the prince of the eunuchs gave names: for he gave unto Daniel the name of Belteshazzar; and to Hananiah, of Shadrach; and to Mishael, of Meshach; and to Azariah, of Abednego. 
But Daniel purposed in his heart that he would not defile himself with the portion of the king's meat, nor with the wine which he drank: therefore he requested of the prince of the eunuchs that he might not defile himself. 
Now God had brought Daniel int
782, let me live. And he said, Is he yet alive? he is my brother. 
Now the men did diligently observe whether any thing would come from him, and did hastily catch it: and they said, Thy brother Benhadad. Then he said, Go ye, bring him. Then Benhadad came forth to him; and he caused him to come up into the chariot. 
And Ben-hadad said unto him, The cities, which my father took from thy father, I will restore; and thou shalt make streets for thee in Damascus, as my father made in Samaria. Then said Ahab, I will send thee away with this covenant. So he made a covenant with him, and sent him away. 
And a certain man of the sons of the prophets said unto his neighbour in the word of the LORD, Smite me, I pray thee. And the man refused to smite him. 
Then said he unto him, Because 
819, and of the princes, and gave it unto the king of Assyria: but he helped him not. 
And in the time of his distress did he trespass yet more against the LORD: this is that king Ahaz. 
For he sacrificed unto the gods of Damascus, which smote him: and he said, Because the gods of the kings of Syria help them, therefore will I sacrifice to them, that they may help me. But they were the ruin of him, and of all Israel. 
And Ahaz gathered together the vessels of the house of God, and cut in pieces the vessels of the house of God, and shut up the doors of the house of the LORD, and he made him altars in every corner of Jerusalem. 
And in every several city of Judah he made high places to burn incense unto other gods, and provoked to anger the LORD God of his fathers. 
Now the rest of his acts and of all his ways, fi
747,de, as the trees of lign aloes which the LORD hath planted, and as cedar trees beside the waters. 
He shall pour the water out of his buckets, and his seed shall be in many waters, and his king shall be higher than Agag, and his kingdom shall be exalted. 
God brought him forth out of Egypt; he hath as it were the strength of an unicorn: he shall eat up the nations his enemies, and shall break their bones, and pierce them through with his arrows. 
He couched, he lay down as a lion, and as a great lion: who shall stir him up? Blessed is he that blesseth thee, and cursed is he that curseth thee. 
And Balak's anger was kindled against Balaam, and he smote his hands together: and Balak said unto Balaam, I called thee to curse mine enemies, an
695, the sea, under colour as though they would have cast anchors out of the foreship, 
Paul said to the centurion and to the soldiers, Except these abide in the ship, ye cannot be saved. 
Then the soldiers cut off the ropes of the boat, and let her fall off. 
And while the day was coming on, Paul besought them all to take meat, saying, This day is the fourteenth day that ye have tarried and continued fasting, having taken nothing. 
Wherefore I pray you to take some meat: for this is for your health: for there shall not an hair fall from the head of any of you. 
And when he had thus spoken, he took bread, and gave thanks to God in presence of them all: and when he had broken it, he began to
772,tent of the congregation and the altar, and put water there, to wash withal. 
And Moses and Aaron and his sons washed their hands and their feet thereat: 
When they went into the tent of the congregation, and when they came near unto the altar, they washed; as the LORD commanded Moses. 
And he reared up the court round about the tabernacle and the altar, and set up the hanging of the court gate. So Moses finished the work. 
Then a cloud covered the tent of the congregation, and the glory of the LORD filled the tabernacle. 
And Moses was not able to enter into the tent of the congregation, because the cloud abode thereon, and the glory of the LORD filled the tabernacle. 
And when the cloud was taken up from over the tabernacle, the children of Israel went onward 
615, a rainbow round about the throne, in sight like unto an emerald. 
And round about the throne were four and twenty seats: and upon the seats I saw four and twenty elders sitting, clothed in white raiment; and they had on their heads crowns of gold. 
And out of the throne proceeded lightnings and thunderings and voices: and there were seven lamps of fire burning before the throne, which are the seven Spirits of God. 
And before the throne there was a sea of glass like unto crystal: and in the midst of the throne, and round about the throne, were four beasts full of eyes before and behind. 
And the first beast
639,oth inhabit: let the inhabitants of the rock sing, let them shout from the top of the mountains. 
Let them give glory unto the LORD, and declare his praise in the islands. 
The LORD shall go forth as a mighty man, he shall stir up jealousy like a man of war: he shall cry, yea, roar; he shall prevail against his enemies. 
I have long time holden my peace; I have been still, and refrained myself: now will I cry like a travailing woman; I will destroy and devour at once. 
I will make waste mountains and hills, and dry up all their herbs; and I will make the rivers islands, and I will dry up the pools. 
And I will bring the blind by a 
820,n which is in Christ Jesus with eternal glory. 
It is a faithful saying: For if we be dead with him, we shall also live with him: 
If we suffer, we shall also reign with him: if we deny him, he also will deny us: 
If we believe not, yet he abideth faithful: he cannot deny himself. 
Of these things put them in remembrance, charging them before the Lord that they strive not about words to no profit, but to the subverting of the hearers. 
Study to shew thyself approved unto God, a workman that needeth not to be ashamed, rightly dividing the word of truth. 
But shun profane and vain babblings: for they will increase unto more ungodliness. 
And their word will eat as doth a canker: of whom is Hymenaeus and Philetus; 
Who concerning the truth have erred, saying that the resurrection is past already; and overthrow t
667,id, Whose daughter art thou? tell me, I pray thee: is there room in thy father's house for us to lodge in? 
And she said unto him, I am the daughter of Bethuel the son of Milcah, which she bare unto Nahor. 
She said moreover unto him, We have both straw and provender enough, and room to lodge in. 
And the man bowed down his head, and worshipped the LORD. 
And he said, Blessed be the LORD God of my master Abraham, who hath not left destitute my master of his mercy and his truth: I being in the way, the LORD led me to the house of my master's brethren. 
And the damsel ran, and told them of her mother's house these things. 
And Rebekah had a brother, and his nam
667, the Jews to destroy them, and had cast Pur, that is, the lot, to consume them, and to destroy them; 
But when Esther came before the king, he commanded by letters that his wicked device, which he devised against the Jews, should return upon his own head, and that he and his sons should be hanged on the gallows. 
Wherefore they called these days Purim after the name of Pur. Therefore for all the words of this letter, and of that which they had seen concerning this matter, and which had come unto them, 
The Jews ordained, and took upon them, and upon their seed, and upon all such as joined themselves unto them, so as it should not fail, that they would keep th
594, they borne their shame with them that go down to the pit: he is put in the midst of them that be slain. 
There is Meshech, Tubal, and all her multitude: her graves are round about him: all of them uncircumcised, slain by the sword, though they caused their terror in the land of the living. 
And they shall not lie with the mighty that are fallen of the uncircumcised, which are gone down to hell with their weapons of war: and they have laid their swords under their heads, but their iniquities shall be upon their bones, though they were the terror of the mighty in the land of the living. 

798, there appeared unto them cloven tongues like as of fire, and it sat upon each of them. 
And they were all filled with the Holy Ghost, and began to speak with other tongues, as the Spirit gave them utterance. 
And there were dwelling at Jerusalem Jews, devout men, out of every nation under heaven. 
Now when this was noised abroad, the multitude came together, and were confounded, because that every man heard them speak in his own language. 
And they were all amazed and marvelled, saying one to another, Behold, are not all these which speak Galilaeans? 
And how hear we every man in our own tongue, wherein we were born? 
Parthians, and Medes, and Elamites, and the dwellers in Mesopotamia, and in Judaea, and Cappadocia, in Pontus, and Asia, 
Phrygia, and Pamphylia, in Egypt, and in the part
566,for ever? knowest thou not that it will be bitterness in the latter end? how long shall it be then, ere thou bid the people return from following their brethren? 
And Joab said, As God liveth, unless thou hadst spoken, surely then in the morning the people had gone up every one from following his brother. 
So Joab blew a trumpet, and all the people stood still, and pursued after Israel no more, neither fought they any more. 
And Abner and his men walked all that night through the plain, and passed over Jordan, and went through all Bithron, and they came to Mah
792,e to the mountains; and let them which are in the midst of it depart out; and let not them that are in the countries enter thereinto. 
For these be the days of vengeance, that all things which are written may be fulfilled. 
But woe unto them that are with child, and to them that give suck, in those days! for there shall be great distress in the land, and wrath upon this people. 
And they shall fall by the edge of the sword, and shall be led away captive into all nations: and Jerusalem shall be trodden down of the Gentiles, until the times of the Gentiles be fulfilled. 
And there shall be signs in the sun, and in the moon, and in the stars; and upon the earth distress of nations, with perplexity; the sea and the waves roaring; 
Men's hearts failing them for fear, and for looking aft
711,loor. 
Arise and thresh, O daughter of Zion: for I will make thine horn iron, and I will make thy hoofs brass: and thou shalt beat in pieces many people: and I will consecrate their gain unto the LORD, and their substance unto the Lord of the whole earth. 
Now gather thyself in troops, O daughter of troops: he hath laid siege against us: they shall smite the judge of Israel with a rod upon the cheek. 
But thou, Bethlehem Ephratah, though thou be little among the thousands of Judah, yet out of thee shall he come forth unto me that is to be ruler in Israel; whose goings forth have been from of old, from everlasting. 
Therefore will he give them up, until the time that she which travaileth hath brought fo
680,and put them in his temple at Babylon. 
Now the rest of the acts of Jehoiakim, and his abominations which he did, and that which was found in him, behold, they are written in the book of the kings of Israel and Judah: and Jehoiachin his son reigned in his stead. 
Jehoiachin was eight years old when he began to reign, and he reigned three months and ten days in Jerusalem: and he did that which was evil in the sight of the LORD. 
And when the year was expired, king Nebuchadnezzar sent, and brought him to Babylon, with the goodly vessels of the house of the LORD, and made Zedekiah his brother king over Judah and Jerusalem. 
Zedekiah was one and twenty years old when he began
756, but I said, Truly this is a grief, and I must bear it. 
My tabernacle is spoiled, and all my cords are broken: my children are gone forth of me, and they are not: there is none to stretch forth my tent any more, and to set up my curtains. 
For the pastors are become brutish, and have not sought the LORD: therefore they shall not prosper, and all their flocks shall be scattered. 
Behold, the noise of the bruit is come, and a great commotion out of the north country, to make the cities of Judah desolate, and a den of dragons. 
O LORD, I know that the way of man is not in himself: it is not in man that walketh to direct his steps. 
O LORD, correct me, but with judgment; not in thine anger, lest thou bring me to nothing. 
Pour out thy fury upon the 
714,on is in the holy mountains. 
The LORD loveth the gates of Zion more than all the dwellings of Jacob. 
Glorious things are spoken of thee, O city of God. Selah. 
I will make mention of Rahab and Babylon to them that know me: behold Philistia, and Tyre, with Ethiopia; this man was born there. 
And of Zion it shall be said, This and that man was born in her: and the highest himself shall establish her. 
The LORD shall count, when he writeth up the people, that this man was born there. Selah. 
As well the singers as the players on instruments shall be there: all my springs are in thee. 
O lord God of my salvation, I have cried day and night before thee: 
Let my prayer come before thee: incline thine ear unto
604,f it please the king, and if I have favour in his sight, and the thing seem right before the king, and I be pleasing in his eyes, let it be written to reverse the letters devised by Haman the son of Hammedatha the Agagite, which he wrote to destroy the Jews which are in all the king's provinces: 
For how can I endure to see the evil that shall come unto my people? or how can I endure to see the destruction of my kindred? 
Then the king Ahasuerus said unto Esther the queen and to Mordecai the Jew, Behold, I have given Esther the house of Haman, and him they have hanged upon the gallows, because he 
613,art, and hast pleasure in uprightness. As for me, in the uprightness of mine heart I have willingly offered all these things: and now have I seen with joy thy people, which are present here, to offer willingly unto thee. 
O LORD God of Abraham, Isaac, and of Israel, our fathers, keep this for ever in the imagination of the thoughts of the heart of thy people, and prepare their heart unto thee: 
And give unto Solomon my son a perfect heart, to keep thy commandments, thy testimonies, and thy statutes, and to do all these things, and to build the palace, for the which I have made provision. 
And David said to
761,lt not let my people go, behold, I will send swarms of flies upon thee, and upon thy servants, and upon thy people, and into thy houses: and the houses of the Egyptians shall be full of swarms of flies, and also the ground whereon they are. 
And I will sever in that day the land of Goshen, in which my people dwell, that no swarms of flies shall be there; to the end thou mayest know that I am the LORD in the midst of the earth. 
And I will put a division between my people and thy people: to morrow shall this sign be. 
And the LORD did so; and there came a grievous swarm of flies into the house of Pharaoh, and into his servants' houses, and into all the land of Egypt: the land was corrupted by reason of the swarm of flies. 
And Pharaoh called for Moses 
806,he Jews had joy and gladness, a feast and a good day. And many of the people of the land became Jews; for the fear of the Jews fell upon them. 
Now in the twelfth month, that is, the month Adar, on the thirteenth day of the same, when the king's commandment and his decree drew near to be put in execution, in the day that the enemies of the Jews hoped to have power over them, (though it was turned to the contrary, that the Jews had rule over them that hated them;) 
The Jews gathered themselves together in their cities throughout all the provinces of the king Ahasuerus, to lay hand on such as sought their hurt: and no man could withstand them; for the fear of them fell upon all people. 
And all the rulers of the provinces, and the lieutenants, and the deputies, and officers of the king, helped the
717,he LORD hath given you the sabbath, therefore he giveth you on the sixth day the bread of two days; abide ye every man in his place, let no man go out of his place on the seventh day. 
So the people rested on the seventh day. 
And the house of Israel called the name thereof Manna: and it was like coriander seed, white; and the taste of it was like wafers made with honey. 
And Moses said, This is the thing which the LORD commandeth, Fill an omer of it to be kept for your generations; that they may see the bread wherewith I have fed you in the wilderness, when I brought you forth from the land of Egypt. 
And Moses said unto Aaron, Take a pot, and put an omer full of manna therein, and lay it up before the LORD
634,im to their face, to destroy them: he will not be slack to him that hateth him, he will repay him to his face. 
Thou shalt therefore keep the commandments, and the statutes, and the judgments, which I command thee this day, to do them. 
Wherefore it shall come to pass, if ye hearken to these judgments, and keep, and do them, that the LORD thy God shall keep unto thee the covenant and the mercy which he sware unto thy fathers: 
And he will love thee, and bless thee, and multiply thee: he will also bless the fruit of thy womb, and the fruit of thy land, thy corn, and thy wine, and thine oil, the increase of thy kine, and the flo
816, be the first row. 
And the second row shall be an emerald, a sapphire, and a diamond. 
And the third row a ligure, an agate, and an amethyst. 
And the fourth row a beryl, and an onyx, and a jasper: they shall be set in gold in their inclosings. 
And the stones shall be with the names of the children of Israel, twelve, according to their names, like the engravings of a signet; every one with his name shall they be according to the twelve tribes. 
And thou shalt make upon the breastplate chains at the ends of wreathen work of pure gold. 
And thou shalt make upon the breastplate two rings of gold, and shalt put the two rings on the two ends of the breastplate. 
And thou shalt put the two wreathen chains of gold in the two rings which are on the ends of the breastplate. 
And the other two ends of the two wre
832,our hope, or joy, or crown of rejoicing? Are not even ye in the presence of our Lord Jesus Christ at his coming? 
For ye are our glory and joy. 
Wherefore when we could no longer forbear, we thought it good to be left at Athens alone; 
And sent Timotheus, our brother, and minister of God, and our fellowlabourer in the gospel of Christ, to establish you, and to comfort you concerning your faith: 
That no man should be moved by these afflictions: for yourselves know that we are appointed thereunto. 
For verily, when we were with you, we told you before that we should suffer tribulation; even as it came to pass, and ye know. 
For this cause, when I could no longer forbear, I sent to know your faith, lest by some means the tempter have tempted you, and our labour be in vain. 
But now when Timotheus came from you unto us, and
770,men ought to work: in them therefore come and be healed, and not on the sabbath day. 
The Lord then answered him, and said, Thou hypocrite, doth not each one of you on the sabbath loose his ox or his ass from the stall, and lead him away to watering? 
And ought not this woman, being a daughter of Abraham, whom Satan hath bound, lo, these eighteen years, be loosed from this bond on the sabbath day? 
And when he had said these things, all his adversaries were ashamed: and all the people rejoiced for all the glorious things that were done by him. 
Then said he, Unto what is the kingdom of God like? and whereunto shall I resemble it? 
It is like a grain of mustard seed, which a man took, and cast into his garden; and it grew, and waxed a great tree; and the fowls 
687,ty and two. 
The men of Kirjathjearim, Chephirah, and Beeroth, seven hundred forty and three. 
The men of Ramah and Gaba, six hundred twenty and one. 
The men of Michmas, an hundred and twenty and two. 
The men of Bethel and Ai, an hundred twenty and three. 
The men of the other Nebo, fifty and two. 
The children of the other Elam, a thousand two hundred fifty and four. 
The children of Harim, three hundred and twenty. 
The children of Jericho, three hundred forty and five. 
The children of Lod, Hadid, and Ono, seven hundred twenty and one. 
The children of Senaah, three thousand nine hundred and thirty. 
The priests: the children of Jedaiah, of the house of Jeshua, nine hundred
704, in the land of Egypt, when we sat by the flesh pots, and when we did eat bread to the full; for ye have brought us forth into this wilderness, to kill this whole assembly with hunger. 
Then said the LORD unto Moses, Behold, I will rain bread from heaven for you; and the people shall go out and gather a certain rate every day, that I may prove them, whether they will walk in my law, or no. 
And it shall come to pass, that on the sixth day they shall prepare that which they bring in; and it shall be twice as much as they gather daily. 
And Moses and Aaron said unto all the children of Israel, At even, then ye shall know that the LORD hath brought you out from the land of Egypt: 
And in the mornin
689,he heaven, even the heavens, are the LORD's: but the earth hath he given to the children of men. 
The dead praise not the LORD, neither any that go down into silence. 
But we will bless the LORD from this time forth and for evermore. Praise the LORD. 
I love the LORD, because he hath heard my voice and my supplications. 
Because he hath inclined his ear unto me, therefore will I call upon him as long as I live. 
The sorrows of death compassed me, and the pains of hell gat hold upon me: I found trouble and sorrow. 
Then called I upon the name of the LORD; O LORD, I beseech thee, deliver my soul. 
Gracious is the LORD, and righteous; yea, our God is merciful. 
The LORD preserveth th
807,his place know him any more. 
Therefore I will not refrain my mouth; I will speak in the anguish of my spirit; I will complain in the bitterness of my soul. 
Am I a sea, or a whale, that thou settest a watch over me? 
When I say, My bed shall comfort me, my couch shall ease my complaints; 
Then thou scarest me with dreams, and terrifiest me through visions: 
So that my soul chooseth strangling, and death rather than my life. 
I loathe it; I would not live alway: let me alone; for my days are vanity. 
What is man, that thou shouldest magnify him? and that thou shouldest set thine heart upon him? 
And that thou shouldest visit him every morning, and try him every moment? 
How long wilt thou not depart from me, nor let me alone till I swallow down my spittle? 
I have sinned; what shall I do unto the
631,etain riches. 
The merciful man doeth good to his own soul: but he that is cruel troubleth his own flesh. 
The wicked worketh a deceitful work: but to him that soweth righteousness shall be a sure reward. 
As righteousness tendeth to life: so he that pursueth evil pursueth it to his own death. 
They that are of a froward heart are abomination to the LORD: but such as are upright in their way are his delight. 
Though hand join in hand, the wicked shall not be unpunished: but the seed of the righteous shall be delivered. 
As a jewel of gold in a swine's snout, so is a fair woman which is without discretion. 
The desire of the
626,ese are the ordinances of the altar in the day when they shall make it, to offer burnt offerings thereon, and to sprinkle blood thereon. 
And thou shalt give to the priests the Levites that be of the seed of Zadok, which approach unto me, to minister unto me, saith the Lord GOD, a young bullock for a sin offering. 
And thou shalt take of the blood thereof, and put it on the four horns of it, and on the four corners of the settle, and upon the border round about: thus shalt thou cleanse and purge it. 
Thou shalt take the bullock also of the sin offering, and he shall burn it in the appointed place of the house, without 
668,hall ye set up any image of stone in your land, to bow down unto it: for I am the LORD your God. 
Ye shall keep my sabbaths, and reverence my sanctuary: I am the LORD. 
If ye walk in my statutes, and keep my commandments, and do them; 
Then I will give you rain in due season, and the land shall yield her increase, and the trees of the field shall yield their fruit. 
And your threshing shall reach unto the vintage, and the vintage shall reach unto the sowing time: and ye shall eat your bread to the full, and dwell in your land safely. 
And I will give peace in the land, and ye shall lie down, and none shall make you afraid: and I will rid evil beasts out of the
758, the angel of the LORD, and Satan standing at his right hand to resist him. 
And the LORD said unto Satan, The LORD rebuke thee, O Satan; even the LORD that hath chosen Jerusalem rebuke thee: is not this a brand plucked out of the fire? 
Now Joshua was clothed with filthy garments, and stood before the angel. 
And he answered and spake unto those that stood before him, saying, Take away the filthy garments from him. And unto him he said, Behold, I have caused thine iniquity to pass from thee, and I will clothe thee with change of raiment. 
And I said, Let them set a fair mitre upon his head. So they set a fair mitre upon his head, and clothed him with garments. And the angel of the LORD stood by. 
And the angel of the LORD protested unto Joshua, sa
611, the city of David, until he had made an end of building his own house, and the house of the LORD, and the wall of Jerusalem round about. 
Only the people sacrificed in high places, because there was no house built unto the name of the LORD, until those days. 
And Solomon loved the LORD, walking in the statutes of David his father: only he sacrificed and burnt incense in high places. 
And the king went to Gibeon to sacrifice there; for that was the great high place: a thousand burnt offerings did Solomon offer upon that altar. 
In Gibeon the LORD appeared to Solomon in a dream by night: and God said, Ask
794,ice in time to come. 
She openeth her mouth with wisdom; and in her tongue is the law of kindness. 
She looketh well to the ways of her household, and eateth not the bread of idleness. 
Her children arise up, and call her blessed; her husband also, and he praiseth her. 
Many daughters have done virtuously, but thou excellest them all. 
Favour is deceitful, and beauty is vain: but a woman that feareth the LORD, she shall be praised. 
Give her of the fruit of her hands; and let her own works praise her in the gates. 
The words of the Preacher, the son of David, king in Jerusalem. 
Vanity of vanities, saith the Preacher, vanity of vanities; all is vanity. 
What profit hath a man of all his labour which he taketh under the sun? 
One generation passeth away, and another generation cometh:
678,, to consecrate and to sanctify them: but a stranger shall not eat thereof, because they are holy. 
And if ought of the flesh of the consecrations, or of the bread, remain unto the morning, then thou shalt burn the remainder with fire: it shall not be eaten, because it is holy. 
And thus shalt thou do unto Aaron, and to his sons, according to all things which I have commanded thee: seven days shalt thou consecrate them. 
And thou shalt offer every day a bullock for a sin offering for atonement: and thou shalt cleanse the altar, when thou hast made an atonement for it, and thou shalt anoint it, to sanctify it. 
Seven days thou shalt make an atonement for the altar, and s
767,stood not; things too wonderful for me, which I knew not. 
Hear, I beseech thee, and I will speak: I will demand of thee, and declare thou unto me. 
I have heard of thee by the hearing of the ear: but now mine eye seeth thee. 
Wherefore I abhor myself, and repent in dust and ashes. 
And it was so, that after the LORD had spoken these words unto Job, the LORD said to Eliphaz the Temanite, My wrath is kindled against thee, and against thy two friends: for ye have not spoken of me the thing that is right, as my servant Job hath. 
Therefore take unto you now seven bullocks and seven rams, and go to my servant Job, and offer up for yourselves a burnt offering; and my servant Job shall pray for you: for him will I accept: lest I deal with you after your folly, in
777,estroyed which was upon the face of the ground, both man, and cattle, and the creeping things, and the fowl of the heaven; and they were destroyed from the earth: and Noah only remained alive, and they that were with him in the ark. 
And the waters prevailed upon the earth an hundred and fifty days. 
And God remembered Noah, and every living thing, and all the cattle that was with him in the ark: and God made a wind to pass over the earth, and the waters asswaged; 
The fountains also of the deep and the windows of heaven were stopped, and the rain from heaven was restrained; 
And the waters returned from off the earth continually: and after the end of the hundred and fifty days the waters were abated. 
And the ark rested in the seventh month, on the seventeenth day o
618, surely: but he that perverteth his ways shall be known. 
He that winketh with the eye causeth sorrow: but a prating fool shall fall. 
The mouth of a righteous man is a well of life: but violence covereth the mouth of the wicked. 
Hatred stirreth up strifes: but love covereth all sins. 
In the lips of him that hath understanding wisdom is found: but a rod is for the back of him that is void of understanding. 
Wise men lay up knowledge: but the mouth of the foolish is near destruction. 
The rich man's wealth is his strong city: the destruction of the poor is their poverty. 
The labour of the righteous tendeth to
752, appoint. 
And the king went forth, and all his household after him. And the king left ten women, which were concubines, to keep the house. 
And the king went forth, and all the people after him, and tarried in a place that was far off. 
And all his servants passed on beside him; and all the Cherethites, and all the Pelethites, and all the Gittites, six hundred men which came after him from Gath, passed on before the king. 
Then said the king to Ittai the Gittite, Wherefore goest thou also with us? return to thy place, and abide with the king: for thou art a stranger, and also an exile. 
Whereas thou camest but yesterday, should I this day make thee go up and down with us? seeing I go whither I may, return thou, and take back thy brethren: me
839,ht against Jerusalem, 
He took counsel with his princes and his mighty men to stop the waters of the fountains which were without the city: and they did help him. 
So there was gathered much people together, who stopped all the fountains, and the brook that ran through the midst of the land, saying, Why should the kings of Assyria come, and find much water? 
Also he strengthened himself, and built up all the wall that was broken, and raised it up to the towers, and another wall without, and repaired Millo in the city of David, and made darts and shields in abundance. 
And he set captains of war over the people, and gathered them together to him in the street of the gate of the city, and spake comfortably to them, saying, 
Be strong and courageous, be not afraid nor dismayed for the king of Assyria, nor for all the multitude tha
606,n among four thousand, how many baskets full of fragments took ye up? And they said, Seven. 
And he said unto them, How is it that ye do not understand? 
And he cometh to Bethsaida; and they bring a blind man unto him, and besought him to touch him. 
And he took the blind man by the hand, and led him out of the town; and when he had spit on his eyes, and put his hands upon him, he asked him if he saw ought. 
And he looked up, and said, I see men as trees, walking. 
After that he put his hands again upon his eyes, and made him look up: and he was restored, and saw every man clearly. 
And he sent him 
642,s word unto Jeremiah from the LORD, saying, 
Thus saith the LORD to me; Make thee bonds and yokes, and put them upon thy neck, 
And send them to the king of Edom, and to the king of Moab, and to the king of the Ammonites, and to the king of Tyrus, and to the king of Zidon, by the hand of the messengers which come to Jerusalem unto Zedekiah king of Judah; 
And command them to say unto their masters, Thus saith the LORD of hosts, the God of Israel; Thus shall ye say unto your masters; 
I have made the earth, the man and the beast that are upon the ground, by my great power and by my outstretched arm, and have given it unto whom it seeme
839,as the woman is of the man, even so is the man also by the woman; but all things of God. 
Judge in yourselves: is it comely that a woman pray unto God uncovered? 
Doth not even nature itself teach you, that, if a man have long hair, it is a shame unto him? 
But if a woman have long hair, it is a glory to her: for her hair is given her for a covering. 
But if any man seem to be contentious, we have no such custom, neither the churches of God. 
Now in this that I declare unto you I praise you not, that ye come together not for the better, but for the worse. 
For first of all, when ye come together in the church, I hear that there be divisions among you; and I partly believe it. 
For there must be also heresies among you, that they which are approved may be made manifest among you. 
When ye come together therefore into one place, 
826,ainst Gibeah toward the sunrising. 
And there fell of Benjamin eighteen thousand men; all these were men of valour. 
And they turned and fled toward the wilderness unto the rock of Rimmon: and they gleaned of them in the highways five thousand men; and pursued hard after them unto Gidom, and slew two thousand men of them. 
So that all which fell that day of Benjamin were twenty and five thousand men that drew the sword; all these were men of valour. 
But six hundred men turned and fled to the wilderness unto the rock Rimmon, and abode in the rock Rimmon four months. 
And the men of Israel turned again upon the children of Benjamin, and smote them with the edge of the sword, as well the men of every city, as the beast, and all that came to hand: also they set on fire all the cities that they came to. 
Now the men of
771,rt of the king was merry with wine, he commanded Mehuman, Biztha, Harbona, Bigtha, and Abagtha, Zethar, and Carcas, the seven chamberlains that served in the presence of Ahasuerus the king, 
To bring Vashti the queen before the king with the crown royal, to shew the people and the princes her beauty: for she was fair to look on. 
But the queen Vashti refused to come at the king's commandment by his chamberlains: therefore was the king very wroth, and his anger burned in him. 
Then the king said to the wise men, which knew the times, (for so was the king's manner toward all that knew law and judgment: 
And the next unto him was Carshena, Shethar, Admatha, Tarshish, Meres, Marsena, and Memucan, the seven princes of Persia and Media, which saw the king's face, and
696, 
And James the son of Zebedee, and John the brother of James; and he surnamed them Boanerges, which is, The sons of thunder: 
And Andrew, and Philip, and Bartholomew, and Matthew, and Thomas, and James the son of Alphaeus, and Thaddaeus, and Simon the Canaanite, 
And Judas Iscariot, which also betrayed him: and they went into an house. 
And the multitude cometh together again, so that they could not so much as eat bread. 
And when his friends heard of it, they went out to lay hold on him: for they said, He is beside himself. 
And the scribes which came down from Jerusalem said, He hath Beelzebub, and by the prince of the devils casteth he out devils. 
And he called them unto him, and sa
686,e sheep of Bozrah, as the flock in the midst of their fold: they shall make great noise by reason of the multitude of men. 
The breaker is come up before them: they have broken up, and have passed through the gate, and are gone out by it: and their king shall pass before them, and the LORD on the head of them. 
And I said, Hear, I pray you, O heads of Jacob, and ye princes of the house of Israel; Is it not for you to know judgment? 
Who hate the good, and love the evil; who pluck off their skin from off them, and their flesh from off their bones; 
Who also eat the flesh of my people, and flay their skin from off them; and they break their bones, and chop them in pieces, as for 
601, ephah, and a just bath. 
The ephah and the bath shall be of one measure, that the bath may contain the tenth part of an homer, and the ephah the tenth part of an homer: the measure thereof shall be after the homer. 
And the shekel shall be twenty gerahs: twenty shekels, five and twenty shekels, fifteen shekels, shall be your maneh. 
This is the oblation that ye shall offer; the sixth part of an ephah of an homer of wheat, and ye shall give the sixth part of an ephah of an homer of barley: 
Concerning the ordinance of oil, the bath of oil, ye shall offer the tenth part of a bath out of the cor,
732,lo, he hath caught hold on the horns of the altar, saying, Let king Solomon swear unto me today that he will not slay his servant with the sword. 
And Solomon said, If he will shew himself a worthy man, there shall not an hair of him fall to the earth: but if wickedness shall be found in him, he shall die. 
So king Solomon sent, and they brought him down from the altar. And he came and bowed himself to king Solomon: and Solomon said unto him, Go to thine house. 
Now the days of David drew nigh that he should die; and he charged Solomon his son, saying, 
I go the way of all the earth: be thou strong therefore, and shew thyself a man; 
And keep the charge of the LORD thy God, to walk in his ways, to keep his statutes, and hi
720,Of the tribe of Naphtali, Nahbi the son of Vophsi. 
Of the tribe of Gad, Geuel the son of Machi. 
These are the names of the men which Moses sent to spy out the land. And Moses called Oshea the son of Nun Jehoshua. 
And Moses sent them to spy out the land of Canaan, and said unto them, Get you up this way southward, and go up into the mountain: 
And see the land, what it is, and the people that dwelleth therein, whether they be strong or weak, few or many; 
And what the land is that they dwell in, whether it be good or bad; and what cities they be that they dwell in, whether in tents, or in strong holds; 
And what the land is, whether it be fat or lean, whether there be wood therein, or not. And be ye of good c
630,e not far from me. 
Stir up thyself, and awake to my judgment, even unto my cause, my God and my Lord. 
Judge me, O LORD my God, according to thy righteousness; and let them not rejoice over me. 
Let them not say in their hearts, Ah, so would we have it: let them not say, We have swallowed him up. 
Let them be ashamed and brought to confusion together that rejoice at mine hurt: let them be clothed with shame and dishonour that magnify themselves against me. 
Let them shout for joy, and be glad, that favour my righteous cause: yea, let them say continually, Let the LORD be magnified, which hath pleasure in the prosperity of
568,son of Neriah, the son of Maaseiah, in the sight of Hanameel mine uncle's son, and in the presence of the witnesses that subscribed the book of the purchase, before all the Jews that sat in the court of the prison. 
And I charged Baruch before them, saying, 
Thus saith the LORD of hosts, the God of Israel; Take these evidences, this evidence of the purchase, both which is sealed, and this evidence which is open; and put them in an earthen vessel, that they may continue many days. 
For thus saith the LORD of hosts, the God of Israel; Houses and fields and vineyar
829, cords from us. 
He that sitteth in the heavens shall laugh: the LORD shall have them in derision. 
Then shall he speak unto them in his wrath, and vex them in his sore displeasure. 
Yet have I set my king upon my holy hill of Zion. 
I will declare the decree: the LORD hath said unto me, Thou art my Son; this day have I begotten thee. 
Ask of me, and I shall give thee the heathen for thine inheritance, and the uttermost parts of the earth for thy possession. 
Thou shalt break them with a rod of iron; thou shalt dash them in pieces like a potter's vessel. 
Be wise now therefore, O ye kings: be instructed, ye judges of the earth. 
Serve the LORD with fear, and rejoice with trembling. 
Kiss the Son, lest he be angry, and ye perish from the way, when his wrath is kindled but a little. Blessed are all they that put their t
616,he beasts of the forest, as a young lion among the flocks of sheep: who, if he go through, both treadeth down, and teareth in pieces, and none can deliver. 
Thine hand shall be lifted up upon thine adversaries, and all thine enemies shall be cut off. 
And it shall come to pass in that day, saith the LORD, that I will cut off thy horses out of the midst of thee, and I will destroy thy chariots: 
And I will cut off the cities of thy land, and throw down all thy strong holds: 
And I will cut off witchcrafts out of thine hand; and thou shalt have no more soothsayers: 
Thy graven images also will I cut off, and th
737, great and fenced up to heaven, 
A people great and tall, the children of the Anakims, whom thou knowest, and of whom thou hast heard say, Who can stand before the children of Anak! 
Understand therefore this day, that the LORD thy God is he which goeth over before thee; as a consuming fire he shall destroy them, and he shall bring them down before thy face: so shalt thou drive them out, and destroy them quickly, as the LORD hath said unto thee. 
Speak not thou in thine heart, after that the LORD thy God hath cast them out from before thee, saying, For my righteousness the LORD hath brought me in to possess this land: but for the wickedness of these nations the LORD doth drive them out from before thee. 
Not for thy righteousne
743,y servants whom I brought forth out of the land of Egypt: I am the LORD your God. 
Ye shall make you no idols nor graven image, neither rear you up a standing image, neither shall ye set up any image of stone in your land, to bow down unto it: for I am the LORD your God. 
Ye shall keep my sabbaths, and reverence my sanctuary: I am the LORD. 
If ye walk in my statutes, and keep my commandments, and do them; 
Then I will give you rain in due season, and the land shall yield her increase, and the trees of the field shall yield their fruit. 
And your threshing shall reach unto the vintage, and the vintage shall reach unto the sowing time: and ye shall eat your bread to the full, and dwell in your land safely. 
And I will give peace in th
598, that are earthy: and as is the heavenly, such are they also that are heavenly. 
And as we have borne the image of the earthy, we shall also bear the image of the heavenly. 
Now this I say, brethren, that flesh and blood cannot inherit the kingdom of God; neither doth corruption inherit incorruption. 
Behold, I shew you a mystery; We shall not all sleep, but we shall all be changed, 
In a moment, in the twinkling of an eye, at the last trump: for the trumpet shall sound, and the dead shall be raised incorruptible, and we shall be changed. 
For this corruptible must put on incorruption, and t
642,rth with fury, a continuing whirlwind: it shall fall with pain upon the head of the wicked. 
The fierce anger of the LORD shall not return, until he hath done it, and until he have performed the intents of his heart: in the latter days ye shall consider it. 
At the same time, saith the LORD, will I be the God of all the families of Israel, and they shall be my people. 
Thus saith the LORD, The people which were left of the sword found grace in the wilderness; even Israel, when I went to cause him to rest. 
The LORD hath appeared of old unto me, saying, Yea, I have loved thee with an everlasting love: therefore with lovingkindness have
593,e gospel of Jesus Christ, the Son of God; 
As it is written in the prophets, Behold, I send my messenger before thy face, which shall prepare thy way before thee. 
The voice of one crying in the wilderness, Prepare ye the way of the Lord, make his paths straight. 
John did baptize in the wilderness, and preach the baptism of repentance for the remission of sins. 
And there went out unto him all the land of Judaea, and they of Jerusalem, and were all baptized of him in the river of Jordan, confessing their sins. 
And John was clothed with camel's hair, and with a girdle of a skin about h
630,mocketh me. 
For since I spake, I cried out, I cried violence and spoil; because the word of the LORD was made a reproach unto me, and a derision, daily. 
Then I said, I will not make mention of him, nor speak any more in his name. But his word was in mine heart as a burning fire shut up in my bones, and I was weary with forbearing, and I could not stay. 
For I heard the defaming of many, fear on every side. Report, say they, and we will report it. All my familiars watched for my halting, saying, Peradventure he will be enticed, and we shall prevail against him, and we shall take our revenge on him. 
But the LORD is with m
801, 
Then shall they also answer him, saying, Lord, when saw we thee an hungred, or athirst, or a stranger, or naked, or sick, or in prison, and did not minister unto thee? 
Then shall he answer them, saying, Verily I say unto you, Inasmuch as ye did it not to one of the least of these, ye did it not to me. 
And these shall go away into everlasting punishment: but the righteous into life eternal. 
And it came to pass, when Jesus had finished all these sayings, he said unto his disciples, 
Ye know that after two days is the feast of the passover, and the Son of man is betrayed to be crucified. 
Then assembled together the chief priests, and the scribes, and the elders of the people, unto the palace of the high priest, who was called Caiaphas, 
And consulted that they might take Jesus by subtilt
808,es of the men that shall stand with you: of the tribe of Reuben; Elizur the son of Shedeur. 
Of Simeon; Shelumiel the son of Zurishaddai. 
Of Judah; Nahshon the son of Amminadab. 
Of Issachar; Nethaneel the son of Zuar. 
Of Zebulun; Eliab the son of Helon. 
Of the children of Joseph: of Ephraim; Elishama the son of Ammihud: of Manasseh; Gamaliel the son of Pedahzur. 
Of Benjamin; Abidan the son of Gideoni. 
Of Dan; Ahiezer the son of Ammishaddai. 
Of Asher; Pagiel the son of Ocran. 
Of Gad; Eliasaph the son of Deuel. 
Of Naphtali; Ahira the son of Enan. 
These were the renowned of the congregation, princes of the tribes of their fathers, heads of thousands in Israel. 
And Moses and Aaron took these men which are expressed by their names: 
And they assembled all the congregation together on the fir
785,sometimes darkness, but now are ye light in the Lord: walk as children of light: 
(For the fruit of the Spirit is in all goodness and righteousness and truth;) 
Proving what is acceptable unto the Lord. 
And have no fellowship with the unfruitful works of darkness, but rather reprove them. 
For it is a shame even to speak of those things which are done of them in secret. 
But all things that are reproved are made manifest by the light: for whatsoever doth make manifest is light. 
Wherefore he saith, Awake thou that sleepest, and arise from the dead, and Christ shall give thee light. 
See then that ye walk circumspectly, not as fools, but as wise, 
Redeeming the time, because the days are evil. 
Wherefore be ye not unwise, but understanding what the will of the Lord is. 
And 
789,clean thing: for the child shall be a Nazarite to God from the womb to the day of his death. 
Then Manoah intreated the LORD, and said, O my Lord, let the man of God which thou didst send come again unto us, and teach us what we shall do unto the child that shall be born. 
And God hearkened to the voice of Manoah; and the angel of God came again unto the woman as she sat in the field: but Manoah her husband was not with her. 
And the woman made haste, and ran, and shewed her husband, and said unto him, Behold, the man hath appeared unto me, that came unto me the other day. 
And Manoah arose, and went after his wife, and came to the man, and said unto him, Art thou the man that spakest unto the woman? And he said, I am. 
And Manoah said, Now let thy words come to pass. How shall 
809, the face. 
And Joash king of Israel sent to Amaziah king of Judah, saying, The thistle that was in Lebanon sent to the cedar that was in Lebanon, saying, Give thy daughter to my son to wife: and there passed by a wild beast that was in Lebanon, and trode down the thistle. 
Thou sayest, Lo, thou hast smitten the Edomites; and thine heart lifteth thee up to boast: abide now at home; why shouldest thou meddle to thine hurt, that thou shouldest fall, even thou, and Judah with thee? 
But Amaziah would not hear; for it came of God, that he might deliver them into the hand of their enemies, because they sought after the gods of Edom. 
So Joash the king of Israel went up; and they saw one another in the face, both he and Amaziah king of Judah, at Bethshemesh, which belongeth to Judah. 
And Judah was put t
650,e the new cart. 
And they brought it out of the house of Abinadab which was at Gibeah, accompanying the ark of God: and Ahio went before the ark. 
And David and all the house of Israel played before the LORD on all manner of instruments made of fir wood, even on harps, and on psalteries, and on timbrels, and on cornets, and on cymbals. 
And when they came to Nachon's threshingfloor, Uzzah put forth his hand to the ark of God, and took hold of it; for the oxen shook it. 
And the anger of the LORD was kindled against Uzzah; and God smote him there for his error; and there he died by the ark of God. 
And David was displeased, because the LORD ha
755,g this day. 
And as David and his men went by the way, Shimei went along on the hill's side over against him, and cursed as he went, and threw stones at him, and cast dust. 
And the king, and all the people that were with him, came weary, and refreshed themselves there. 
And Absalom, and all the people the men of Israel, came to Jerusalem, and Ahithophel with him. 
And it came to pass, when Hushai the Archite, David's friend, was come unto Absalom, that Hushai said unto Absalom, God save the king, God save the king. 
And Absalom said to Hushai, Is this thy kindness to thy friend? why wentest thou not with thy friend? 
And Hushai said unto Absalom, Nay; but whom the LORD, and this people, and all the men of Israel, choose, his will I be, and with
570,h trodden the virgin, the daughter of Judah, as in a winepress. 
For these things I weep; mine eye, mine eye runneth down with water, because the comforter that should relieve my soul is far from me: my children are desolate, because the enemy prevailed. 
Zion spreadeth forth her hands, and there is none to comfort her: the LORD hath commanded concerning Jacob, that his adversaries should be round about him: Jerusalem is as a menstruous woman among them. 
The LORD is righteous; for I have rebelled against his commandment: hear, I pray you, all people, and behold m
567, Hatita, the children of Shobai, in all an hundred thirty and nine. 
The Nethinims: the children of Ziha, the children of Hasupha, the children of Tabbaoth, 
The children of Keros, the children of Siaha, the children of Padon, 
The children of Lebanah, the children of Hagabah, the children of Akkub, 
The children of Hagab, the children of Shalmai, the children of Hanan, 
The children of Giddel, the children of Gahar, the children of Reaiah, 
The children of Rezin, the children of Nekoda, the children of Gazzam, 
The children of Uzza, the children of Paseah, the
607,saved from your enemies. 
Also in the day of your gladness, and in your solemn days, and in the beginnings of your months, ye shall blow with the trumpets over your burnt offerings, and over the sacrifices of your peace offerings; that they may be to you for a memorial before your God: I am the LORD your God. 
And it came to pass on the twentieth day of the second month, in the second year, that the cloud was taken up from off the tabernacle of the testimony. 
And the children of Israel took their journeys out of the wilderness of Sinai; and the cloud rested in the wilderness of Paran. 
And they firs
646,the twelve patriarchs. 
And the patriarchs, moved with envy, sold Joseph into Egypt: but God was with him, 
And delivered him out of all his afflictions, and gave him favour and wisdom in the sight of Pharaoh king of Egypt; and he made him governor over Egypt and all his house. 
Now there came a dearth over all the land of Egypt and Chanaan, and great affliction: and our fathers found no sustenance. 
But when Jacob heard that there was corn in Egypt, he sent out our fathers first. 
And at the second time Joseph was made known to his brethren; and Joseph's kindred was made known unto Pharaoh. 
Then sent Joseph, and called his father Jacob 
651,he Lord stood by him, and said, Be of good cheer, Paul: for as thou hast testified of me in Jerusalem, so must thou bear witness also at Rome. 
And when it was day, certain of the Jews banded together, and bound themselves under a curse, saying that they would neither eat nor drink till they had killed Paul. 
And they were more than forty which had made this conspiracy. 
And they came to the chief priests and elders, and said, We have bound ourselves under a great curse, that we will eat nothing until we have slain Paul. 
Now therefore ye with the council signify to the chief captain that he bring him down unto you to morrow, as though ye woul
617,nd against the wall of the house he built chambers round about, against the walls of the house round about, both of the temple and of the oracle: and he made chambers round about: 
The nethermost chamber was five cubits broad, and the middle was six cubits broad, and the third was seven cubits broad: for without in the wall of the house he made narrowed rests round about, that the beams should not be fastened in the walls of the house. 
And the house, when it was in building, was built of stone made ready before it was brought thither: so that there was neither hammer nor axe nor any tool of iron heard in the 
686,peace from the earth, and that they should kill one another: and there was given unto him a great sword. 
And when he had opened the third seal, I heard the third beast say, Come and see. And I beheld, and lo a black horse; and he that sat on him had a pair of balances in his hand. 
And I heard a voice in the midst of the four beasts say, A measure of wheat for a penny, and three measures of barley for a penny; and see thou hurt not the oil and the wine. 
And when he had opened the fourth seal, I heard the voice of the fourth beast say, Come and see. 
And I looked, and behold a pale horse: and his name that sat on him was Death, and Hell followed with him. And power was given u
642,aoh well, and his servants. 
And Pharaoh said unto Joseph, Say unto thy brethren, This do ye; lade your beasts, and go, get you unto the land of Canaan; 
And take your father and your households, and come unto me: and I will give you the good of the land of Egypt, and ye shall eat the fat of the land. 
Now thou art commanded, this do ye; take you wagons out of the land of Egypt for your little ones, and for your wives, and bring your father, and come. 
Also regard not your stuff; for the good of all the land of Egypt is your's. 
And the children of Israel did so: and Joseph gave them wagons, according to the commandment of Pharaoh, an
701,well of water; and it shall come to pass, that when the virgin cometh forth to draw water, and I say to her, Give me, I pray thee, a little water of thy pitcher to drink; 
And she say to me, Both drink thou, and I will also draw for thy camels: let the same be the woman whom the LORD hath appointed out for my master's son. 
And before I had done speaking in mine heart, behold, Rebekah came forth with her pitcher on her shoulder; and she went down unto the well, and drew water: and I said unto her, Let me drink, I pray thee. 
And she made haste, and let down her pitcher from her shoulder, and said, Drink, and I will give thy camels drink also: so I drank, and she made the camels drink also. 
A
647,t. 
But I wrought for my name's sake, that it should not be polluted before the heathen, among whom they were, in whose sight I made myself known unto them, in bringing them forth out of the land of Egypt. 
Wherefore I caused them to go forth out of the land of Egypt, and brought them into the wilderness. 
And I gave them my statutes, and shewed them my judgments, which if a man do, he shall even live in them. 
Moreover also I gave them my sabbaths, to be a sign between me and them, that they might know that I am the LORD that sanctify them. 
But the house of Israel rebelled against me in the wilderness: they walked not in my statutes, and
653,because, I say, that ye are come to remembrance, ye shall be taken with the hand. 
And thou, profane wicked prince of Israel, whose day is come, when iniquity shall have an end, 
Thus saith the Lord GOD; Remove the diadem, and take off the crown: this shall not be the same: exalt him that is low, and abase him that is high. 
I will overturn, overturn, overturn, it: and it shall be no more, until he come whose right it is; and I will give it him. 
And thou, son of man, prophesy and say, Thus saith the Lord GOD concerning the Ammonites, and concerning their reproach; even say thou, The sword, the sword is drawn: for the slaughter it is furbished, 
642,sons of thy father's house. 
Abide thou with me, fear not: for he that seeketh my life seeketh thy life: but with me thou shalt be in safeguard. 
Then they told David, saying, Behold, the Philistines fight against Keilah, and they rob the threshingfloors. 
Therefore David enquired of the LORD, saying, Shall I go and smite these Philistines? And the LORD said unto David, Go, and smite the Philistines, and save Keilah. 
And David's men said unto him, Behold, we be afraid here in Judah: how much more then if we come to Keilah against the armies of the Philistines? 
Then David enquired of the LORD yet again. And the LORD answered him and 
672, supplications, O LORD. 
O GOD the Lord, the strength of my salvation, thou hast covered my head in the day of battle. 
Grant not, O LORD, the desires of the wicked: further not his wicked device; lest they exalt themselves. Selah. 
As for the head of those that compass me about, let the mischief of their own lips cover them. 
Let burning coals fall upon them: let them be cast into the fire; into deep pits, that they rise not up again. 
Let not an evil speaker be established in the earth: evil shall hunt the violent man to overthrow him. 
I know that the LORD will maintain the cause of the afflicted, and the right of the poor. 
Surely the righteous shall give than
675,rd, saith the LORD. 
Thus saith the LORD of hosts, Behold, evil shall go forth from nation to nation, and a great whirlwind shall be raised up from the coasts of the earth. 
And the slain of the LORD shall be at that day from one end of the earth even unto the other end of the earth: they shall not be lamented, neither gathered, nor buried; they shall be dung upon the ground. 
Howl, ye shepherds, and cry; and wallow yourselves in the ashes, ye principal of the flock: for the days of your slaughter and of your dispersions are accomplished; and ye shall fall like a pleasant vessel. 
And the shepherds shall have no way to flee, nor the principal of the flock to escape. 
614, border of the children of Ammon; 
The plain also, and Jordan, and the coast thereof, from Chinnereth even unto the sea of the plain, even the salt sea, under Ashdothpisgah eastward. 
And I commanded you at that time, saying, The LORD your God hath given you this land to possess it: ye shall pass over armed before your brethren the children of Israel, all that are meet for the war. 
But your wives, and your little ones, and your cattle, (for I know that ye have much cattle,) shall abide in your cities which I have given you; 
Until the LORD have given rest unto your brethren, as well as unto you, and until 
703,ureth them out upon the face of the earth: The LORD is his name: 
That strengtheneth the spoiled against the strong, so that the spoiled shall come against the fortress. 
They hate him that rebuketh in the gate, and they abhor him that speaketh uprightly. 
Forasmuch therefore as your treading is upon the poor, and ye take from him burdens of wheat: ye have built houses of hewn stone, but ye shall not dwell in them; ye have planted pleasant vineyards, but ye shall not drink wine of them. 
For I know your manifold transgressions and your mighty sins: they afflict the just, they take a bribe, and they turn aside the poor in the gate from their right. 
Therefore the prudent shall keep silence in th
737,ave heard a cry of destruction. 
Flee, save your lives, and be like the heath in the wilderness. 
For because thou hast trusted in thy works and in thy treasures, thou shalt also be taken: and Chemosh shall go forth into captivity with his priests and his princes together. 
And the spoiler shall come upon every city, and no city shall escape: the valley also shall perish, and the plain shall be destroyed, as the LORD hath spoken. 
Give wings unto Moab, that it may flee and get away: for the cities thereof shall be desolate, without any to dwell therein. 
Cursed be he that doeth the work of the LORD deceitfully, and cursed be he that keepeth back his sword from blood. 
Moab hath been at ease from his youth, and he hath settled o
657,, and to baldness, and to girding with sackcloth: 
And behold joy and gladness, slaying oxen, and killing sheep, eating flesh, and drinking wine: let us eat and drink; for to morrow we shall die. 
And it was revealed in mine ears by the LORD of hosts, Surely this iniquity shall not be purged from you till ye die, saith the Lord GOD of hosts. 
Thus saith the Lord GOD of hosts, Go, get thee unto this treasurer, even unto Shebna, which is over the house, and say, 
What hast thou here? and whom hast thou here, that thou hast hewed thee out a sepulchre here, as he that heweth him out a sepulchre on high, and that graveth an habitation for himself in a ro
578,' houses: The sons of Reuben the firstborn of Israel; Hanoch, and Pallu, Hezron, and Carmi: these be the families of Reuben. 
And the sons of Simeon; Jemuel, and Jamin, and Ohad, and Jachin, and Zohar, and Shaul the son of a Canaanitish woman: these are the families of Simeon. 
And these are the names of the sons of Levi according to their generations; Gershon, and Kohath, and Merari: and the years of the life of Levi were an hundred thirty and seven years. 
The sons of Gershon; Libni, and Shimi, according to their families. 
And the sons of Kohath; Amram, and Izhar, and 
699,tward sanctuary which looketh toward the east; and it was shut. 
Then said the LORD unto me; This gate shall be shut, it shall not be opened, and no man shall enter in by it; because the LORD, the God of Israel, hath entered in by it, therefore it shall be shut. 
It is for the prince; the prince, he shall sit in it to eat bread before the LORD; he shall enter by the way of the porch of that gate, and shall go out by the way of the same. 
Then brought he me the way of the north gate before the house: and I looked, and, behold, the glory of the LORD filled the house of the LORD: and I fell upon my face. 
And the LORD said unto me, Son of man, mark well, and behold with thine eyes, and hear wi
710,y God is in thee; and there is none else, there is no God. 
Verily thou art a God that hidest thyself, O God of Israel, the Saviour. 
They shall be ashamed, and also confounded, all of them: they shall go to confusion together that are makers of idols. 
But Israel shall be saved in the LORD with an everlasting salvation: ye shall not be ashamed nor confounded world without end. 
For thus saith the LORD that created the heavens; God himself that formed the earth and made it; he hath established it, he created it not in vain, he formed it to be inhabited: I am the LORD; and there is none else. 
I have not spoken in secret, in a dark place of the earth: I said not unto the seed of Jacob, Seek ye me in va
684,cup from me: nevertheless not what I will, but what thou wilt. 
And he cometh, and findeth them sleeping, and saith unto Peter, Simon, sleepest thou? couldest not thou watch one hour? 
Watch ye and pray, lest ye enter into temptation. The spirit truly is ready, but the flesh is weak. 
And again he went away, and prayed, and spake the same words. 
And when he returned, he found them asleep again, (for their eyes were heavy,) neither wist they what to answer him. 
And he cometh the third time, and saith unto them, Sleep on now, and take your rest: it is enough, the hour is come; behold, the Son of man is betrayed into the hands of sinners. 
Rise up, let us go; lo, he that betra
811, to know the mysteries of the kingdom of God: but to others in parables; that seeing they might not see, and hearing they might not understand. 
Now the parable is this: The seed is the word of God. 
Those by the way side are they that hear; then cometh the devil, and taketh away the word out of their hearts, lest they should believe and be saved. 
They on the rock are they, which, when they hear, receive the word with joy; and these have no root, which for a while believe, and in time of temptation fall away. 
And that which fell among thorns are they, which, when they have heard, go forth, and are choked with cares and riches and pleasures of this life, and bring no fruit to perfection. 
But that on the good ground are they, which in an honest and good heart, having heard the word, keep it, and bri
718, songs in the house of my pilgrimage. 
I have remembered thy name, O LORD, in the night, and have kept thy law. 
This I had, because I kept thy precepts. 
Thou art my portion, O LORD: I have said that I would keep thy words. 
I intreated thy favour with my whole heart: be merciful unto me according to thy word. 
I thought on my ways, and turned my feet unto thy testimonies. 
I made haste, and delayed not to keep thy commandments. 
The bands of the wicked have robbed me: but I have not forgotten thy law. 
At midnight I will rise to give thanks unto thee because of thy righteous judgments. 
I am a companion of all them that fear thee, and of them that keep thy precepts. 
The earth, O LORD, is full of thy mercy:
773,n field: for I have spoken it, saith the Lord GOD. 
And I will send a fire on Magog, and among them that dwell carelessly in the isles: and they shall know that I am the LORD. 
So will I make my holy name known in the midst of my people Israel; and I will not let them pollute my holy name any more: and the heathen shall know that I am the LORD, the Holy One in Israel. 
Behold, it is come, and it is done, saith the Lord GOD; this is the day whereof I have spoken. 
And they that dwell in the cities of Israel shall go forth, and shall set on fire and burn the weapons, both the shields and the bucklers, the bows and the arrows, and the handstaves, and the spears, and they shall burn them with fire seven years: 
So that they shall take no wood out of the field, neithe
622,ng, So did David, and so will be his manner all the while he dwelleth in the country of the Philistines. 
And Achish believed David, saying, He hath made his people Israel utterly to abhor him; therefore he shall be my servant for ever. 
And it came to pass in those days, that the Philistines gathered their armies together for warfare, to fight with Israel. And Achish said unto David, Know thou assuredly, that thou shalt go out with me to battle, thou and thy men. 
And David said to Achish, Surely thou shalt know what thy servant can do. And Achish said to David, Therefore will I make thee keeper of mine head for e
679,God: that which is with the Almighty will I not conceal. 
Behold, all ye yourselves have seen it; why then are ye thus altogether vain? 
This is the portion of a wicked man with God, and the heritage of oppressors, which they shall receive of the Almighty. 
If his children be multiplied, it is for the sword: and his offspring shall not be satisfied with bread. 
Those that remain of him shall be buried in death: and his widows shall not weep. 
Though he heap up silver as the dust, and prepare raiment as the clay; 
He may prepare it, but the just shall put it on, and the innocent shall divide the silver. 
He buildeth his house as a moth, and as a booth that the keeper make
592,tual, but that which is natural; and afterward that which is spiritual. 
The first man is of the earth, earthy; the second man is the Lord from heaven. 
As is the earthy, such are they also that are earthy: and as is the heavenly, such are they also that are heavenly. 
And as we have borne the image of the earthy, we shall also bear the image of the heavenly. 
Now this I say, brethren, that flesh and blood cannot inherit the kingdom of God; neither doth corruption inherit incorruption. 
Behold, I shew you a mystery; We shall not all sleep, but we shall all be changed, 
In a moment, in 
719,the way of the Lord; and being fervent in the spirit, he spake and taught diligently the things of the Lord, knowing only the baptism of John. 
And he began to speak boldly in the synagogue: whom when Aquila and Priscilla had heard, they took him unto them, and expounded unto him the way of God more perfectly. 
And when he was disposed to pass into Achaia, the brethren wrote, exhorting the disciples to receive him: who, when he was come, helped them much which had believed through grace: 
For he mightily convinced the Jews, and that publickly, shewing by the scriptures that Jesus was Christ. 
And it came to pass, that, while Apollos was at Corinth, Paul having passed through the upper coasts came to Ephesus: a
836,f Israel. 
And Moses numbered, as the LORD commanded him, all the firstborn among the children of Israel. 
And all the firstborn males by the number of names, from a month old and upward, of those that were numbered of them, were twenty and two thousand two hundred and threescore and thirteen. 
And the LORD spake unto Moses, saying, 
Take the Levites instead of all the firstborn among the children of Israel, and the cattle of the Levites instead of their cattle; and the Levites shall be mine: I am the LORD. 
And for those that are to be redeemed of the two hundred and threescore and thirteen of the firstborn of the children of Israel, which are more than the Levites; 
Thou shalt even take five shekels apiece by the poll, after the shekel of the sanctuary shalt thou take them: (the shekel is twenty gerahs:) 
And thou shalt gi
702, know the paths to the house thereof? 
Knowest thou it, because thou wast then born? or because the number of thy days is great? 
Hast thou entered into the treasures of the snow? or hast thou seen the treasures of the hail, 
Which I have reserved against the time of trouble, against the day of battle and war? 
By what way is the light parted, which scattereth the east wind upon the earth? 
Who hath divided a watercourse for the overflowing of waters, or a way for the lightning of thunder; 
To cause it to rain on the earth, where no man is; on the wilderness, wherein there is no man; 
To satisfy the desolate and waste ground; and to cause the bud of the tender herb to spring forth? 
Hath the r
681,on of the children of Israel assembled together at Shiloh, and set up the tabernacle of the congregation there. And the land was subdued before them. 
And there remained among the children of Israel seven tribes, which had not yet received their inheritance. 
And Joshua said unto the children of Israel, How long are ye slack to go to possess the land, which the LORD God of your fathers hath given you? 
Give out from among you three men for each tribe: and I will send them, and they shall rise, and go through the land, and describe it according to the inheritance of them; and they shall come again to me. 
And they shall divide it into seven parts: Judah shall abide in their
813,ise her, because they have seen her nakedness: yea, she sigheth, and turneth backward. 
Her filthiness is in her skirts; she remembereth not her last end; therefore she came down wonderfully: she had no comforter. O LORD, behold my affliction: for the enemy hath magnified himself. 
The adversary hath spread out his hand upon all her pleasant things: for she hath seen that the heathen entered into her sanctuary, whom thou didst command that they should not enter into thy congregation. 
All her people sigh, they seek bread; they have given their pleasant things for meat to relieve the soul: see, O LORD, and consider; for I am become vile. 
Is it nothing to you, all ye that pass by? behold, and see if there be any sorrow like unto my sorrow, which is done unto me, wherewith the LORD hath afflicted me in t
788,rds and oliveyards which ye planted not do ye eat. 
Now therefore fear the LORD, and serve him in sincerity and in truth: and put away the gods which your fathers served on the other side of the flood, and in Egypt; and serve ye the LORD. 
And if it seem evil unto you to serve the LORD, choose you this day whom ye will serve; whether the gods which your fathers served that were on the other side of the flood, or the gods of the Amorites, in whose land ye dwell: but as for me and my house, we will serve the LORD. 
And the people answered and said, God forbid that we should forsake the LORD, to serve other gods; 
For the LORD our God, he it is that brought us up and our fathers out of the land of Egypt, from the house of bondage, and which did those great signs in our sight, and 
803,mmer; which when he that looketh upon it seeth, while it is yet in his hand he eateth it up. 
In that day shall the LORD of hosts be for a crown of glory, and for a diadem of beauty, unto the residue of his people, 
And for a spirit of judgment to him that sitteth in judgment, and for strength to them that turn the battle to the gate. 
But they also have erred through wine, and through strong drink are out of the way; the priest and the prophet have erred through strong drink, they are swallowed up of wine, they are out of the way through strong drink; they err in vision, they stumble in judgment. 
For all tables are full of vomit and filthiness, so that there is no place clean. 
Whom shall he teach knowledge? and whom shall he make to understand doctrine? them that are weaned from the milk, 
782,ty, dominion and power, both now and ever. Amen. 
The Revelation of Jesus Christ, which God gave unto him, to shew unto his servants things which must shortly come to pass; and he sent and signified it by his angel unto his servant John: 
Who bare record of the word of God, and of the testimony of Jesus Christ, and of all things that he saw. 
Blessed is he that readeth, and they that hear the words of this prophecy, and keep those things which are written therein: for the time is at hand. 
John to the seven churches which are in Asia: Grace be unto you, and peace, from him which is, and which was, and which is to come; and from the seven Spirits which are before his throne; 
And from Jesus Christ, who is the faithful witness, and the first begotten of the dead, and the pr
684, are wise to do evil, but to do good they have no knowledge. 
I beheld the earth, and, lo, it was without form, and void; and the heavens, and they had no light. 
I beheld the mountains, and, lo, they trembled, and all the hills moved lightly. 
I beheld, and, lo, there was no man, and all the birds of the heavens were fled. 
I beheld, and, lo, the fruitful place was a wilderness, and all the cities thereof were broken down at the presence of the LORD, and by his fierce anger. 
For thus hath the LORD said, The whole land shall be desolate; yet will I not make a full end. 
For this shall the earth mourn, and the heavens above be black; because I have spoken it, I have purposed 
792,Egypt; and the famine shall consume the land; 
And the plenty shall not be known in the land by reason of that famine following; for it shall be very grievous. 
And for that the dream was doubled unto Pharaoh twice; it is because the thing is established by God, and God will shortly bring it to pass. 
Now therefore let Pharaoh look out a man discreet and wise, and set him over the land of Egypt. 
Let Pharaoh do this, and let him appoint officers over the land, and take up the fifth part of the land of Egypt in the seven plenteous years. 
And let them gather all the food of those good years that come, and lay up corn under the hand of Pharaoh, and let them keep food in the cities. 
And that food shall be for store to the land against the seven years of famine, which shall be in the 
831,cause it is the stumblingblock of their iniquity. 
As for the beauty of his ornament, he set it in majesty: but they made the images of their abominations and of their detestable things therein: therefore have I set it far from them. 
And I will give it into the hands of the strangers for a prey, and to the wicked of the earth for a spoil; and they shall pollute it. 
My face will I turn also from them, and they shall pollute my secret place: for the robbers shall enter into it, and defile it. 
Make a chain: for the land is full of bloody crimes, and the city is full of violence. 
Wherefore I will bring the worst of the heathen, and they shall possess their houses: I will also make the pomp of the strong to cease; and their holy places shall be defiled. 
Destruction cometh; and they shall seek peace, and there shall be n
608, chariot of asses, and a chariot of camels; and he hearkened diligently with much heed: 
And he cried, A lion: My lord, I stand continually upon the watchtower in the daytime, and I am set in my ward whole nights: 
And, behold, here cometh a chariot of men, with a couple of horsemen. And he answered and said, Babylon is fallen, is fallen; and all the graven images of her gods he hath broken unto the ground. 
O my threshing, and the corn of my floor: that which I have heard of the LORD of hosts, the God of Israel, have I declared unto you. 
The burden of Dumah. He calleth to me out of Seir, Watchman, w
756,RD, Ye shall not go up, nor fight against your brethren: return every man to his house: for this thing is done of me. And they obeyed the words of the LORD, and returned from going against Jeroboam. 
And Rehoboam dwelt in Jerusalem, and built cities for defence in Judah. 
He built even Bethlehem, and Etam, and Tekoa, 
And Bethzur, and Shoco, and Adullam, 
And Gath, and Mareshah, and Ziph, 
And Adoraim, and Lachish, and Azekah, 
And Zorah, and Aijalon, and Hebron, which are in Judah and in Benjamin fenced cities. 
And he fortified the strong holds, and put captains in them, and store of victual, and of oil and wine. 
And in every several city he put shields and spears, and made them exceeding strong, having Judah and Benjamin on his side. 
And the
630, upon thine head. 
Thus wast thou decked with gold and silver; and thy raiment was of fine linen, and silk, and broidered work; thou didst eat fine flour, and honey, and oil: and thou wast exceeding beautiful, and thou didst prosper into a kingdom. 
And thy renown went forth among the heathen for thy beauty: for it was perfect through my comeliness, which I had put upon thee, saith the Lord GOD. 
But thou didst trust in thine own beauty, and playedst the harlot because of thy renown, and pouredst out thy fornications on every one that passed by; his it was. 
And of thy garments thou didst take, and deckedst thy high places
656,uld there be wrath against the realm of the king and his sons? 
Also we certify you, that touching any of the priests and Levites, singers, porters, Nethinims, or ministers of this house of God, it shall not be lawful to impose toll, tribute, or custom, upon them. 
And thou, Ezra, after the wisdom of thy God, that is in thine hand, set magistrates and judges, which may judge all the people that are beyond the river, all such as know the laws of thy God; and teach ye them that know them not. 
And whosoever will not do the law of thy God, and the law of the king, let judgment be executed speedily upon him, whether it be unto death, or to banishment, 
791,d tread down the wicked in their place. 
Hide them in the dust together; and bind their faces in secret. 
Then will I also confess unto thee that thine own right hand can save thee. 
Behold now behemoth, which I made with thee; he eateth grass as an ox. 
Lo now, his strength is in his loins, and his force is in the navel of his belly. 
He moveth his tail like a cedar: the sinews of his stones are wrapped together. 
His bones are as strong pieces of brass; his bones are like bars of iron. 
He is the chief of the ways of God: he that made him can make his sword to approach unto him. 
Surely the mountains bring him forth food, where all the beasts of the field play. 
He lieth under the shady trees, in the covert of the reed, and fens. 
The shady trees cover him with their shadow; the
776,ORD, was consumed. 
And, behold, ye are risen up in your fathers' stead, an increase of sinful men, to augment yet the fierce anger of the LORD toward Israel. 
For if ye turn away from after him, he will yet again leave them in the wilderness; and ye shall destroy all this people. 
And they came near unto him, and said, We will build sheepfolds here for our cattle, and cities for our little ones: 
But we ourselves will go ready armed before the children of Israel, until we have brought them unto their place: and our little ones shall dwell in the fenced cities because of the inhabitants of the land. 
We will not return unto our houses, until the children of Israel have inherited every man his inheritance. 
For we will not inherit with them on yonder side Jordan, or 
713,m, who hath not left destitute my master of his mercy and his truth: I being in the way, the LORD led me to the house of my master's brethren. 
And the damsel ran, and told them of her mother's house these things. 
And Rebekah had a brother, and his name was Laban: and Laban ran out unto the man, unto the well. 
And it came to pass, when he saw the earring and bracelets upon his sister's hands, and when he heard the words of Rebekah his sister, saying, Thus spake the man unto me; that he came unto the man; and, behold, he stood by the camels at the well. 
And he said, Come in, thou blessed of the LORD; wherefore standest thou without? for I have prepared the house, and room for the camels. 
And the man c
731,him rest. 
Therefore he said unto Judah, Let us build these cities, and make about them walls, and towers, gates, and bars, while the land is yet before us; because we have sought the LORD our God, we have sought him, and he hath given us rest on every side. So they built and prospered. 
And Asa had an army of men that bare targets and spears, out of Judah three hundred thousand; and out of Benjamin, that bare shields and drew bows, two hundred and fourscore thousand: all these were mighty men of valour. 
And there came out against them Zerah the Ethiopian with an host of a thousand thousand, and three hundred chariots; and came unto Mareshah. 
Then Asa went out against him, and they set the battle in array in the valley 
799, Pharaoh: for with a strong hand shall he let them go, and with a strong hand shall he drive them out of his land. 
And God spake unto Moses, and said unto him, I am the LORD: 
And I appeared unto Abraham, unto Isaac, and unto Jacob, by the name of God Almighty, but by my name JEHOVAH was I not known to them. 
And I have also established my covenant with them, to give them the land of Canaan, the land of their pilgrimage, wherein they were strangers. 
And I have also heard the groaning of the children of Israel, whom the Egyptians keep in bondage; and I have remembered my covenant. 
Wherefore say unto the children of Israel, I am the LORD, and I will bring you out from under the burdens of the Egyptians, and I will rid you out of their bondage, and I will redeem you with a stretched out a
736,set light by father and mother: in the midst of thee have they dealt by oppression with the stranger: in thee have they vexed the fatherless and the widow. 
Thou hast despised mine holy things, and hast profaned my sabbaths. 
In thee are men that carry tales to shed blood: and in thee they eat upon the mountains: in the midst of thee they commit lewdness. 
In thee have they discovered their fathers' nakedness: in thee have they humbled her that was set apart for pollution. 
And one hath committed abomination with his neighbour's wife; and another hath lewdly defiled his daughter in law; and another in thee hath humbled his sister, his father's daughter. 
In thee have they taken gifts to shed blood; thou hast taken usury and in
816,nted unto thee; and I will give thee riches, and wealth, and honour, such as none of the kings have had that have been before thee, neither shall there any after thee have the like. 
Then Solomon came from his journey to the high place that was at Gibeon to Jerusalem, from before the tabernacle of the congregation, and reigned over Israel. 
And Solomon gathered chariots and horsemen: and he had a thousand and four hundred chariots, and twelve thousand horsemen, which he placed in the chariot cities, and with the king at Jerusalem. 
And the king made silver and gold at Jerusalem as plenteous as stones, and cedar trees made he as the sycomore trees that are in the vale for abundance. 
And Solomon had horses brought out of Egypt, and linen yarn: the king's merchants received the linen yarn at a price. 
And t
675,e are ye better than the fowls? 
And which of you with taking thought can add to his stature one cubit? 
If ye then be not able to do that thing which is least, why take ye thought for the rest? 
Consider the lilies how they grow: they toil not, they spin not; and yet I say unto you, that Solomon in all his glory was not arrayed like one of these. 
If then God so clothe the grass, which is to day in the field, and to morrow is cast into the oven; how much more will he clothe you, O ye of little faith? 
And seek not ye what ye shall eat, or what ye shall drink, neither be ye of doubtful mind. 
For all these things do the nations of the world seek after: and your Fathe
812, to Rebekah his mother, Behold, Esau my brother is a hairy man, and I am a smooth man: 
My father peradventure will feel me, and I shall seem to him as a deceiver; and I shall bring a curse upon me, and not a blessing. 
And his mother said unto him, Upon me be thy curse, my son: only obey my voice, and go fetch me them. 
And he went, and fetched, and brought them to his mother: and his mother made savoury meat, such as his father loved. 
And Rebekah took goodly raiment of her eldest son Esau, which were with her in the house, and put them upon Jacob her younger son: 
And she put the skins of the kids of the goats upon his hands, and upon the smooth of his neck: 
And she gave the savoury meat and the bread, which she had prepared, into the hand of her son Jacob. 
And he came unto his father, and said, 
822,n the name of our God we will set up our banners: the LORD fulfil all thy petitions. 
Now know I that the LORD saveth his anointed; he will hear him from his holy heaven with the saving strength of his right hand. 
Some trust in chariots, and some in horses: but we will remember the name of the LORD our God. 
They are brought down and fallen: but we are risen, and stand upright. 
Save, LORD: let the king hear us when we call. 
The king shall joy in thy strength, O LORD; and in thy salvation how greatly shall he rejoice! 
Thou hast given him his heart's desire, and hast not withholden the request of his lips. Selah. 
For thou preventest him with the blessings of goodness: thou settest a crown of pure gold on his head. 
He asked life of thee, and thou gavest it him, even length of days for ever and ever. 
His glo
578, Maachathi; and called them after his own name, Bashanhavothjair, unto this day. 
And I gave Gilead unto Machir. 
And unto the Reubenites and unto the Gadites I gave from Gilead even unto the river Arnon half the valley, and the border even unto the river Jabbok, which is the border of the children of Ammon; 
The plain also, and Jordan, and the coast thereof, from Chinnereth even unto the sea of the plain, even the salt sea, under Ashdothpisgah eastward. 
And I commanded you at that time, saying, The LORD your God hath given you this land to possess it: ye shall pass over
837,e interpret, that the church may receive edifying. 
Now, brethren, if I come unto you speaking with tongues, what shall I profit you, except I shall speak to you either by revelation, or by knowledge, or by prophesying, or by doctrine? 
And even things without life giving sound, whether pipe or harp, except they give a distinction in the sounds, how shall it be known what is piped or harped? 
For if the trumpet give an uncertain sound, who shall prepare himself to the battle? 
So likewise ye, except ye utter by the tongue words easy to be understood, how shall it be known what is spoken? for ye shall speak into the air. 
There are, it may be, so many kinds of voices in the world, and none of them is without signification. 
Therefore if I know not the meaning of the voice, I shall be unto him that speaketh a barbarian, and he 
699,n, and for Jarib, and for Elnathan, and for Nathan, and for Zechariah, and for Meshullam, chief men; also for Joiarib, and for Elnathan, men of understanding. 
And I sent them with commandment unto Iddo the chief at the place Casiphia, and I told them what they should say unto Iddo, and to his brethren the Nethinims, at the place Casiphia, that they should bring unto us ministers for the house of our God. 
And by the good hand of our God upon us they brought us a man of understanding, of the sons of Mahli, the son of Levi, the son of Israel; and Sherebiah, with his sons and his brethren, eighteen; 
And Hashabiah, and with him Jeshaiah of the sons of Merari, his brethren and their sons, twen
701,forth before you into singing, and all the trees of the field shall clap their hands. 
Instead of the thorn shall come up the fir tree, and instead of the brier shall come up the myrtle tree: and it shall be to the LORD for a name, for an everlasting sign that shall not be cut off. 
Thus saith the LORD, Keep ye judgment, and do justice: for my salvation is near to come, and my righteousness to be revealed. 
Blessed is the man that doeth this, and the son of man that layeth hold on it; that keepeth the sabbath from polluting it, and keepeth his hand from doing any evil. 
Neither let the son of the stranger, that hath joined himself to the LORD, speak, saying, The LORD hath utterly separated me
594,goats, five lambs of the first year: this was the offering of Eliab the son of Helon. 
On the fourth day Elizur the son of Shedeur, prince of the children of Reuben, did offer: 
His offering was one silver charger of the weight of an hundred and thirty shekels, one silver bowl of seventy shekels, after the shekel of the sanctuary; both of them full of fine flour mingled with oil for a meat offering: 
One golden spoon of ten shekels, full of incense: 
One young bullock, one ram, one lamb of the first year, for a burnt offering: 
One kid of the goats for a sin offering: 
And for a sacrific
837,Abiathar: and the general of the king's army was Joab. 
And David assembled all the princes of Israel, the princes of the tribes, and the captains of the companies that ministered to the king by course, and the captains over the thousands, and captains over the hundreds, and the stewards over all the substance and possession of the king, and of his sons, with the officers, and with the mighty men, and with all the valiant men, unto Jerusalem. 
Then David the king stood up upon his feet, and said, Hear me, my brethren, and my people: As for me, I had in mine heart to build an house of rest for the ark of the covenant of the LORD, and for the footstool of our God, and had made ready for the building: 
But God said unto me, Thou shalt not build an house for my name, because thou hast been a man of war, and hast shed blood. 
Howb
737,ear to turn from their wickedness, to burn no incense unto other gods. 
Wherefore my fury and mine anger was poured forth, and was kindled in the cities of Judah and in the streets of Jerusalem; and they are wasted and desolate, as at this day. 
Therefore now thus saith the LORD, the God of hosts, the God of Israel; Wherefore commit ye this great evil against your souls, to cut off from you man and woman, child and suckling, out of Judah, to leave you none to remain; 
In that ye provoke me unto wrath with the works of your hands, burning incense unto other gods in the land of Egypt, whither ye be gone to dwell, that ye might cut yourselves off, and that ye might be a curse and a reproach among all the nations of the earth? 
Hav
735, therefore merciful, as your Father also is merciful. 
Judge not, and ye shall not be judged: condemn not, and ye shall not be condemned: forgive, and ye shall be forgiven: 
Give, and it shall be given unto you; good measure, pressed down, and shaken together, and running over, shall men give into your bosom. For with the same measure that ye mete withal it shall be measured to you again. 
And he spake a parable unto them, Can the blind lead the blind? shall they not both fall into the ditch? 
The disciple is not above his master: but every one that is perfect shall be as his master. 
And why beholdest thou the mote that is in thy brother's eye, but perceivest not the beam that is in thine own eye? 
Either how canst thou say 
692,e commandment of God of none effect by your tradition. 
Ye hypocrites, well did Esaias prophesy of you, saying, 
This people draweth nigh unto me with their mouth, and honoureth me with their lips; but their heart is far from me. 
But in vain they do worship me, teaching for doctrines the commandments of men. 
And he called the multitude, and said unto them, Hear, and understand: 
Not that which goeth into the mouth defileth a man; but that which cometh out of the mouth, this defileth a man. 
Then came his disciples, and said unto him, Knowest thou that the Pharisees were offended, after they heard this saying? 
But he answered and said, Every plant, which my heavenly Father hath not
726,or that, or whether they both shall be alike good. 
Truly the light is sweet, and a pleasant thing it is for the eyes to behold the sun: 
But if a man live many years, and rejoice in them all; yet let him remember the days of darkness; for they shall be many. All that cometh is vanity. 
Rejoice, O young man, in thy youth; and let thy heart cheer thee in the days of thy youth, and walk in the ways of thine heart, and in the sight of thine eyes: but know thou, that for all these things God will bring thee into judgment. 
Therefore remove sorrow from thy heart, and put away evil from thy flesh: for childhood and youth are vanity. 
Remember now thy Creator in the days of thy youth, while the evil days come not, nor the y
768,s thereof shall not give their light: the sun shall be darkened in his going forth, and the moon shall not cause her light to shine. 
And I will punish the world for their evil, and the wicked for their iniquity; and I will cause the arrogancy of the proud to cease, and will lay low the haughtiness of the terrible. 
I will make a man more precious than fine gold; even a man than the golden wedge of Ophir. 
Therefore I will shake the heavens, and the earth shall remove out of her place, in the wrath of the LORD of hosts, and in the day of his fierce anger. 
And it shall be as the chased roe, and as a sheep that no man taketh up: they shall every man turn to his own people, and flee every one into his own land. 
Every one that is found shall be thrust through;
679, be wakened, and come up to the valley of Jehoshaphat: for there will I sit to judge all the heathen round about. 
Put ye in the sickle, for the harvest is ripe: come, get you down; for the press is full, the fats overflow; for their wickedness is great. 
Multitudes, multitudes in the valley of decision: for the day of the LORD is near in the valley of decision. 
The sun and the moon shall be darkened, and the stars shall withdraw their shining. 
The LORD also shall roar out of Zion, and utter his voice from Jerusalem; and the heavens and the earth shall shake: but the LORD will be the hope of his people, and the strength of the children of Israel. 
So shall ye know that
602, the sacrifice of peace offerings; and the priest shall burn it upon the altar for a sweet savour unto the LORD; and the priest shall make an atonement for him, and it shall be forgiven him. 
And if he bring a lamb for a sin offering, he shall bring it a female without blemish. 
And he shall lay his hand upon the head of the sin offering, and slay it for a sin offering in the place where they kill the burnt offering. 
And the priest shall take of the blood of the sin offering with his finger, and put it upon the horns of the altar of burnt offering, and shall pour out all the blood thereof at th
782,srael and the house of Judah have dealt very treacherously against me, saith the LORD. 
They have belied the LORD, and said, It is not he; neither shall evil come upon us; neither shall we see sword nor famine: 
And the prophets shall become wind, and the word is not in them: thus shall it be done unto them. 
Wherefore thus saith the LORD God of hosts, Because ye speak this word, behold, I will make my words in thy mouth fire, and this people wood, and it shall devour them. 
Lo, I will bring a nation upon you from far, O house of Israel, saith the LORD: it is a mighty nation, it is an ancient nation, a nation whose language thou knowest not, neither understandest what they say. 
Their quiver is as an open sepulchre, they are all mighty men. 
And they shall eat up thine ha
596, God indeed dwell on the earth? behold, the heaven and heaven of heavens cannot contain thee; how much less this house that I have builded? 
Yet have thou respect unto the prayer of thy servant, and to his supplication, O LORD my God, to hearken unto the cry and to the prayer, which thy servant prayeth before thee to day: 
That thine eyes may be open toward this house night and day, even toward the place of which thou hast said, My name shall be there: that thou mayest hearken unto the prayer which thy servant shall make toward this place. 
And hearken thou to the supplication of thy serva
741,he LORD thy God, thou, and thy son, and thy daughter, and thy manservant, and thy maidservant, and the Levite that is within thy gates, and the stranger, and the fatherless, and the widow, that are among you, in the place which the LORD thy God hath chosen to place his name there. 
And thou shalt remember that thou wast a bondman in Egypt: and thou shalt observe and do these statutes. 
Thou shalt observe the feast of tabernacles seven days, after that thou hast gathered in thy corn and thy wine: 
And thou shalt rejoice in thy feast, thou, and thy son, and thy daughter, and thy manservant, and thy maidservant, and the Levite, the stranger, and the fatherless, and the widow, that are within thy gates. 
Seven days shalt thou keep a so
699,im: but woe to that man by whom the Son of man is betrayed! good were it for that man if he had never been born. 
And as they did eat, Jesus took bread, and blessed, and brake it, and gave to them, and said, Take, eat: this is my body. 
And he took the cup, and when he had given thanks, he gave it to them: and they all drank of it. 
And he said unto them, This is my blood of the new testament, which is shed for many. 
Verily I say unto you, I will drink no more of the fruit of the vine, until that day that I drink it new in the kingdom of God. 
And when they had sung an hymn, they went out into the mount of Olives. 
And Jesus saith unto them, All ye shall be offended because of me this nigh
804,ft up your eyes to the heavens, and look upon the earth beneath: for the heavens shall vanish away like smoke, and the earth shall wax old like a garment, and they that dwell therein shall die in like manner: but my salvation shall be for ever, and my righteousness shall not be abolished. 
Hearken unto me, ye that know righteousness, the people in whose heart is my law; fear ye not the reproach of men, neither be ye afraid of their revilings. 
For the moth shall eat them up like a garment, and the worm shall eat them like wool: but my righteousness shall be for ever, and my salvation from generation to generation. 
Awake, awake, put on strength, O arm of the LORD; awake, as in the ancient days, in the generations of old. Art thou not it that hath cut Rahab, and wounded the dragon? 
Art thou no
614,ies, and possessions of flocks and herds in abundance: for God had given him substance very much. 
This same Hezekiah also stopped the upper watercourse of Gihon, and brought it straight down to the west side of the city of David. And Hezekiah prospered in all his works. 
Howbeit in the business of the ambassadors of the princes of Babylon, who sent unto him to enquire of the wonder that was done in the land, God left him, to try him, that he might know all that was in his heart. 
Now the rest of the acts of Hezekiah, and his goodness, behold, they are written in the vision of Isaiah the prophet, the son of
608,r the earth which drinketh in the rain that cometh oft upon it, and bringeth forth herbs meet for them by whom it is dressed, receiveth blessing from God: 
But that which beareth thorns and briers is rejected, and is nigh unto cursing; whose end is to be burned. 
But, beloved, we are persuaded better things of you, and things that accompany salvation, though we thus speak. 
For God is not unrighteous to forget your work and labour of love, which ye have shewed toward his name, in that ye have ministered to the saints, and do minister. 
And we desire that every one of you do shew the same diligence to 
744,e gods. 
Zion heard, and was glad; and the daughters of Judah rejoiced because of thy judgments, O LORD. 
For thou, LORD, art high above all the earth: thou art exalted far above all gods. 
Ye that love the LORD, hate evil: he preserveth the souls of his saints; he delivereth them out of the hand of the wicked. 
Light is sown for the righteous, and gladness for the upright in heart. 
Rejoice in the LORD, ye righteous; and give thanks at the remembrance of his holiness. 
O sing unto the LORD a new song; for he hath done marvellous things: his right hand, and his holy arm, hath gotten him the victory. 
The LORD hath made known his salvation: his righteousness hath he openly shewed in the sight of the heathen. 
He hath remembered his mer
632,f incense, weighing ten shekels apiece, after the shekel of the sanctuary: all the gold of the spoons was an hundred and twenty shekels. 
All the oxen for the burnt offering were twelve bullocks, the rams twelve, the lambs of the first year twelve, with their meat offering: and the kids of the goats for sin offering twelve. 
And all the oxen for the sacrifice of the peace offerings were twenty and four bullocks, the rams sixty, the he goats sixty, the lambs of the first year sixty. This was the dedication of the altar, after that it was anointed. 
And when Moses was gone into the tabernacle of the congregation to speak with 
782,ion, which is Hermon, 
And all the plain on this side Jordan eastward, even unto the sea of the plain, under the springs of Pisgah. 
And Moses called all Israel, and said unto them, Hear, O Israel, the statutes and judgments which I speak in your ears this day, that ye may learn them, and keep, and do them. 
The LORD our God made a covenant with us in Horeb. 
The LORD made not this covenant with our fathers, but with us, even us, who are all of us here alive this day. 
The LORD talked with you face to face in the mount out of the midst of the fire, 
(I stood between the LORD and you at that time, to shew you the word of the LORD: for ye were afraid by reason of the fire, and went not up into the mount;) saying, 
I am the LORD thy God, which brought thee out of the land of
812, that he should be clean? and he which is born of a woman, that he should be righteous? 
Behold, he putteth no trust in his saints; yea, the heavens are not clean in his sight. 
How much more abominable and filthy is man, which drinketh iniquity like water? 
I will shew thee, hear me; and that which I have seen I will declare; 
Which wise men have told from their fathers, and have not hid it: 
Unto whom alone the earth was given, and no stranger passed among them. 
The wicked man travaileth with pain all his days, and the number of years is hidden to the oppressor. 
A dreadful sound is in his ears: in prosperity the destroyer shall come upon him. 
He believeth not that he shall return out of darkness, and he is waited for of the sword. 
He wandereth abroad for bread, saying, Where is it? he knoweth th
714,r than vanity. 
Trust not in oppression, and become not vain in robbery: if riches increase, set not your heart upon them. 
God hath spoken once; twice have I heard this; that power belongeth unto God. 
Also unto thee, O Lord, belongeth mercy: for thou renderest to every man according to his work. 
O God, thou art my God; early will I seek thee: my soul thirsteth for thee, my flesh longeth for thee in a dry and thirsty land, where no water is; 
To see thy power and thy glory, so as I have seen thee in the sanctuary. 
Because thy lovingkindness is better than life, my lips shall praise thee. 
Thus will I bless thee while I live: I will lift up my hands in thy name. 
My soul shall be satisfied as with marro
566,mbled not himself before Jeremiah the prophet speaking from the mouth of the LORD. 
And he also rebelled against king Nebuchadnezzar, who had made him swear by God: but he stiffened his neck, and hardened his heart from turning unto the LORD God of Israel. 
Moreover all the chief of the priests, and the people, transgressed very much after all the abominations of the heathen; and polluted the house of the LORD which he had hallowed in Jerusalem. 
And the LORD God of their fathers sent to them by his messengers, rising up betimes, and sending; because he had co
601, after that they durst not ask him any question at all. 
And he said unto them, How say they that Christ is David's son? 
And David himself saith in the book of Psalms, The LORD said unto my Lord, Sit thou on my right hand, 
Till I make thine enemies thy footstool. 
David therefore calleth him Lord, how is he then his son? 
Then in the audience of all the people he said unto his disciples, 
Beware of the scribes, which desire to walk in long robes, and love greetings in the markets, and the highest seats in the synagogues, and the chief rooms at feasts; 
Which devour widows' houses, and for a s
789,ked with all the children of Israel spake I a word with any of the tribes of Israel, whom I commanded to feed my people Israel, saying, Why build ye not me an house of cedar? 
Now therefore so shalt thou say unto my servant David, Thus saith the LORD of hosts, I took thee from the sheepcote, from following the sheep, to be ruler over my people, over Israel: 
And I was with thee whithersoever thou wentest, and have cut off all thine enemies out of thy sight, and have made thee a great name, like unto the name of the great men that are in the earth. 
Moreover I will appoint a place for my people Israel, and will plant them, that they may dwell in a place of their own, and move no more; neither shall the children of wickedness afflict them any more, as beforetime, 
And as since the
639, whose name was Tamar. 
And Er, Judah's firstborn, was wicked in the sight of the LORD; and the LORD slew him. 
And Judah said unto Onan, Go in unto thy brother's wife, and marry her, and raise up seed to thy brother. 
And Onan knew that the seed should not be his; and it came to pass, when he went in unto his brother's wife, that he spilled it on the ground, lest that he should give seed to his brother. 
And the thing which he did displeased the LORD: wherefore he slew him also. 
Then said Judah to Tamar his daughter in law, Remain a widow at thy father's house, till Shelah my son be grown: for he said, Lest peradventure he die al
780,im, slew Maaseiah the king's son, and Azrikam the governor of the house, and Elkanah that was next to the king. 
And the children of Israel carried away captive of their brethren two hundred thousand, women, sons, and daughters, and took also away much spoil from them, and brought the spoil to Samaria. 
But a prophet of the LORD was there, whose name was Oded: and he went out before the host that came to Samaria, and said unto them, Behold, because the LORD God of your fathers was wroth with Judah, he hath delivered them into your hand, and ye have slain them in a rage that reacheth up unto heaven. 
And now ye purpose to keep under the children of Judah and Jerusalem for bondmen and bondwomen unto you: but are there not with you, even with you, sins against the LORD you
617,captain: for he hath a certain thing to tell him. 
So he took him, and brought him to the chief captain, and said, Paul the prisoner called me unto him, and prayed me to bring this young man unto thee, who hath something to say unto thee. 
Then the chief captain took him by the hand, and went with him aside privately, and asked him, What is that thou hast to tell me? 
And he said, The Jews have agreed to desire thee that thou wouldest bring down Paul to morrow into the council, as though they would enquire somewhat of him more perfectly. 
But do not thou yield unto them: for there lie in wait for him of them m
695,im, He that is washed needeth not save to wash his feet, but is clean every whit: and ye are clean, but not all. 
For he knew who should betray him; therefore said he, Ye are not all clean. 
So after he had washed their feet, and had taken his garments, and was set down again, he said unto them, Know ye what I have done to you? 
Ye call me Master and Lord: and ye say well; for so I am. 
If I then, your Lord and Master, have washed your feet; ye also ought to wash one another's feet. 
For I have given you an example, that ye should do as I have done to you. 
Verily, verily, I say unto you, The servant is not greater than his lord; neither he that is sent greater than he that sent him. 
I
700,mong the treasures of the house of the LORD. 
Then Solomon assembled the elders of Israel, and all the heads of the tribes, the chief of the fathers of the children of Israel, unto king Solomon in Jerusalem, that they might bring up the ark of the covenant of the LORD out of the city of David, which is Zion. 
And all the men of Israel assembled themselves unto king Solomon at the feast in the month Ethanim, which is the seventh month. 
And all the elders of Israel came, and the priests took up the ark. 
And they brought up the ark of the LORD, and the tabernacle of the congregation, and all the holy vessels that were in the tabernacle, even those did the priests and the Levites bring up. 
An
595,n, and did eat and drink both of them together: for the damsel's father had said unto the man, Be content, I pray thee, and tarry all night, and let thine heart be merry. 
And when the man rose up to depart, his father in law urged him: therefore he lodged there again. 
And he arose early in the morning on the fifth day to depart; and the damsel's father said, Comfort thine heart, I pray thee. And they tarried until afternoon, and they did eat both of them. 
And when the man rose up to depart, he, and his concubine, and his servant, his father in law, the damsel's father, said unto him, B
727, Bethlehem: 
And let thy house be like the house of Pharez, whom Tamar bare unto Judah, of the seed which the LORD shall give thee of this young woman. 
So Boaz took Ruth, and she was his wife: and when he went in unto her, the LORD gave her conception, and she bare a son. 
And the women said unto Naomi, Blessed be the LORD, which hath not left thee this day without a kinsman, that his name may be famous in Israel. 
And he shall be unto thee a restorer of thy life, and a nourisher of thine old age: for thy daughter in law, which loveth thee, which is better to thee than seven sons, hath born him. 
And Naomi took the child, and laid it in her bosom, and became nurse unto it. 
And the women her neighbours gave it a name
684,n looked; and, behold, the multitude melted away, and they went on beating down one another. 
Then said Saul unto the people that were with him, Number now, and see who is gone from us. And when they had numbered, behold, Jonathan and his armourbearer were not there. 
And Saul said unto Ahiah, Bring hither the ark of God. For the ark of God was at that time with the children of Israel. 
And it came to pass, while Saul talked unto the priest, that the noise that was in the host of the Philistines went on and increased: and Saul said unto the priest, Withdraw thine hand. 
And Saul and all the people that were with him assembled themselves, and they came to the battle: and, beho
653,nto them, Take ye him, and crucify him: for I find no fault in him. 
The Jews answered him, We have a law, and by our law he ought to die, because he made himself the Son of God. 
When Pilate therefore heard that saying, he was the more afraid; 
And went again into the judgment hall, and saith unto Jesus, Whence art thou? But Jesus gave him no answer. 
Then saith Pilate unto him, Speakest thou not unto me? knowest thou not that I have power to crucify thee, and have power to release thee? 
Jesus answered, Thou couldest have no power at all against me, except it were given thee from above: therefore he that delivered me unto thee hath the greater
675,e witness shall not be unpunished, and he that speaketh lies shall perish. 
Delight is not seemly for a fool; much less for a servant to have rule over princes. 
The discretion of a man deferreth his anger; and it is his glory to pass over a transgression. 
The king's wrath is as the roaring of a lion; but his favour is as dew upon the grass. 
A foolish son is the calamity of his father: and the contentions of a wife are a continual dropping. 
House and riches are the inheritance of fathers: and a prudent wife is from the LORD. 
Slothfulness casteth into a deep sleep; and an idle soul shall suffer hunger. 
He that keepeth the commandment keepeth his own soul; but he 
564,oth was stoned, and was dead, that Jezebel said to Ahab, Arise, take possession of the vineyard of Naboth the Jezreelite, which he refused to give thee for money: for Naboth is not alive, but dead. 
And it came to pass, when Ahab heard that Naboth was dead, that Ahab rose up to go down to the vineyard of Naboth the Jezreelite, to take possession of it. 
And the word of the LORD came to Elijah the Tishbite, saying, 
Arise, go down to meet Ahab king of Israel, which is in Samaria: behold, he is in the vineyard of Naboth, whither he is gone down to possess it. 
633,ill rejoice. 
For I know that this shall turn to my salvation through your prayer, and the supply of the Spirit of Jesus Christ, 
According to my earnest expectation and my hope, that in nothing I shall be ashamed, but that with all boldness, as always, so now also Christ shall be magnified in my body, whether it be by life, or by death. 
For to me to live is Christ, and to die is gain. 
But if I live in the flesh, this is the fruit of my labour: yet what I shall choose I wot not. 
For I am in a strait betwixt two, having a desire to depart, and to be with Christ; which is far better: 
Nevertheless to abide in the flesh is mo
749,to the wilderness, that snuffeth up the wind at her pleasure; in her occasion who can turn her away? all they that seek her will not weary themselves; in her month they shall find her. 
Withhold thy foot from being unshod, and thy throat from thirst: but thou saidst, There is no hope: no; for I have loved strangers, and after them will I go. 
As the thief is ashamed when he is found, so is the house of Israel ashamed; they, their kings, their princes, and their priests, and their prophets. 
Saying to a stock, Thou art my father; and to a stone, Thou hast brought me forth: for they have turned their back unto me, and not their face: but in the time of their trouble they will say, Arise, and save us. 
But where are thy gods that thou hast ma
764,: the righteous runneth into it, and is safe. 
The rich man's wealth is his strong city, and as an high wall in his own conceit. 
Before destruction the heart of man is haughty, and before honour is humility. 
He that answereth a matter before he heareth it, it is folly and shame unto him. 
The spirit of a man will sustain his infirmity; but a wounded spirit who can bear? 
The heart of the prudent getteth knowledge; and the ear of the wise seeketh knowledge. 
A man's gift maketh room for him, and bringeth him before great men. 
He that is first in his own cause seemeth just; but his neighbour cometh and searcheth him. 
The lot causeth contentions to cease, and parteth between the mighty. 
A brother offended is harder to be won than a strong city: and the
765,be far from him. 
As he clothed himself with cursing like as with his garment, so let it come into his bowels like water, and like oil into his bones. 
Let it be unto him as the garment which covereth him, and for a girdle wherewith he is girded continually. 
Let this be the reward of mine adversaries from the LORD, and of them that speak evil against my soul. 
But do thou for me, O GOD the Lord, for thy name's sake: because thy mercy is good, deliver thou me. 
For I am poor and needy, and my heart is wounded within me. 
I am gone like the shadow when it declineth: I am tossed up and down as the locust. 
My knees are weak through fasting; and my flesh faileth of fatness. 
I became also a reproach unto them: when they looked upon me they shaked their heads
839, doings have beset them about; they are before my face. 
They make the king glad with their wickedness, and the princes with their lies. 
They are all adulterers, as an oven heated by the baker, who ceaseth from raising after he hath kneaded the dough, until it be leavened. 
In the day of our king the princes have made him sick with bottles of wine; he stretched out his hand with scorners. 
For they have made ready their heart like an oven, whiles they lie in wait: their baker sleepeth all the night; in the morning it burneth as a flaming fire. 
They are all hot as an oven, and have devoured their judges; all their kings are fallen: there is none among them that calleth unto me. 
Ephraim, he hath mixed himself among the people; Ephraim is a cake not turned. 
Strangers have devoured his strength, and he knoweth it not: yea, gray
724,eir vengeance and all their imaginations against me. 
Thou hast heard their reproach, O LORD, and all their imaginations against me; 
The lips of those that rose up against me, and their device against me all the day. 
Behold their sitting down, and their rising up; I am their musick. 
Render unto them a recompence, O LORD, according to the work of their hands. 
Give them sorrow of heart, thy curse unto them. 
Persecute and destroy them in anger from under the heavens of the LORD. 
How is the gold become dim! how is the most fine gold changed! the stones of the sanctuary are poured out in the top of every street. 
The precious sons of Zion, comparable to fine gold, how are they esteemed as earthen pitchers, the wor
767,he prophets, from morning till evening. 
And some believed the things which were spoken, and some believed not. 
And when they agreed not among themselves, they departed, after that Paul had spoken one word, Well spake the Holy Ghost by Esaias the prophet unto our fathers, 
Saying, Go unto this people, and say, Hearing ye shall hear, and shall not understand; and seeing ye shall see, and not perceive: 
For the heart of this people is waxed gross, and their ears are dull of hearing, and their eyes have they closed; lest they should see with their eyes, and hear with their ears, and understand with their heart, and should be converted, and I should heal them. 
Be it known therefore unto you, that the salvation of God is sent unto the Gentiles, and that they w
582,s of wheat for food to his household, and twenty measures of pure oil: thus gave Solomon to Hiram year by year. 
And the LORD gave Solomon wisdom, as he promised him: and there was peace between Hiram and Solomon; and they two made a league together. 
And king Solomon raised a levy out of all Israel; and the levy was thirty thousand men. 
And he sent them to Lebanon, ten thousand a month by courses: a month they were in Lebanon, and two months at home: and Adoniram was over the levy. 
And Solomon had threescore and ten thousand that bare burdens, and fourscore thousand hewers
819,urse unto my chosen: for the Lord GOD shall slay thee, and call his servants by another name: 
That he who blesseth himself in the earth shall bless himself in the God of truth; and he that sweareth in the earth shall swear by the God of truth; because the former troubles are forgotten, and because they are hid from mine eyes. 
For, behold, I create new heavens and a new earth: and the former shall not be remembered, nor come into mind. 
But be ye glad and rejoice for ever in that which I create: for, behold, I create Jerusalem a rejoicing, and her people a joy. 
And I will rejoice in Jerusalem, and joy in my people: and the voice of weeping shall be no more heard in her, nor the voice of crying. 
There shall be no more thence an infant of days, nor an old man that hath not filled his days: for the child sha
561,hom they come! 
It were better for him that a millstone were hanged about his neck, and he cast into the sea, than that he should offend one of these little ones. 
Take heed to yourselves: If thy brother trespass against thee, rebuke him; and if he repent, forgive him. 
And if he trespass against thee seven times in a day, and seven times in a day turn again to thee, saying, I repent; thou shalt forgive him. 
And the apostles said unto the Lord, Increase our faith. 
And the Lord said, If ye had faith as a grain of mustard seed, ye might say unto this syca
600,he four corners of the settle, and upon the border round about: thus shalt thou cleanse and purge it. 
Thou shalt take the bullock also of the sin offering, and he shall burn it in the appointed place of the house, without the sanctuary. 
And on the second day thou shalt offer a kid of the goats without blemish for a sin offering; and they shall cleanse the altar, as they did cleanse it with the bullock. 
When thou hast made an end of cleansing it, thou shalt offer a young bullock without blemish, and a ram out of the flock without blemish. 
And thou shalt offer them before the LORD, and the p
621, for judgment is toward you, because ye have been a snare on Mizpah, and a net spread upon Tabor. 
And the revolters are profound to make slaughter, though I have been a rebuker of them all. 
I know Ephraim, and Israel is not hid from me: for now, O Ephraim, thou committest whoredom, and Israel is defiled. 
They will not frame their doings to turn unto their God: for the spirit of whoredoms is in the midst of them, and they have not known the LORD. 
And the pride of Israel doth testify to his face: therefore shall Israel and Ephraim fall in their iniquity: Judah also shall fall with them. 
They shall go with their
641,t goodly mountain, and Lebanon. 
But the LORD was wroth with me for your sakes, and would not hear me: and the LORD said unto me, Let it suffice thee; speak no more unto me of this matter. 
Get thee up into the top of Pisgah, and lift up thine eyes westward, and northward, and southward, and eastward, and behold it with thine eyes: for thou shalt not go over this Jordan. 
But charge Joshua, and encourage him, and strengthen him: for he shall go over before this people, and he shall cause them to inherit the land which thou shalt see. 
So we abode in the valley over against Bethpeor. 
Now therefore hearken, O Israel, unto the statutes
762,strife in Kadesh, the river to the great sea. And this is the south side southward. 
The west side also shall be the great sea from the border, till a man come over against Hamath. This is the west side. 
So shall ye divide this land unto you according to the tribes of Israel. 
And it shall come to pass, that ye shall divide it by lot for an inheritance unto you, and to the strangers that sojourn among you, which shall beget children among you: and they shall be unto you as born in the country among the children of Israel; they shall have inheritance with you among the tribes of Israel. 
And it shall come to pass, that in what tribe the stranger sojourneth, there shall ye give him his inheritance, saith the Lord GOD. 
Now these are the names of the tri
715, I pray thee, tell me. And he answered, That the people are fled from the battle, and many of the people also are fallen and dead; and Saul and Jonathan his son are dead also. 
And David said unto the young man that told him, How knowest thou that Saul and Jonathan his son be dead? 
And the young man that told him said, As I happened by chance upon mount Gilboa, behold, Saul leaned upon his spear; and, lo, the chariots and horsemen followed hard after him. 
And when he looked behind him, he saw me, and called unto me. And I answered, Here am I. 
And he said unto me, Who art thou? And I answered him, I am an Amalekite. 
He said unto me again, Stand, I pray thee, upon me, and slay me: for anguish is come upo
685,e LORD in the presence of all the congregation of Israel, and spread forth his hands toward heaven: 
And he said, LORD God of Israel, there is no God like thee, in heaven above, or on earth beneath, who keepest covenant and mercy with thy servants that walk before thee with all their heart: 
Who hast kept with thy servant David my father that thou promisedst him: thou spakest also with thy mouth, and hast fulfilled it with thine hand, as it is this day. 
Therefore now, LORD God of Israel, keep with thy servant David my father that thou promisedst him, saying, There shall not fail thee a man in my sight to sit on the throne of Israel; so that thy children take heed to their way
766, and his fruit shall be a fiery flying serpent. 
And the firstborn of the poor shall feed, and the needy shall lie down in safety: and I will kill thy root with famine, and he shall slay thy remnant. 
Howl, O gate; cry, O city; thou, whole Palestina, art dissolved: for there shall come from the north a smoke, and none shall be alone in his appointed times. 
What shall one then answer the messengers of the nation? That the LORD hath founded Zion, and the poor of his people shall trust in it. 
The burden of Moab. Because in the night Ar of Moab is laid waste, and brought to silence; because in the night Kir of Moab is laid waste, and brought to silence; 
He is gone up to Bajith, and to Dibon, the high places, to weep: Moab shall howl over Nebo, and over Mede
587,or? 
But if we hope for that we see not, then do we with patience wait for it. 
Likewise the Spirit also helpeth our infirmities: for we know not what we should pray for as we ought: but the Spirit itself maketh intercession for us with groanings which cannot be uttered. 
And he that searcheth the hearts knoweth what is the mind of the Spirit, because he maketh intercession for the saints according to the will of God. 
And we know that all things work together for good to them that love God, to them who are the called according to his purpose. 
For whom he did foreknow, he also di
789,engers those that remain upon the face of the earth, to cleanse it: after the end of seven months shall they search. 
And the passengers that pass through the land, when any seeth a man's bone, then shall he set up a sign by it, till the buriers have buried it in the valley of Hamongog. 
And also the name of the city shall be Hamonah. Thus shall they cleanse the land. 
And, thou son of man, thus saith the Lord GOD; Speak unto every feathered fowl, and to every beast of the field, Assemble yourselves, and come; gather yourselves on every side to my sacrifice that I do sacrifice for you, even a great sacrifice upon the mountains of Israel, that ye may eat flesh, and drink blood. 
Ye shall eat the flesh of the mighty, and drink the blood of the princes of the earth, of rams, of lam
683, put the Canaanites to tribute, but did not utterly drive them out. 
And the children of Joseph spake unto Joshua, saying, Why hast thou given me but one lot and one portion to inherit, seeing I am a great people, forasmuch as the LORD hath blessed me hitherto? 
And Joshua answered them, If thou be a great people, then get thee up to the wood country, and cut down for thyself there in the land of the Perizzites and of the giants, if mount Ephraim be too narrow for thee. 
And the children of Joseph said, The hill is not enough for us: and all the Canaanites that dwell in the land of the valley have chariots of iron, both they who are of Bethshean and her towns, and they who a
602,th. 
But Jonathan heard not when his father charged the people with the oath: wherefore he put forth the end of the rod that was in his hand, and dipped it in an honeycomb, and put his hand to his mouth; and his eyes were enlightened. 
Then answered one of the people, and said, Thy father straitly charged the people with an oath, saying, Cursed be the man that eateth any food this day. And the people were faint. 
Then said Jonathan, My father hath troubled the land: see, I pray you, how mine eyes have been enlightened, because I tasted a little of this honey. 
How much more, if haply the people 
566, give the less inheritance: to every one shall his inheritance be given according to those that were numbered of him. 
Notwithstanding the land shall be divided by lot: according to the names of the tribes of their fathers they shall inherit. 
According to the lot shall the possession thereof be divided between many and few. 
And these are they that were numbered of the Levites after their families: of Gershon, the family of the Gershonites: of Kohath, the family of the Kohathites: of Merari, the family of the Merarites. 
These are the families of the Levites:
752,loud dwell upon it; let the blackness of the day terrify it. 
As for that night, let darkness seize upon it; let it not be joined unto the days of the year, let it not come into the number of the months. 
Lo, let that night be solitary, let no joyful voice come therein. 
Let them curse it that curse the day, who are ready to raise up their mourning. 
Let the stars of the twilight thereof be dark; let it look for light, but have none; neither let it see the dawning of the day: 
Because it shut not up the doors of my mother's womb, nor hid sorrow from mine eyes. 
Why died I not from the womb? why did I not give up the ghost when I came out of the belly? 
Why did the knees prevent me? or why the breasts that I should suck? 
For now should I have
589,LORD against this land to destroy it? the LORD said unto me, Go up against this land, and destroy it. 
Then said Eliakim and Shebna and Joah unto Rabshakeh, Speak, I pray thee, unto thy servants in the Syrian language; for we understand it: and speak not to us in the Jews' language, in the ears of the people that are on the wall. 
But Rabshakeh said, Hath my master sent me to thy master and to thee to speak these words? hath he not sent me to the men that sit upon the wall, that they may eat their own dung, and drink their own piss with you? 
Then Rabshakeh stood, and cried with a l
716,und about. 
His scales are his pride, shut up together as with a close seal. 
One is so near to another, that no air can come between them. 
They are joined one to another, they stick together, that they cannot be sundered. 
By his neesings a light doth shine, and his eyes are like the eyelids of the morning. 
Out of his mouth go burning lamps, and sparks of fire leap out. 
Out of his nostrils goeth smoke, as out of a seething pot or caldron. 
His breath kindleth coals, and a flame goeth out of his mouth. 
In his neck remaineth strength, and sorrow is turned into joy before him. 
The flakes of his flesh are joined together: they are firm in themselves; they cannot be moved. 
His heart is as firm as a stone;
585,ed man getteth himself a blot. 
Reprove not a scorner, lest he hate thee: rebuke a wise man, and he will love thee. 
Give instruction to a wise man, and he will be yet wiser: teach a just man, and he will increase in learning. 
The fear of the LORD is the beginning of wisdom: and the knowledge of the holy is understanding. 
For by me thy days shall be multiplied, and the years of thy life shall be increased. 
If thou be wise, thou shalt be wise for thyself: but if thou scornest, thou alone shalt bear it. 
A foolish woman is clamorous: she is simple, and knoweth nothing. 
For she
601,e LORD your God, which I command you this day: 
And a curse, if ye will not obey the commandments of the LORD your God, but turn aside out of the way which I command you this day, to go after other gods, which ye have not known. 
And it shall come to pass, when the LORD thy God hath brought thee in unto the land whither thou goest to possess it, that thou shalt put the blessing upon mount Gerizim, and the curse upon mount Ebal. 
Are they not on the other side Jordan, by the way where the sun goeth down, in the land of the Canaanites, which dwell in the champaign over against Gilgal, beside the 
640,are mercy and truth unto such as keep his covenant and his testimonies. 
For thy name's sake, O LORD, pardon mine iniquity; for it is great. 
What man is he that feareth the LORD? him shall he teach in the way that he shall choose. 
His soul shall dwell at ease; and his seed shall inherit the earth. 
The secret of the LORD is with them that fear him; and he will shew them his covenant. 
Mine eyes are ever toward the LORD; for he shall pluck my feet out of the net. 
Turn thee unto me, and have mercy upon me; for I am desolate and afflicted. 
The troubles of my heart are enlarged: O bring thou me out of my distresses. 
Look upon mine 
644,hyself that thou be not snared by following them, after that they be destroyed from before thee; and that thou enquire not after their gods, saying, How did these nations serve their gods? even so will I do likewise. 
Thou shalt not do so unto the LORD thy God: for every abomination to the LORD, which he hateth, have they done unto their gods; for even their sons and their daughters they have burnt in the fire to their gods. 
What thing soever I command you, observe to do it: thou shalt not add thereto, nor diminish from it. 
If there arise among you a prophet, or a dreamer of dreams, and giveth thee a sign or a wonder, 
And the sign or
562, end to the coast of the way of Hethlon, as one goeth to Hamath, Hazarenan, the border of Damascus northward, to the coast of Hamath; for these are his sides east and west; a portion for Dan. 
And by the border of Dan, from the east side unto the west side, a portion for Asher. 
And by the border of Asher, from the east side even unto the west side, a portion for Naphtali. 
And by the border of Naphtali, from the east side unto the west side, a portion for Manasseh. 
And by the border of Manasseh, from the east side unto the west side, a portion for Ephrai
610,rth do shake. 
The earth is utterly broken down, the earth is clean dissolved, the earth is moved exceedingly. 
The earth shall reel to and fro like a drunkard, and shall be removed like a cottage; and the transgression thereof shall be heavy upon it; and it shall fall, and not rise again. 
And it shall come to pass in that day, that the LORD shall punish the host of the high ones that are on high, and the kings of the earth upon the earth. 
And they shall be gathered together, as prisoners are gathered in the pit, and shall be shut up in the prison, and after many days shall they be visited. 
Then the 
746, 
And Jakim, and Zichri, and Zabdi, 
And Elienai, and Zilthai, and Eliel, 
And Adaiah, and Beraiah, and Shimrath, the sons of Shimhi; 
And Ishpan, and Heber, and Eliel, 
And Abdon, and Zichri, and Hanan, 
And Hananiah, and Elam, and Antothijah, 
And Iphedeiah, and Penuel, the sons of Shashak; 
And Shamsherai, and Shehariah, and Athaliah, 
And Jaresiah, and Eliah, and Zichri, the sons of Jeroham. 
These were heads of the fathers, by their generations, chief men. These dwelt in Jerusalem. 
And at Gibeon dwelt the father of Gibeon; whose wife's name was Maachah: 
And his firstborn son Abdon, and Zur, and Kish, and Baal, and Nadab, 
And Gedor, and Ahio, and Zacher. 
And Mikloth begat Shimeah. And these also dwelt with their brethren in Jeru
687,vid, of whom they sang one to another in dances, saying, Saul slew his thousands, and David his ten thousands? 
Then Achish called David, and said unto him, Surely, as the LORD liveth, thou hast been upright, and thy going out and thy coming in with me in the host is good in my sight: for I have not found evil in thee since the day of thy coming unto me unto this day: nevertheless the lords favour thee not. 
Wherefore now return, and go in peace, that thou displease not the lords of the Philistines. 
And David said unto Achish, But what have I done? and what hast thou found in thy servant so long as I have been with thee unto this day, that I may not go fight against the enemies
630,art, wherein he hath laboured under the sun? 
For all his days are sorrows, and his travail grief; yea, his heart taketh not rest in the night. This is also vanity. 
There is nothing better for a man, than that he should eat and drink, and that he should make his soul enjoy good in his labour. This also I saw, that it was from the hand of God. 
For who can eat, or who else can hasten hereunto, more than I? 
For God giveth to a man that is good in his sight wisdom, and knowledge, and joy: but to the sinner he giveth travail, to gather and to heap up, that he may give to him that is good before God. This also is vanity and v
812, ark went upon the face of the waters. 
And the waters prevailed exceedingly upon the earth; and all the high hills, that were under the whole heaven, were covered. 
Fifteen cubits upward did the waters prevail; and the mountains were covered. 
And all flesh died that moved upon the earth, both of fowl, and of cattle, and of beast, and of every creeping thing that creepeth upon the earth, and every man: 
All in whose nostrils was the breath of life, of all that was in the dry land, died. 
And every living substance was destroyed which was upon the face of the ground, both man, and cattle, and the creeping things, and the fowl of the heaven; and they were destroyed from the earth: and Noah only remained alive, and they that were with him in the ark. 
And the waters prevailed upon the earth an hundred a
705, us take our journey, and let us go, and I will go before thee. 
And he said unto him, My lord knoweth that the children are tender, and the flocks and herds with young are with me: and if men should overdrive them one day, all the flock will die. 
Let my lord, I pray thee, pass over before his servant: and I will lead on softly, according as the cattle that goeth before me and the children be able to endure, until I come unto my lord unto Seir. 
And Esau said, Let me now leave with thee some of the folk that are with me. And he said, What needeth it? let me find grace in the sight of my lord. 
So Esau returned that day on his way unto Seir. 
And Jacob journeyed to Succoth, and built him an house
725,ered year by year continually make the comers thereunto perfect. 
For then would they not have ceased to be offered? because that the worshippers once purged should have had no more conscience of sins. 
But in those sacrifices there is a remembrance again made of sins every year. 
For it is not possible that the blood of bulls and of goats should take away sins. 
Wherefore when he cometh into the world, he saith, Sacrifice and offering thou wouldest not, but a body hast thou prepared me: 
In burnt offerings and sacrifices for sin thou hast had no pleasure. 
Then said I, Lo, I come (in the volume of the book it is written of me,) to do thy will, O God. 
Above when he said, Sacrifice and offering and burnt offerings a
823,ts. 
And when he had begun to reckon, one was brought unto him, which owed him ten thousand talents. 
But forasmuch as he had not to pay, his lord commanded him to be sold, and his wife, and children, and all that he had, and payment to be made. 
The servant therefore fell down, and worshipped him, saying, Lord, have patience with me, and I will pay thee all. 
Then the lord of that servant was moved with compassion, and loosed him, and forgave him the debt. 
But the same servant went out, and found one of his fellowservants, which owed him an hundred pence: and he laid hands on him, and took him by the throat, saying, Pay me that thou owest. 
And his fellowservant fell down at his feet, and besought him, saying, Have patience with me, and I will pay thee all. 
And he would not: but went and cast him into prison,
705,ith Abel his brother: and it came to pass, when they were in the field, that Cain rose up against Abel his brother, and slew him. 
And the LORD said unto Cain, Where is Abel thy brother? And he said, I know not: Am I my brother's keeper? 
And he said, What hast thou done? the voice of thy brother's blood crieth unto me from the ground. 
And now art thou cursed from the earth, which hath opened her mouth to receive thy brother's blood from thy hand; 
When thou tillest the ground, it shall not henceforth yield unto thee her strength; a fugitive and a vagabond shalt thou be in the earth. 
And Cain said unto the LORD, My punishment is greater than I can bear. 
Behold, thou hast driven me out this day
649,g corn, or the field, be consumed therewith; he that kindled the fire shall surely make restitution. 
If a man shall deliver unto his neighbour money or stuff to keep, and it be stolen out of the man's house; if the thief be found, let him pay double. 
If the thief be not found, then the master of the house shall be brought unto the judges, to see whether he have put his hand unto his neighbour's goods. 
For all manner of trespass, whether it be for ox, for ass, for sheep, for raiment, or for any manner of lost thing which another challengeth to be his, the cause of both parties shall come before the judges; and whom the judges shall condemn
567,d God had brought their counsel to nought, that we returned all of us to the wall, every one unto his work. 
And it came to pass from that time forth, that the half of my servants wrought in the work, and the other half of them held both the spears, the shields, and the bows, and the habergeons; and the rulers were behind all the house of Judah. 
They which builded on the wall, and they that bare burdens, with those that laded, every one with one of his hands wrought in the work, and with the other hand held a weapon. 
For the builders, every one had his sword 
620,deth; 
So that we ourselves glory in you in the churches of God for your patience and faith in all your persecutions and tribulations that ye endure: 
Which is a manifest token of the righteous judgment of God, that ye may be counted worthy of the kingdom of God, for which ye also suffer: 
Seeing it is a righteous thing with God to recompense tribulation to them that trouble you; 
And to you who are troubled rest with us, when the Lord Jesus shall be revealed from heaven with his mighty angels, 
In flaming fire taking vengeance on them that know not God, and that obey not the gospel of our Lord Jesus Christ: 
Who
762,en we cried unto the LORD God of our fathers, the LORD heard our voice, and looked on our affliction, and our labour, and our oppression: 
And the LORD brought us forth out of Egypt with a mighty hand, and with an outstretched arm, and with great terribleness, and with signs, and with wonders: 
And he hath brought us into this place, and hath given us this land, even a land that floweth with milk and honey. 
And now, behold, I have brought the firstfruits of the land, which thou, O LORD, hast given me. And thou shalt set it before the LORD thy God, and worship before the LORD thy God: 
And thou shalt rejoice in every good thing which the LORD thy God hath given unto thee, and unto thine house, thou, and the Levite, and the stranger that is among you. 

818,adezer had wars with Toi. And Joram brought with him vessels of silver, and vessels of gold, and vessels of brass: 
Which also king David did dedicate unto the LORD, with the silver and gold that he had dedicated of all nations which he subdued; 
Of Syria, and of Moab, and of the children of Ammon, and of the Philistines, and of Amalek, and of the spoil of Hadadezer, son of Rehob, king of Zobah. 
And David gat him a name when he returned from smiting of the Syrians in the valley of salt, being eighteen thousand men. 
And he put garrisons in Edom; throughout all Edom put he garrisons, and all they of Edom became David's servants. And the LORD preserved David whithersoever he went. 
And David reigned over all Israel; and David executed judgment and justice unto all his people. 
And Joab the son of Zeruiah was
825, Saul was very wroth, and the saying displeased him; and he said, They have ascribed unto David ten thousands, and to me they have ascribed but thousands: and what can he have more but the kingdom? 
And Saul eyed David from that day and forward. 
And it came to pass on the morrow, that the evil spirit from God came upon Saul, and he prophesied in the midst of the house: and David played with his hand, as at other times: and there was a javelin in Saul's hand. 
And Saul cast the javelin; for he said, I will smite David even to the wall with it. And David avoided out of his presence twice. 
And Saul was afraid of David, because the LORD was with him, and was departed from Saul. 
Therefore Saul removed him from him, and made him his captain over a thousand; and he went out and came in before the people. 
And David be
804,rth, and let the wicked be no more. Bless thou the LORD, O my soul. Praise ye the LORD. 
O give thanks unto the LORD; call upon his name: make known his deeds among the people. 
Sing unto him, sing psalms unto him: talk ye of all his wondrous works. 
Glory ye in his holy name: let the heart of them rejoice that seek the LORD. 
Seek the LORD, and his strength: seek his face evermore. 
Remember his marvellous works that he hath done; his wonders, and the judgments of his mouth; 
O ye seed of Abraham his servant, ye children of Jacob his chosen. 
He is the LORD our God: his judgments are in all the earth. 
He hath remembered his covenant for ever, the word which he commanded to a thousand generations. 
Which covenant he made with Abraham, and his oath unto Isaac; 
And confirmed the same unto Jaco
756,t; and gold for the pattern of the chariot of the cherubims, that spread out their wings, and covered the ark of the covenant of the LORD. 
All this, said David, the LORD made me understand in writing by his hand upon me, even all the works of this pattern. 
And David said to Solomon his son, Be strong and of good courage, and do it: fear not, nor be dismayed: for the LORD God, even my God, will be with thee; he will not fail thee, nor forsake thee, until thou hast finished all the work for the service of the house of the LORD. 
And, behold, the courses of the priests and the Levites, even they shall be with thee for all the service of the house of God: and there shall be with thee for all manner of workmanship every willing skilful man, for any 
817, commandments, and his judgments, and his testimonies, as it is written in the law of Moses, that thou mayest prosper in all that thou doest, and whithersoever thou turnest thyself: 
That the LORD may continue his word which he spake concerning me, saying, If thy children take heed to their way, to walk before me in truth with all their heart and with all their soul, there shall not fail thee (said he) a man on the throne of Israel. 
Moreover thou knowest also what Joab the son of Zeruiah did to me, and what he did to the two captains of the hosts of Israel, unto Abner the son of Ner, and unto Amasa the son of Jether, whom he slew, and shed the blood of war in peace, and put the blood of war upon his girdle that was about his loins, and in his shoes that were on his feet. 
Do therefore according to thy wis
730,ashti refused to come at the king's commandment by his chamberlains: therefore was the king very wroth, and his anger burned in him. 
Then the king said to the wise men, which knew the times, (for so was the king's manner toward all that knew law and judgment: 
And the next unto him was Carshena, Shethar, Admatha, Tarshish, Meres, Marsena, and Memucan, the seven princes of Persia and Media, which saw the king's face, and which sat the first in the kingdom;) 
What shall we do unto the queen Vashti according to law, because she hath not performed the commandment of the king Ahasuerus by the chamberlains? 
And Memucan answered before the king and the princes, Vashti the queen hath not done wrong to the king only, but also t
642,set by. 
And Saul spake to Jonathan his son, and to all his servants, that they should kill David. 
But Jonathan Saul's son delighted much in David: and Jonathan told David, saying, Saul my father seeketh to kill thee: now therefore, I pray thee, take heed to thyself until the morning, and abide in a secret place, and hide thyself: 
And I will go out and stand beside my father in the field where thou art, and I will commune with my father of thee; and what I see, that I will tell thee. 
And Jonathan spake good of David unto Saul his father, and said unto him, Let not the king sin against his servant, against David; because he hath not
765,ines heard the noise of the shout, they said, What meaneth the noise of this great shout in the camp of the Hebrews? And they understood that the ark of the LORD was come into the camp. 
And the Philistines were afraid, for they said, God is come into the camp. And they said, Woe unto us! for there hath not been such a thing heretofore. 
Woe unto us! who shall deliver us out of the hand of these mighty Gods? these are the Gods that smote the Egyptians with all the plagues in the wilderness. 
Be strong and quit yourselves like men, O ye Philistines, that ye be not servants unto the Hebrews, as they have been to you: quit yourselves like men, and fight. 
And the Philistines fought, and Israel was smitten, and they fled every man into his tent: and there was
715,in the morning Laban rose up, and kissed his sons and his daughters, and blessed them: and Laban departed, and returned unto his place. 
And Jacob went on his way, and the angels of God met him. 
And when Jacob saw them, he said, This is God's host: and he called the name of that place Mahanaim. 
And Jacob sent messengers before him to Esau his brother unto the land of Seir, the country of Edom. 
And he commanded them, saying, Thus shall ye speak unto my lord Esau; Thy servant Jacob saith thus, I have sojourned with Laban, and stayed there until now: 
And I have oxen, and asses, flocks, and menservants, and womenservants: and I have sent to tell my lord, that I may find grace in thy sight. 
And the messeng
623,be revealed. 
And there was one Anna, a prophetess, the daughter of Phanuel, of the tribe of Aser: she was of a great age, and had lived with an husband seven years from her virginity; 
And she was a widow of about fourscore and four years, which departed not from the temple, but served God with fastings and prayers night and day. 
And she coming in that instant gave thanks likewise unto the Lord, and spake of him to all them that looked for redemption in Jerusalem. 
And when they had performed all things according to the law of the Lord, they returned into Galilee, to their own city Nazareth. 
And the child grew, a
569,ell us wherewith we shall send it to his place. 
And they said, If ye send away the ark of the God of Israel, send it not empty; but in any wise return him a trespass offering: then ye shall be healed, and it shall be known to you why his hand is not removed from you. 
Then said they, What shall be the trespass offering which we shall return to him? They answered, Five golden emerods, and five golden mice, according to the number of the lords of the Philistines: for one plague was on you all, and on your lords. 
Wherefore ye shall make images of your emerods, and
798,the town; and when he had spit on his eyes, and put his hands upon him, he asked him if he saw ought. 
And he looked up, and said, I see men as trees, walking. 
After that he put his hands again upon his eyes, and made him look up: and he was restored, and saw every man clearly. 
And he sent him away to his house, saying, Neither go into the town, nor tell it to any in the town. 
And Jesus went out, and his disciples, into the towns of Caesarea Philippi: and by the way he asked his disciples, saying unto them, Whom do men say that I am? 
And they answered, John the Baptist; but some say, Elias; and others, One of the prophets. 
And he saith unto them, But whom say ye that I am? And Peter answereth and saith unto him, Thou art the Christ. 
And he charged them that they should tell no man 
754,aithfully. What is the chaff to the wheat? saith the LORD. 
Is not my word like as a fire? saith the LORD; and like a hammer that breaketh the rock in pieces? 
Therefore, behold, I am against the prophets, saith the LORD, that steal my words every one from his neighbour. 
Behold, I am against the prophets, saith the LORD, that use their tongues, and say, He saith. 
Behold, I am against them that prophesy false dreams, saith the LORD, and do tell them, and cause my people to err by their lies, and by their lightness; yet I sent them not, nor commanded them: therefore they shall not profit this people at all, saith the LORD. 
And when this people, or the prophet, or a priest, shall ask thee, saying, What is the burden of the LORD? thou shalt then
615, ordinances of justice; they take delight in approaching to God. 
Wherefore have we fasted, say they, and thou seest not? wherefore have we afflicted our soul, and thou takest no knowledge? Behold, in the day of your fast ye find pleasure, and exact all your labours. 
Behold, ye fast for strife and debate, and to smite with the fist of wickedness: ye shall not fast as ye do this day, to make your voice to be heard on high. 
Is it such a fast that I have chosen? a day for a man to afflict his soul? is it to bow down his head as a bulrush, and to spread sackcloth and ashes under him? wilt thou call this a fast
819,iest, and before all the congregation; and give him a charge in their sight. 
And thou shalt put some of thine honour upon him, that all the congregation of the children of Israel may be obedient. 
And he shall stand before Eleazar the priest, who shall ask counsel for him after the judgment of Urim before the LORD: at his word shall they go out, and at his word they shall come in, both he, and all the children of Israel with him, even all the congregation. 
And Moses did as the LORD commanded him: and he took Joshua, and set him before Eleazar the priest, and before all the congregation: 
And he laid his hands upon him, and gave him a charge, as the LORD commanded by the hand of Moses. 
And the LORD spake unto Moses, saying, 
Command the children of Israel, and say unto them, My offering, and my bread for m
797,to fine brass, as if they burned in a furnace; and his voice as the sound of many waters. 
And he had in his right hand seven stars: and out of his mouth went a sharp twoedged sword: and his countenance was as the sun shineth in his strength. 
And when I saw him, I fell at his feet as dead. And he laid his right hand upon me, saying unto me, Fear not; I am the first and the last: 
I am he that liveth, and was dead; and, behold, I am alive for evermore, Amen; and have the keys of hell and of death. 
Write the things which thou hast seen, and the things which are, and the things which shall be hereafter; 
The mystery of the seven stars which thou sawest in my right hand, and the seven golden candlesticks. The seven stars are the angels of the seven churches: and the seven candlesticks whi
822, to remembrance saith unto him, Master, behold, the fig tree which thou cursedst is withered away. 
And Jesus answering saith unto them, Have faith in God. 
For verily I say unto you, That whosoever shall say unto this mountain, Be thou removed, and be thou cast into the sea; and shall not doubt in his heart, but shall believe that those things which he saith shall come to pass; he shall have whatsoever he saith. 
Therefore I say unto you, What things soever ye desire, when ye pray, believe that ye receive them, and ye shall have them. 
And when ye stand praying, forgive, if ye have ought against any: that your Father also which is in heaven may forgive you your trespasses. 
But if ye do not forgive, neither will your Father which is in heaven forgive your trespasses. 
And they come again to Jerusalem: and as h
741,f the great King. 
Neither shalt thou swear by thy head, because thou canst not make one hair white or black. 
But let your communication be, Yea, yea; Nay, nay: for whatsoever is more than these cometh of evil. 
Ye have heard that it hath been said, An eye for an eye, and a tooth for a tooth: 
But I say unto you, That ye resist not evil: but whosoever shall smite thee on thy right cheek, turn to him the other also. 
And if any man will sue thee at the law, and take away thy coat, let him have thy cloak also. 
And whosoever shall compel thee to go a mile, go with him twain. 
Give to him that asketh thee, and from him that would borrow of thee turn not thou away. 
Ye have heard that it hath been said, Thou shalt love thy neighbour, 
658,I did; neither had I as yet told it to the Jews, nor to the priests, nor to the nobles, nor to the rulers, nor to the rest that did the work. 
Then said I unto them, Ye see the distress that we are in, how Jerusalem lieth waste, and the gates thereof are burned with fire: come, and let us build up the wall of Jerusalem, that we be no more a reproach. 
Then I told them of the hand of my God which was good upon me; as also the king's words that he had spoken unto me. And they said, Let us rise up and build. So they strengthened their hands for this good work. 
But when Sanballat the Horonite, and Tobiah the servant, the Ammonite, and Geshem the Arabian
742,emple, and overthrew the tables of the moneychangers, and the seats of them that sold doves, 
And said unto them, It is written, My house shall be called the house of prayer; but ye have made it a den of thieves. 
And the blind and the lame came to him in the temple; and he healed them. 
And when the chief priests and scribes saw the wonderful things that he did, and the children crying in the temple, and saying, Hosanna to the son of David; they were sore displeased, 
And said unto him, Hearest thou what these say? And Jesus saith unto them, Yea; have ye never read, Out of the mouth of babes and sucklings thou hast perfected praise? 
And he left them, and went out of the city into Bethany; and he lodged there. 
Now in the morning a
821,fore the moth? 
They are destroyed from morning to evening: they perish for ever without any regarding it. 
Doth not their excellency which is in them go away? they die, even without wisdom. 
Call now, if there be any that will answer thee; and to which of the saints wilt thou turn? 
For wrath killeth the foolish man, and envy slayeth the silly one. 
I have seen the foolish taking root: but suddenly I cursed his habitation. 
His children are far from safety, and they are crushed in the gate, neither is there any to deliver them. 
Whose harvest the hungry eateth up, and taketh it even out of the thorns, and the robber swalloweth up their substance. 
Although affliction cometh not forth of the dust, neither doth trouble spring out of the ground; 
Yet man is born unto trouble, as the sparks fly upward. 
I would s
804,ave Joshua among their brethren on this side Jordan westward. And when Joshua sent them away also unto their tents, then he blessed them, 
And he spake unto them, saying, Return with much riches unto your tents, and with very much cattle, with silver, and with gold, and with brass, and with iron, and with very much raiment: divide the spoil of your enemies with your brethren. 
And the children of Reuben and the children of Gad and the half tribe of Manasseh returned, and departed from the children of Israel out of Shiloh, which is in the land of Canaan, to go unto the country of Gilead, to the land of their possession, whereof they were possessed, according to the word of the LORD by the hand of Moses. 
And when they came unto the borders of Jordan, that are in the land of Canaan, the children
614,e words, and suffered them not to rise against Saul. But Saul rose up out of the cave, and went on his way. 
David also arose afterward, and went out of the cave, and cried after Saul, saying, My lord the king. And when Saul looked behind him, David stooped with his face to the earth, and bowed himself. 
And David said to Saul, Wherefore hearest thou men's words, saying, Behold, David seeketh thy hurt? 
Behold, this day thine eyes have seen how that the LORD had delivered thee to day into mine hand in the cave: and some bade me kill thee: but mine eye spared thee; and I said, I will not put forth mine hand 
815,ee hundred slain by him at one time. 
And after him was Eleazar the son of Dodo, the Ahohite, who was one of the three mighties. 
He was with David at Pasdammim, and there the Philistines were gathered together to battle, where was a parcel of ground full of barley; and the people fled from before the Philistines. 
And they set themselves in the midst of that parcel, and delivered it, and slew the Philistines; and the LORD saved them by a great deliverance. 
Now three of the thirty captains went down to the rock to David, into the cave of Adullam; and the host of the Philistines encamped in the valley of Rephaim. 
And David was then in the hold, and the Philistines' garrison was then at Bethlehem. 
And David longed, and said, Oh that one would give me drink of the water of the well of Bethlehem, that is 
660,e goat of three years old, and a ram of three years old, and a turtledove, and a young pigeon. 
And he took unto him all these, and divided them in the midst, and laid each piece one against another: but the birds divided he not. 
And when the fowls came down upon the carcases, Abram drove them away. 
And when the sun was going down, a deep sleep fell upon Abram; and, lo, an horror of great darkness fell upon him. 
And he said unto Abram, Know of a surety that thy seed shall be a stranger in a land that is not their's, and shall serve them; and they shall afflict them four hundred years; 
And also that nation, whom they shall serve, will I judge: and a
592, to minister, to burn offering made by fire unto the LORD: 
So they shall wash their hands and their feet, that they die not: and it shall be a statute for ever to them, even to him and to his seed throughout their generations. 
Moreover the LORD spake unto Moses, saying, 
Take thou also unto thee principal spices, of pure myrrh five hundred shekels, and of sweet cinnamon half so much, even two hundred and fifty shekels, and of sweet calamus two hundred and fifty shekels, 
And of cassia five hundred shekels, after the shekel of the sanctuary, and of oil olive an hin: 
And thou shalt ma
771,sh shall go forth into captivity with his priests and his princes together. 
And the spoiler shall come upon every city, and no city shall escape: the valley also shall perish, and the plain shall be destroyed, as the LORD hath spoken. 
Give wings unto Moab, that it may flee and get away: for the cities thereof shall be desolate, without any to dwell therein. 
Cursed be he that doeth the work of the LORD deceitfully, and cursed be he that keepeth back his sword from blood. 
Moab hath been at ease from his youth, and he hath settled on his lees, and hath not been emptied from vessel to vessel, neither hath he gone into captivity: therefore his taste remained in him, and his scent is not changed. 
Therefore, behold, the days come, saith the LORD, that I will send
733,hen begin to enquire of God for him? be it far from me: let not the king impute any thing unto his servant, nor to all the house of my father: for thy servant knew nothing of all this, less or more. 
And the king said, Thou shalt surely die, Ahimelech, thou, and all thy father's house. 
And the king said unto the footmen that stood about him, Turn, and slay the priests of the LORD: because their hand also is with David, and because they knew when he fled, and did not shew it to me. But the servants of the king would not put forth their hand to fall upon the priests of the LORD. 
And the king said to Doeg, Turn thou, and fall upon the priests. And Doeg the Edomite turned, and he fell upon the priests, and slew on that day fo
636,into mourning, and all your songs into lamentation; and I will bring up sackcloth upon all loins, and baldness upon every head; and I will make it as the mourning of an only son, and the end thereof as a bitter day. 
Behold, the days come, saith the Lord GOD, that I will send a famine in the land, not a famine of bread, nor a thirst for water, but of hearing the words of the LORD: 
And they shall wander from sea to sea, and from the north even to the east, they shall run to and fro to seek the word of the LORD, and shall not find it. 
In that day shall the fair virgins and young men faint for thirst. 
They that swear by the sin 
781,and fell down before him, and told him all the truth. 
And he said unto her, Daughter, thy faith hath made thee whole; go in peace, and be whole of thy plague. 
While he yet spake, there came from the ruler of the synagogue's house certain which said, Thy daughter is dead: why troublest thou the Master any further? 
As soon as Jesus heard the word that was spoken, he saith unto the ruler of the synagogue, Be not afraid, only believe. 
And he suffered no man to follow him, save Peter, and James, and John the brother of James. 
And he cometh to the house of the ruler of the synagogue, and seeth the tumult, and them that wept and wailed greatly. 
And when he was come in, he saith unto them, Why make ye this ado, and weep? the damsel is not dead, but sleepeth. 
And they laug
765, house: and the king and his throne be guiltless. 
And the king said, Whoever saith ought unto thee, bring him to me, and he shall not touch thee any more. 
Then said she, I pray thee, let the king remember the LORD thy God, that thou wouldest not suffer the revengers of blood to destroy any more, lest they destroy my son. And he said, As the LORD liveth, there shall not one hair of thy son fall to the earth. 
Then the woman said, Let thine handmaid, I pray thee, speak one word unto my lord the king. And he said, Say on. 
And the woman said, Wherefore then hast thou thought such a thing against the people of God? for the king doth speak this thing as one which is faulty, in that the king doth not fetch home again his banished. 
For we must needs die, and 
816, inhabitants of the world, would not have believed that the adversary and the enemy should have entered into the gates of Jerusalem. 
For the sins of her prophets, and the iniquities of her priests, that have shed the blood of the just in the midst of her, 
They have wandered as blind men in the streets, they have polluted themselves with blood, so that men could not touch their garments. 
They cried unto them, Depart ye; it is unclean; depart, depart, touch not: when they fled away and wandered, they said among the heathen, They shall no more sojourn there. 
The anger of the LORD hath divided them; he will no more regard them: they respected not the persons of the priests, they favoured not the elders. 
As for us, our eyes as yet failed for our vain help: in our watching we have watched for a nation that
677,ri, among their dukes in the land of Seir. 
And these are the kings that reigned in the land of Edom, before there reigned any king over the children of Israel. 
And Bela the son of Beor reigned in Edom: and the name of his city was Dinhabah. 
And Bela died, and Jobab the son of Zerah of Bozrah reigned in his stead. 
And Jobab died, and Husham of the land of Temani reigned in his stead. 
And Husham died, and Hadad the son of Bedad, who smote Midian in the field of Moab, reigned in his stead: and the name of his city was Avith. 
And Hadad died, and Samlah of Masrekah reigned in his stead. 
And Samlah died, and Saul of Rehoboth by the river reigned in his stead. 
And Sau
779,redoms: for the land hath committed great whoredom, departing from the LORD. 
So he went and took Gomer the daughter of Diblaim; which conceived, and bare him a son. 
And the LORD said unto him, Call his name Jezreel; for yet a little while, and I will avenge the blood of Jezreel upon the house of Jehu, and will cause to cease the kingdom of the house of Israel. 
And it shall come to pass at that day, that I will break the bow of Israel, in the valley of Jezreel. 
And she conceived again, and bare a daughter. And God said unto him, Call her name Loruhamah: for I will no more have mercy upon the house of Israel; but I will utterly take them away. 
But I will have mercy upon the house of Judah, and will save them by the LORD their God, and will not save them by bow, nor 
655,according as the LORD thy God hath blessed thee: 
And thou shalt rejoice before the LORD thy God, thou, and thy son, and thy daughter, and thy manservant, and thy maidservant, and the Levite that is within thy gates, and the stranger, and the fatherless, and the widow, that are among you, in the place which the LORD thy God hath chosen to place his name there. 
And thou shalt remember that thou wast a bondman in Egypt: and thou shalt observe and do these statutes. 
Thou shalt observe the feast of tabernacles seven days, after that thou hast gathered in thy corn and thy wine: 
And thou shalt rejoice in thy feast, thou, and thy son, and thy daughter
692,man named Jairus, and he was a ruler of the synagogue: and he fell down at Jesus' feet, and besought him that he would come into his house: 
For he had one only daughter, about twelve years of age, and she lay a dying. But as he went the people thronged him. 
And a woman having an issue of blood twelve years, which had spent all her living upon physicians, neither could be healed of any, 
Came behind him, and touched the border of his garment: and immediately her issue of blood stanched. 
And Jesus said, Who touched me? When all denied, Peter and they that were with him said, Master, the multitude throng thee and press thee, and sayest thou, Who touched me? 
And Jesus said, Somebody 
593,that dieth in the field shall the fowls of the air eat. 
But there was none like unto Ahab, which did sell himself to work wickedness in the sight of the LORD, whom Jezebel his wife stirred up. 
And he did very abominably in following idols, according to all things as did the Amorites, whom the LORD cast out before the children of Israel. 
And it came to pass, when Ahab heard those words, that he rent his clothes, and put sackcloth upon his flesh, and fasted, and lay in sackcloth, and went softly. 
And the word of the LORD came to Elijah the Tishbite, saying, 
Seest thou how Ahab humble
821, hast there them that hold the doctrine of Balaam, who taught Balac to cast a stumblingblock before the children of Israel, to eat things sacrificed unto idols, and to commit fornication. 
So hast thou also them that hold the doctrine of the Nicolaitanes, which thing I hate. 
Repent; or else I will come unto thee quickly, and will fight against them with the sword of my mouth. 
He that hath an ear, let him hear what the Spirit saith unto the churches; To him that overcometh will I give to eat of the hidden manna, and will give him a white stone, and in the stone a new name written, which no man knoweth saving he that receiveth it. 
And unto the angel of the church in Thyatira write; These things saith the Son of God, who hath his eyes like unto a flame of fire, and his feet are like fine brass; 
I know thy wor
666,offerings for the bullocks, for the rams, and for the lambs, shall be according to their number, after the manner: 
And one kid of the goats for a sin offering; beside the continual burnt offering, and the meat offering thereof, and their drink offerings. 
And on the third day eleven bullocks, two rams, fourteen lambs of the first year without blemish; 
And their meat offering and their drink offerings for the bullocks, for the rams, and for the lambs, shall be according to their number, after the manner: 
And one goat for a sin offering; beside the continual burnt offering, and his meat offering, and his drink offering. 
And on the fourth day ten bullocks, 
699,ill not hearken. 
Therefore hear, ye nations, and know, O congregation, what is among them. 
Hear, O earth: behold, I will bring evil upon this people, even the fruit of their thoughts, because they have not hearkened unto my words, nor to my law, but rejected it. 
To what purpose cometh there to me incense from Sheba, and the sweet cane from a far country? your burnt offerings are not acceptable, nor your sacrifices sweet unto me. 
Therefore thus saith the LORD, Behold, I will lay stumblingblocks before this people, and the fathers and the sons together shall fall upon them; the neighbour and his friend shall perish. 
Thus saith the LORD, Behold, a people cometh from the north country, and
675, dig through houses, which they had marked for themselves in the daytime: they know not the light. 
For the morning is to them even as the shadow of death: if one know them, they are in the terrors of the shadow of death. 
He is swift as the waters; their portion is cursed in the earth: he beholdeth not the way of the vineyards. 
Drought and heat consume the snow waters: so doth the grave those which have sinned. 
The womb shall forget him; the worm shall feed sweetly on him; he shall be no more remembered; and wickedness shall be broken as a tree. 
He evil entreateth the barren that beareth not: and doeth not good to the widow. 
He draweth also the mighty with his p
560,the flour of the meat offering, and of the oil thereof, and all the frankincense which is upon the meat offering, and shall burn it upon the altar for a sweet savour, even the memorial of it, unto the LORD. 
And the remainder thereof shall Aaron and his sons eat: with unleavened bread shall it be eaten in the holy place; in the court of the tabernacle of the congregation they shall eat it. 
It shall not be baken with leaven. I have given it unto them for their portion of my offerings made by fire; it is most holy, as is the sin offering, and as the tresp
562,im, as they feared Moses, all the days of his life. 
And the LORD spake unto Joshua, saying, 
Command the priests that bear the ark of the testimony, that they come up out of Jordan. 
Joshua therefore commanded the priests, saying, Come ye up out of Jordan. 
And it came to pass, when the priests that bare the ark of the covenant of the LORD were come up out of the midst of Jordan, and the soles of the priests' feet were lifted up unto the dry land, that the waters of Jordan returned unto their place, and flowed over all his banks, as they did before. 
And 
572,er, in truth and love. 
I rejoiced greatly that I found of thy children walking in truth, as we have received a commandment from the Father. 
And now I beseech thee, lady, not as though I wrote a new commandment unto thee, but that which we had from the beginning, that we love one another. 
And this is love, that we walk after his commandments. This is the commandment, That, as ye have heard from the beginning, ye should walk in it. 
For many deceivers are entered into the world, who confess not that Jesus Christ is come in the flesh. This is a deceiver and an antic
680, of the sect of the Nazarenes: 
Who also hath gone about to profane the temple: whom we took, and would have judged according to our law. 
But the chief captain Lysias came upon us, and with great violence took him away out of our hands, 
Commanding his accusers to come unto thee: by examining of whom thyself mayest take knowledge of all these things, whereof we accuse him. 
And the Jews also assented, saying that these things were so. 
Then Paul, after that the governor had beckoned unto him to speak, answered, Forasmuch as I know that thou hast been of many years a judge unto this nation, I do the more cheerfully answer for myself: 
Because that thou mayest understand, 
658,nd forgive us our sins; for we also forgive every one that is indebted to us. And lead us not into temptation; but deliver us from evil. 
And he said unto them, Which of you shall have a friend, and shall go unto him at midnight, and say unto him, Friend, lend me three loaves; 
For a friend of mine in his journey is come to me, and I have nothing to set before him? 
And he from within shall answer and say, Trouble me not: the door is now shut, and my children are with me in bed; I cannot rise and give thee. 
I say unto you, Though he will not rise and give him, because he is his friend, yet because of his importunity he will rise and give him as many
689,h for iniquity are cut off: 
That make a man an offender for a word, and lay a snare for him that reproveth in the gate, and turn aside the just for a thing of nought. 
Therefore thus saith the LORD, who redeemed Abraham, concerning the house of Jacob, Jacob shall not now be ashamed, neither shall his face now wax pale. 
But when he seeth his children, the work of mine hands, in the midst of him, they shall sanctify my name, and sanctify the Holy One of Jacob, and shall fear the God of Israel. 
They also that erred in spirit shall come to understanding, and they that murmured shall learn doctrine. 
Woe to the rebellious children, saith the LORD, that take counsel, but not of me; a
756,t over Jordan with the king, to conduct him over Jordan. 
Now Barzillai was a very aged man, even fourscore years old: and he had provided the king of sustenance while he lay at Mahanaim; for he was a very great man. 
And the king said unto Barzillai, Come thou over with me, and I will feed thee with me in Jerusalem. 
And Barzillai said unto the king, How long have I to live, that I should go up with the king unto Jerusalem? 
I am this day fourscore years old: and can I discern between good and evil? can thy servant taste what I eat or what I drink? can I hear any more the voice of singing men and singing women? wherefore then should thy servant be yet a burden unto my lord the king? 
Thy servant will go a little way over Jordan with the king: an
632,n the way. 
Be not among winebibbers; among riotous eaters of flesh: 
For the drunkard and the glutton shall come to poverty: and drowsiness shall clothe a man with rags. 
Hearken unto thy father that begat thee, and despise not thy mother when she is old. 
Buy the truth, and sell it not; also wisdom, and instruction, and understanding. 
The father of the righteous shall greatly rejoice: and he that begetteth a wise child shall have joy of him. 
Thy father and thy mother shall be glad, and she that bare thee shall rejoice. 
My son, give me thine heart, and let thine eyes observe my ways. 
For a whore is a deep ditch; and a s
583,out. 
He measured the east side with the measuring reed, five hundred reeds, with the measuring reed round about. 
He measured the north side, five hundred reeds, with the measuring reed round about. 
He measured the south side, five hundred reeds, with the measuring reed. 
He turned about to the west side, and measured five hundred reeds with the measuring reed. 
He measured it by the four sides: it had a wall round about, five hundred reeds long, and five hundred broad, to make a separation between the sanctuary and the profane place. 
Afterward he brought me to the gate, ev
656,d, in Sion: and unto thee shall the vow be performed. 
O thou that hearest prayer, unto thee shall all flesh come. 
Iniquities prevail against me: as for our transgressions, thou shalt purge them away. 
Blessed is the man whom thou choosest, and causest to approach unto thee, that he may dwell in thy courts: we shall be satisfied with the goodness of thy house, even of thy holy temple. 
By terrible things in righteousness wilt thou answer us, O God of our salvation; who art the confidence of all the ends of the earth, and of them that are afar off upon the sea: 
Which by his strength setteth fast the mountains; being girded with power: 
Which still
644,And when I rose in the morning to give my child suck, behold, it was dead: but when I had considered it in the morning, behold, it was not my son, which I did bear. 
And the other woman said, Nay; but the living is my son, and the dead is thy son. And this said, No; but the dead is thy son, and the living is my son. Thus they spake before the king. 
Then said the king, The one saith, This is my son that liveth, and thy son is the dead: and the other saith, Nay; but thy son is the dead, and my son is the living. 
And the king said, Bring me a sword. And they brought a sword before the king. 
And the king said, Divide the living child in 
653,nd when Joshua sent them away also unto their tents, then he blessed them, 
And he spake unto them, saying, Return with much riches unto your tents, and with very much cattle, with silver, and with gold, and with brass, and with iron, and with very much raiment: divide the spoil of your enemies with your brethren. 
And the children of Reuben and the children of Gad and the half tribe of Manasseh returned, and departed from the children of Israel out of Shiloh, which is in the land of Canaan, to go unto the country of Gilead, to the land of their possession, whereof they were possessed, according to the word of the LORD by the hand of Moses. 
And
618, and his sons, keeping the charge of the sanctuary for the charge of the children of Israel; and the stranger that cometh nigh shall be put to death. 
All that were numbered of the Levites, which Moses and Aaron numbered at the commandment of the LORD, throughout their families, all the males from a month old and upward, were twenty and two thousand. 
And the LORD said unto Moses, Number all the firstborn of the males of the children of Israel from a month old and upward, and take the number of their names. 
And thou shalt take the Levites for me (I am the LORD) instead of all the firstborn among the children o
580,mine own inheritance: redeem thou my right to thyself; for I cannot redeem it. 
Now this was the manner in former time in Israel concerning redeeming and concerning changing, for to confirm all things; a man plucked off his shoe, and gave it to his neighbour: and this was a testimony in Israel. 
Therefore the kinsman said unto Boaz, Buy it for thee. So he drew off his shoe. 
And Boaz said unto the elders, and unto all the people, Ye are witnesses this day, that I have bought all that was Elimelech's, and all that was Chilion's and Mahlon's, of the hand of Naomi. 
Moreover R
650,d of the angel which appeared to him in the bush. 
He brought them out, after that he had shewed wonders and signs in the land of Egypt, and in the Red sea, and in the wilderness forty years. 
This is that Moses, which said unto the children of Israel, A prophet shall the Lord your God raise up unto you of your brethren, like unto me; him shall ye hear. 
This is he, that was in the church in the wilderness with the angel which spake to him in the mount Sina, and with our fathers: who received the lively oracles to give unto us: 
To whom our fathers would not obey, but thrust him from them, and in their hearts turned back again into Egypt, 
Sa
613,e children of Israel murmured against Moses and Aaron in the wilderness: 
And the children of Israel said unto them, Would to God we had died by the hand of the LORD in the land of Egypt, when we sat by the flesh pots, and when we did eat bread to the full; for ye have brought us forth into this wilderness, to kill this whole assembly with hunger. 
Then said the LORD unto Moses, Behold, I will rain bread from heaven for you; and the people shall go out and gather a certain rate every day, that I may prove them, whether they will walk in my law, or no. 
And it shall come to pass, that on the sixth day they 
583,ain, even unto the year of the jubile, and it shall be abated from thy estimation. 
And if he that sanctified the field will in any wise redeem it, then he shall add the fifth part of the money of thy estimation unto it, and it shall be assured to him. 
And if he will not redeem the field, or if he have sold the field to another man, it shall not be redeemed any more. 
But the field, when it goeth out in the jubile, shall be holy unto the LORD, as a field devoted; the possession thereof shall be the priest's. 
And if a man sanctify unto the LORD a field which he hath bought, w
823,hast done to him: then I will send, and fetch thee from thence: why should I be deprived also of you both in one day? 
And Rebekah said to Isaac, I am weary of my life because of the daughters of Heth: if Jacob take a wife of the daughters of Heth, such as these which are of the daughters of the land, what good shall my life do me? 
And Isaac called Jacob, and blessed him, and charged him, and said unto him, Thou shalt not take a wife of the daughters of Canaan. 
Arise, go to Padanaram, to the house of Bethuel thy mother's father; and take thee a wife from thence of the daughers of Laban thy mother's brother. 
And God Almighty bless thee, and make thee fruitful, and multiply thee, that thou mayest be a multitude of people; 
And give thee the blessing of Abraham, to thee, and to thy seed with thee; that thou maye
660,t thou? 
Who answered, Give me a blessing; for thou hast given me a south land; give me also springs of water. And he gave her the upper springs, and the nether springs. 
This is the inheritance of the tribe of the children of Judah according to their families. 
And the uttermost cities of the tribe of the children of Judah toward the coast of Edom southward were Kabzeel, and Eder, and Jagur, 
And Kinah, and Dimonah, and Adadah, 
And Kedesh, and Hazor, and Ithnan, 
Ziph, and Telem, and Bealoth, 
And Hazor, Hadattah, and Kerioth, and Hezron, which is Hazor, 
Amam, and Shema, and Moladah, 
And Hazargaddah, and Heshmon, and Bethpalet, 
And Hazarshual, and
828,LORD, that he sought an occasion against the Philistines: for at that time the Philistines had dominion over Israel. 
Then went Samson down, and his father and his mother, to Timnath, and came to the vineyards of Timnath: and, behold, a young lion roared against him. 
And the Spirit of the LORD came mightily upon him, and he rent him as he would have rent a kid, and he had nothing in his hand: but he told not his father or his mother what he had done. 
And he went down, and talked with the woman; and she pleased Samson well. 
And after a time he returned to take her, and he turned aside to see the carcase of the lion: and, behold, there was a swarm of bees and honey in the carcase of the lion. 
And he took thereof in his hands, and went on eating, and came to his father and mother, and he gave them, and they did eat:
830, goeth by me, and I see him not: he passeth on also, but I perceive him not. 
Behold, he taketh away, who can hinder him? who will say unto him, What doest thou? 
If God will not withdraw his anger, the proud helpers do stoop under him. 
How much less shall I answer him, and choose out my words to reason with him? 
Whom, though I were righteous, yet would I not answer, but I would make supplication to my judge. 
If I had called, and he had answered me; yet would I not believe that he had hearkened unto my voice. 
For he breaketh me with a tempest, and multiplieth my wounds without cause. 
He will not suffer me to take my breath, but filleth me with bitterness. 
If I speak of strength, lo, he is strong: and if of judgment, who shall set me a time to plead? 
If I justify myself, mine own mouth shall condemn me: if I say,
797,nts and his statutes which he commanded thee: 
And they shall be upon thee for a sign and for a wonder, and upon thy seed for ever. 
Because thou servedst not the LORD thy God with joyfulness, and with gladness of heart, for the abundance of all things; 
Therefore shalt thou serve thine enemies which the LORD shall send against thee, in hunger, and in thirst, and in nakedness, and in want of all things: and he shall put a yoke of iron upon thy neck, until he have destroyed thee. 
The LORD shall bring a nation against thee from far, from the end of the earth, as swift as the eagle flieth; a nation whose tongue thou shalt not understand; 
A nation of fierce countenance, which shall not regard the person of the old, nor shew favour to the young: 
And he shall eat the fruit of thy cattle, a
606,the LORD, and to the king's palace, and harps and psalteries for singers: and there were none such seen before in the land of Judah. 
And king Solomon gave to the queen of Sheba all her desire, whatsoever she asked, beside that which she had brought unto the king. So she turned, and went away to her own land, she and her servants. 
Now the weight of gold that came to Solomon in one year was six hundred and threescore and six talents of gold; 
Beside that which chapmen and merchants brought. And all the kings of Arabia and governors of the country brought gold and silver to Solomon. 
And king Solomon
721,gn, wrote they unto him an accusation against the inhabitants of Judah and Jerusalem. 
And in the days of Artaxerxes wrote Bishlam, Mithredath, Tabeel, and the rest of their companions, unto Artaxerxes king of Persia; and the writing of the letter was written in the Syrian tongue, and interpreted in the Syrian tongue. 
Rehum the chancellor and Shimshai the scribe wrote a letter against Jerusalem to Artaxerxes the king in this sort: 
Then wrote Rehum the chancellor, and Shimshai the scribe, and the rest of their companions; the Dinaites, the Apharsathchites, the Tarpelites, the Apharsites, the Archevites, the Babylonians, the Susanchites, the Dehavites, and the Elamites, 
And the rest of the nations whom the grea
597,ed. And he that sounded the trumpet was by me. 
And I said unto the nobles, and to the rulers, and to the rest of the people, The work is great and large, and we are separated upon the wall, one far from another. 
In what place therefore ye hear the sound of the trumpet, resort ye thither unto us: our God shall fight for us. 
So we laboured in the work: and half of them held the spears from the rising of the morning till the stars appeared. 
Likewise at the same time said I unto the people, Let every one with his servant lodge within Jerusalem, that in the night they may be a guard to us, a
